The Power of Pi


Written by:

  
andrew stickman - zach lagrou - nic graves


Edited by A. Stickman & Eric V. Dawson


Dedicated to our Parents


"I'm not concerned about all hell breaking loose, but that a PART of hell will break loose... it'll be much harder to detect."   George Carlin

"Far as the laws of mathematics refer to reality, they are not certain, and as far as they are certain, they do not refer to reality." Albert Einstein 

"The only reality is absurdity." Frank Zappa


During 
         Our 
              Doomed 
                       Near Future

	With a shot to the head from drunk American hands, sanity was executed before the public on channel 42, and the masses sold it as entertainment. It was supposed to be funny.
The reality of the situation was straight from a trenchant nightmare: A midnight massacre at the premiere of the greatest superhero saga's conclusion. Kids trade their parents' guns at school to mutilate other children like pogs. Civil wars scattered across the flattened globe with an untraceable black hand plotting to annihilate all that is man. Food shortages, stamp tax, tea party; get mad over everything: the oceans rising temperature; Japan's nuclear fallout/North Korea invasion, Al Qaeda all over again; over population; perfect storms; water on Mercury; life on Mars; Guts spilling Oil filling seas of clean water but we want the fuckin juice and humanity equals denial. The Cosmic Lie controls the world.
	Eye contact is forbidden at America's open casket funeral. No one goes, we come home in plastic bags nation to nation. 
The rate of journalists' sultriness beddably compares to the cheapness of plastic surgery.
	$$$$$$$$$$$$
$$$$$$$$$$$$
$$$$$$$$$$$$
"That's a big pile of money?"
Cha-ching-dolla-billz-yo:$Suck my dick$
	EarthQuakes, Hurricanes, tsunami tornaders with floods reign like the rapture and bible stocks skyrocket. The earth is literally telling us to get the fuck out but it's such a damn good spectacle of drama you can't turn your head, change the channel, or wake up. Bottom line; The Tube stays on, always. Louder than your family and funnier than your friends. 
		In the center of it all is San Tropez, Nebraska; capitol of Earth. 
	The middle of the map, where the outspoken Idol promoted peace throughout the country and saved the trillion dolla deficit, reinvented the infrastructure of media; inexpensive crackers, introducing us a new, huge market for jobs and consumers alike, becoming the #1 export in the world overnight. Now, everyone and everything was connected to the virtual Outernet; seemingly like the internet, but legal, yet censored to the extreme. Nothing like some good ole expensive headphones to plug you out of reality. "It's nice cuz most people shut up." -Argis Meckalikk, age 25.5.
	Every conceivable inch of the converted post-reality chic covered city drapes a brilliant sky blue flag or bumper sticker or tee-shirt or G-string, reading: I (heart) Deadsy or Go into the Light or The Sentimentalist Church and State and You, or Let Nebraska Secede from the World, or Praises to Exeter - Our God!
	But don't forget about the odd balls-
	The football shaped apple,
	The Apple shaped football?
	The broken journalist Josh Turkey could do nothing of the global brain-wash; the unavoidable subliminal takeover of Earth. Drugs impregnated in the water supply and spliced inside the crackers - Lies behind every advertisement and coupon - Corruption even in public transportation - He has those who were brainwashed doing the brainwashing for him! It was hard to even make the quaintest of conversations with people they were so bloating in this fake world that didn't really exist?Maybe you should join them, huh Josh? Time to get some real friends, besides your Mother. But even she had slipped, perhaps long ago. All she did was watch TV now, and pray. She would pray for the wrong things though; The TV, the Huskers to win, her margarita not to be too salty, time to be shorter, atheists and smokers to die. She prayed for whatever her video-church would tell her to.
	It was the voice of the Sentimentalists, the followers of the most dominant religion of the new age. A tripped out theology that only believes in the past, completely unaware of the present. Their followers ignorant of why or when these rules were made, only accepting them as morality because of the Idol.
	The unheard voice in the music?
	THAT RECHID MUSIC! It was the most potent controller; the most accessible, the most profitable, the most trendy. Easily the closest connection between body, mind and soul. It's the most universal way to steal possession of their soul before they know they're young. 
	The so-called Country Music Man had unseen ties to Deadsy and Exeter, no doubt. Of course, he was a much weaker piece of the chess board, as cliché as it seems-- but hold no deceptions, and recognize the truth, for He moved forward, attacking diagonally, only as cliché could allow it, onliest to be thwarted by the Three?
	
	After another long humiliating day at the Corporate News station, reporting to an audience of 41.3 viewers (on his blog), the last thing Josh wanted to do was latch himself onto another bogus story that wouldn't even spark the most conductible neurons. Anyway, the issue pressing at the present slapped his gut; Mom will want Chinese tonight? how the hell am I going to drive through that? He was referring to, of course, the carnal scene of precipitatory madness outside.
	Rain poured heavy, bulbous clusters of wet downpour clacking on the cement, denting cars and dissolving umbrellas mercilessly. The storm showed no sign of slowing and somehow became angrier and angrier with every passing minute. As Josh exited the downtown building, water flowed down streets past his ankles; I've never seen anything like this, at least, not in my hometown. He grew up believing San Tropez was immune to flooding. Now?The city had taken no precautions and was somewhat still oblivious to the perilous threat of the watery doom that was pushing its way through irreversibly shut doors.
Rain fell all week long, yet there was no News report on the imminent flooding on any channel. People tried to walk down the street normally, as if there was no monsoon present. Some were even trying to stand still while holding shopping bags beneath their umbrellas that would only send them whirling across the street and into a different department store. Josh carefully checked his ethrapad maps and could see the Platte river levy, ready to burst any second. He took a picture and posted it-well, attempted to, "Damn my Outernet! Internet is soo much faster!" 
A plastic bag clung itself onto his leg from a nasty cold gust of rain drenched wind. Josh pulled out his umbrella and it immediately broke with another whooshing gale, nearly throwing him ass first into water. The plastic bag of litter hit his face wetly. He brushed the bag off disgustingly, as it swallowed a hairy cat tumbling round the corner.
	He stiffened, cursing, "Damn my eyes!" His hand was racing in his pocket, fumbling his dungeon master key-chain, its sound resembling a shelf of broken cymbals. "Damn my keys!" Bending over, his glasses lost their grip and fell into the water. "Ehh they were broken anyway?" He spit. It landed on his pants.
Hunched over, a humongously ominous gust blew his pony-tail in front of his face. There was lightning and loud thunder now. For some reason, Josh found somewhere in his confused boyish past that thunder could be relaxing. But this was different?this was?a warning?-- Great Turkey, now you've lost it.     
Then suddenly, he thought he saw something from an old nightmare in the corner of his eye and quickly dismissed it through the tangled strings of his hair. But like any good journalist, he took a second glance to reassure himself; a few blocks ahead, a large dark shape emerged moving like a furry giant out of an old low budget sci-fi flick, [maybe one involving claymation]. What the duckin fudge? Josh's mind flashed to when he'd seen the Big Foot, but-But but but, how? Is this real?
He was sure it was right as the rain pouring with no mistaking?this was something out of this world. A monster?
Without thinking anymore, Josh instinctively shot out the ethrapad-camera as if he were a gunslinger and focused as fast as digitally possible, capturing only a glimpse, eyes flashing. 
	The glimpse, however, is usually never enough. "OMG!" he said. "What the hell are you?" He tried to zoom-in on the dark looming shape but the pixels and rain infested any focused shot. You're not running away from me you bastard!
	Lucky for his end, his News Team's van (technically his mother's) was full of precious gasoline. Josh emailed the video to his online "GF", Kylia, and peeled out, almost getting into a car accident with slow regurgitating water spitooning oncoming traffic. 
	Rain fell, fell and fell in gallonous drops. Thunder baboomed and the lightning that lit up the sky was white, cold and terrifying. It was hailing plum size balls every now and then.	The first flood to have ever hit the Trendy City blindly sacked them harder than a roided out Adham-aKkong Stu (average 7.63 sacks per game 2009 [28 games]). 
Most of the subconsciously involved citizens were asleep when the Flood broke the Platte river levy. Waves came crashing through downtown killing nearly the entire homeless population. People were eating pizza as they drowned, but drowning on the pizza or the haunted waters could not be said for sure?
	
	The Beast was a master of disguise, and with the guise of the flood she slipped shadow to shadow beyond Gramercy Park, inside a crater Josh would claim aliens babombed us in a war billinia ago. 
Nearly a twin in size of San Tropez, the Northern border connects the biggest park in America to the North farmlands. Before written history, bears, lions, wooly mammoths and giant land sharks roamed the very same plains before the buffalo grazed and before the dawning of tribes of the first men. But now, the park is half-barren. Animals refuse to go there. Seldom plants grow. Dead trees linger in mass proportion, short and twisted in stature, constantly weary looking and tangled. There was obviously some greater power here, which none understood, so therefore, dissented to sturdier safer ground.
	A great plateau surrounded by a lifeless multicolored forest; a signpost: " Strictly forbidden to ANYONE" (due to unstable terrain and home to a large concentration of class 5 endangered species) [*update: the animal is now extinct] ?
	It's one of those Natural American Wonder's peoples forget about cuz they only know what's made by man. It's also said by Exeter's law that thou shalt not goeth' there. Strangely enough, it was the suicide capitol of Earth, and even stranger, you wouldn't see signs along any path whatsoever that read "Please do not kill yourself. Think of Your family. Call a Doctor. Brought to you by Deadsy, Exeter for a better tomorrow, today!" 
This was the future we bought for ourselves as the indistinct hairy monster prowled in an undisclosed rage of torment.
	A stench burnt through her nostrils like a strong whiff of chlorine. 	Its tongue revulsed foul with a dry fecal cat taste; the Three.
 	They were following her, bickering childishly like brothers in turmoil since birth. The Beast pondered what it would look like to slice open their young supple underbelly and reverse the weak skeleton to face inside out, wearing them as grotesque mittens to monster church,
	One by one I will kill you off-- Yes O Yes O Yes O Yes-
	tasting warm and holy red sustenance, growing and more growing. Yessss. Grow so large she'll crap out planets. A preemptive howl called to the moon like water raining from the heavens. 
	Unbeknownst to her, the best tracker Earth ever supplied was on her trail, much closer than he was 30 seconds ago. A flash of lightning exploded behind the Beast. Its lidless black eyes glistened in her yellow dripping serpent mouth from the explosion of heat and pressure. It galloped away, splat splat splatting in mud, steam rising from her touch.
	The Three following were shaking; trembling. This was their becoming; the first time out of mama's nest. First time under the sheets. First time behind the wheel. First time they'd spill their own blood and know how to share it.
	Their fashion was uniquely queer, as if they were out of some stupid, tacky, dorky boring comic book. Not even a good one! 
	The young short one was clad in a green one piece pajama suit with a bright yellow blanket cape tied around the neck, floating above his comrades. His short brown hair stood on end from static popping around him. On his chest was the Greek symbol of Pi, shimmering.
	By far the largest and broadest neglected a shirt, but probably needed one, for his chest was plagued with thicks and curlies that matched the blond hair atop his head underneath a rugged brown hat, angled perfectly. It complemented his rough face and blond goatee that only meant he was ready to party. He looked like he could have the Crocodile Hunter for breakfast and still want thirds. The whip in his hand seemed to say "you best not be on the other side cuz I'm a muthafukinkilla." You could taste the testosterone in the air coming from him, and it was splendid. 
	And the third-- the third had a brown paper bag for a head, appearing to have facial expressions of its own: a suspicious frown and sneering eyes. There was a hint of boiling red pupils from a hatred this Bag-Head did not understand-- not as friendly as the other two. The scarecrow wore an untucked red and black checkered flannel that seemed to change color above his dark jeans and steel toed boots. Kicking at his side was a rawhide satchel that randomly flashed a tiny wink of light as if reflecting a dying star. It sung a noise of a melancholy choir hocketing The Power Compels You.
	The one resembling a circus Lion Tamer studied the ground with his sausage fingers and looked up all of a sudden, pointing directly at the Beast unloving. Rain fountained off of his stylish hat staring down the Beast. She prepared to pounce. Thunder baboomed, lightning sprawling from all directions, as if controlled. The Beast leapt fiercely at the Three-- but suddenly found herself concealed in a giant air tight bag, so strong it managed to seal the entire ogre inside. The Wolf scratched and scratched each attempt more furious than the next, nothing happening until it attempted to grip the bag with its jagged poisonous teeth when the plastic-like material spontaneously evaporated. 
	Growling, the She-Wolf raised its beak and followed the scent of the Three, over 4 rolling hills to an eerily quaint, seemingly out of place, log cabin. The rain was beginning to lull in the cacophony of the elegiac forest. The Wolf stood perplexedly scratching under her chin, questioning the stupidity of these boy-children. It cleared its voice and knocked on the door with a friendly jingle that sounded like she wasn't a cop. The wolf exhaled clouds around herself like peyote smoke. Knock Knock Knock.
	"Uhm?.who is it?" A young man's voice cracked, disguised in a high pitched drawl.
	"It's me BOYS!" She huffed and puffed. "The Big Menace. I eat the men I fuck. But you are not men. You are soft and helpless children!!!" She hissed over a growl.
	"The Big Menace?" the shy voice replied unimpressed. "All grown up, ehha, well, what brings you to St. Tropez?"
	"I have the itch, the craving urge to bathe in the blood of Pi's progeny, after you squirm your life's seed into my belly!" She cackled and pounded the door startlingly.
	"Sorry, no progenies here. If you're looking for those handsome lads that were wandering aimlessly, please give'em my number. Oh how these lonesome cabin nights torture my loins!" Then laughter with the sound of palms colliding. The Monster, now confused but decided to play into it anyway.
	"Are you serious? Really? You're not gonna make it this easy are y--" a crackle exploded out a window and sprung forth the mighty whip of the Lion Tamer popping the left eye out of the Beast like a juicy green pimple on the tip of your nose.
	"OWSONOFABITCHGODAMNTHATREALYFUCKINHURTHOLYSHITbALZ!" screamed the Beast covering its vacant eyehole that had now begun to gush out a dank loose tar in gross amounts. When it decided to withhold the profanity, she chortled and gave a quavering tremble. The sticky tar was coming out like a geyser and it was spreading over her body into a morbid cocoon. Mutant biochemicals oozed out of the wound engulfing its entire body, reversing fur and skin; rinse and repeat. 
	Her bones were clacking and contorting inside her body, making cruel snapping noises as it grew. A second set of webbed arms emerged from her sides, protruding like revolting bushes of thorns. It's teeth became more independently saw-like snowflakes in endless fractals. The Beast that called herself the Big Menace, quadrupled in size and screamed like Godzilla, whispering to the Three to come out or be taken out. Her tits were huge.
	Nothing happened.
	Big Menace made a fist with four misshapen hands and slammed it down on the roof, leaving nothing but toothpicks. The Three escaped at the uttermost last second and were separated in an isosceles triangle.
	They slipped and flopped in the rain slop, quibbling at each other, nothing heard over the commotion of the rain and the Beast's wheezing and farting.
	The short one floated high in half a second, glowing electric, but was instantly swatted away hard into a tree (while pointing at her four breasts), splintering the Ent-like shape and collapsing onto the hero. The Big Menace reached for the one who took one of her good eyes out. The muscular Lion Tamer did everything he could to slow her down: the whip flipped gracefully around one of the Beast's wrists, followed by a spectacular tug. The Big Menace didn't budge. Instead, it gripped the whip with her free hands and threw the Lion Tamer against the landscape once, twice, thrice, frice, double frice, nine times, each landing more awkward and worse than the next. The broad body of the Lion Tamer went limp and rolled over like skin vacant of muscle and bone when the she-bitch pounced on him and waylaid him with hundreds of unyielding punches to the back of the head. 
	The last of the Three, the Bag-Head, stood arms crossed, silent in anticipation, glaring fearlessly at the tormenting shape slowly limping towards him out of breath, wheezing. 
	There was no lightning or thunder, just thudding rain. 
	The Bag-Head took one last look at his fallen comrades; an imploded tree, a rag-doll resembling the LionTamer hunched over a log. He wasn't going to make any noise. He wanted his death to be quick and clean. Staring into the countless rows of Jurassic shark chompers in the gargantuan mouth, he judged it would not be peaceful enough.
	The Big Menace squeezed the Bag-Head with a deadly pressure, tight enough not to breathe, but not tight enough to doze off. All became dim, the venomous jaw opened wider and wider and wider. It smelled like sour diarrhea farts. The Bag-Head closed his hidden eyes and saw a light flashing his life before him, though all he could remember before the Power of Pi were images from an unsolvable puzzle. Even though all the pieces were there--
	Then it seemed the hand had completely let him go.
	He was flying?but not like a balloon?falling. 
	 crash --baboom -- baboom-- cold and wet - boom- rain--- mud-- baboom---  rain---- baboom un stab le   vi bra tions -- baboom -- face sloshing in mud- bubbles ---skin of Earth ---
	This was finally the moment when Bag-Head realized why it needs his protection. 
	He swore he would, not long ago. He didn't think he could.
	A different set of hands embraced him, gentle and warm and strong, Mother Nature's American Lover, the Lion Tamer. Completely unfazed now, seemingly brighter than ever. They exchanged no words, but spoke indefinably. The Big Menace was focused on their caped compadre, The Blanketeer; his portrait riding the lightning burned into the air molecules, flying in incomprehensible circles around the Beast, tired and dizzy, and Big-Sloppy.
	Bag-Head and the Lion Tamer ran off in separate directions. The Earth quaked following every step of the Lion Tamer's way. He flung himself in the air, throwing a diamond cutter shoulder into the flexed knee of the Giant Catastrophe. A broken bloody bone covered in ripped strands of flesh jutted out of her soaked black fur. The Wolf yelped in an orgasm of agony as it was festered with silent lightning. Its fur ignited ablaze from the excruciating heat, equal to the sun's surface. The Bag-Head threw a bag over Big Menace's face, suffocating her. It stumbled. It was time. 
	Drop the bomb and go home. Whip it out and put it in. Either you kill this motherfucker now or we wake up in the 13th realm of hell where everyone laughs at you because you're a coward of your own morals. It was time to fuck up shit.
	As if it were from a championship series winning playbook, the Blanketeer flashed over to the Lion Tamer who swung him around in a full circle at speeds of which the eye cannot see, winding up for the hardest and most dangerous pitch ever released. The Bag-Head, still stood across the way, silently, clenching his illuminating bag, then slowly opening it for a catcher's mitt bull's-eye. He fingered a sign. To look upon the gaze of the Bag was terrible?But the LionTamer knew no fear at that moment.
	(Screwball? No??alright?The Heater, that's what I want. That's what I need)  
	The Blanketeer made a noise cheap party-spinners produce right before they break. Released from the strong but gentle grip of the LionTamer, he screamed with lightning coming out every orifice with unfathomable momentum and combusted against The Big Menace.
	Carefully aiming his satchel, he opened a gateway to a dimension where the only truth and justice that stands is Pi. And the Menace was pushed into it with such force that she should have died three hundred and fourteen times. The Bag happily took her in, where her tale will end as eternity in pain and distortion. 
	The storm ceased as the Wolf Witch left our so-called physical dimension. Anyone who tried to fight Mother Nature's fury died, and many more would, if something drastic didn't happen in the next few minutes. San Tropez: Trendy Town USA, the city in peril, the city underwater.

	Josh wept solemnly on a slanted gray rock, drenched and half-drowned. His beautiful city, his life, his job, his friends that he never had, that fan-girl from his blog he never got to meet, What was her name? His Mother!-dead and gone. Everything would succumb to the flood. What would be the point of life? How could he ever go on after a piece of shit like this?
	His ethrapad-camera caught an awkward sideways view of a pajama clad lightning bolt next to a flannelled man parachuting himself across the night like Mary Poppins, but instead of holding an umbrella, he held a larger than life plastic bag. 
	Josh scrambled to his feet and adjusted his muddy self-cleaning goggles. His jaw said "What?" Then a very, very, very, very, very broad man slightly nudged him, knocking Josh several feet back in the mud.
	"Oh Pi unfortunate! Do please forgive my ridiculous girthness," the Lion Tamer said and lifted Josh to his feet without effort, fighting gazes between Josh and his city underwater. "How doth ye fair lad? Are ye hurts? Oh dear, I ask forgiveness, I say twice, but haste is all I know thus far." The hero paused and stepped back with a smile, "Why! My heavens and Pi! Thou art thy reporter Josh Turkey! HAHAH, an episode is never missed! Well, by my chums and I that is. Tis pleas'est acquaintance with thine! Thou must depart! Tootaloo! Farewell! Ta Ta! Later!" He winked and tipped his hat and erupted a mile off like a jackhammer. 
"Later?" Josh said and fainted onto a patch of flowers that grew in the footsteps of the Lion Tamer in the frame of his camera that was barely recording.

	Every Outernet broadcast reports the same thing: "Flash-flood eliminated by new Deadsy Aqueducts, flowing into barren Iowa, Exeter saves us again!" Deadsy's levies are the wave of the future!
	The quality of the patching up seemed cartoonic on the side of San Tropez's finest buildings, even nicer than before, and buildings that received no damage but didn't look so nice were also repaired. Praise Deadsy and the church of Sentimentality! Deadsy heals all! Exeter for sainthood!
	None who lived the nightmare remember the strange young Trio who bore the Pi emblem. It was as if they had a near death experience during a dream and didn't know how they got there. But the dream is muddy black and you're sinking in it, watching your loved ones suffocate in the sickness, drown, and die the worst death imaginable to you. Your head is just above the darkness, and everyone you see is pale and green and from deathness. You're out of breath and want to go to sleep because the pain is too much. There is too much of too much and it weighs you down to nothing. Nothing: the only thing that travels faster than light.
	But when your last taste of air escapes you, angels embrace your arms and save you from the muddy muddness, in an ancient and most sacred reverse baptism. 
That is, until you realize the angels were actually immature boys in pajamas. This can't be real?Or is it?
	
	& now the city will have to turn again to Exeter to save them. Save them all from the inevitable. He would clasp their souls like a fat spoiled child, and when they'd least expect, pull the blanky right out under their stupid asses.
All the channels say the same thing, but if you're up late, you'll see Josh's got something else to tell. He says the flood's destruction only hurt the Bowery. Those who live in the segregated Ivory neighborhoods barely saw the water and mud. 
He features a new segment, Pi Quest, containing all his salvable footage from the flood that happened only a year ago.
	Many in the Bowery were suddenly introduced to homelessness and were now frightened of the terrorists that blew up the levy, whom Exeter called, "The Three."              


June 13

           "In the wake of destruction, we shall build a new future."
                      Peter Exeter V
   	
I've spent my birthless existence in the pursuit of a single goal: control. 
Once I wanted to know nothing but the superiority of tyrannizing those inferior to me, wasting eons in puerile pursuits, always, always to be thwarted by Them, by It. The consequential remainder of creation? Pi. 
	I convinced myself the only ones to suffer are the inferior, but this is not true; suffering is man-made; an ornate art form: The top feeds off the bottom. Defenseless prey. Fingers pointing at the opposite's face; all wrong.
	I am God. You are blind and you are mine. Love me. Hate me. I am All.
	People are easily misguided. Doesn't take much. Failure comes across the board. Teeth get knocked out, but gold replaces the old. Humans taught me that. Teaching an omnipotent being? I couldn't be more grateful.
	In the googolplexennia's past, a true goal could not be painted. Time stacks the pieces, shades the colors; depth and perception, fusion of hue, the focal point of everything. Learn to accept; adapt, behave. I trace the outline, you fill in the gaps, You are mine?
	
If you want control, you must speak with all languages simultaneously: music. The tongue of song is the true weapon of mass destruction; able to evoke emotion from meaningless sounds. They will follow you all over the world and sing the rhyming words you've written, buy any garbage with your face or name on it. They cry when they meet you and read metaphysically into your compositions. They will hang themselves with your anthem blaring. They call it love.
	I had you before you could speak. You could hear though. And you heard everything I've ever told you, and you've done all that I set you out to do, for each brick conforms to the bigger pyramid.
	Though I revel in all your suffering, I must relieve you of such sufferings in order to witness the suffering of the Great Oppressors. It will prove a fair compromise.
  	There are too many ways to wield a single soul; it becomes vacillating.
	Tyranny causes uprising, but through Capitalism and democracy Money Money Money   Money Money Money Money = Blind support; men who can do no wrong.
	If all you hear is me, then you are deaf as well. Deal with it. 
	You've lived more comfortably than anyone in history ever has. You have no room to talk, and my voice is yours. You are muted. Go back to the Outernet, it's safer there. You don't have to be you, and that's the person you're afraid of the most. The face behind the reflection. 
	Is it true? The face behind the mirror? Are you the real you? Or are you the you you are pretending to be?
	The only identity people have now is: lost. 
Come to me, I am your shepherd; I will protect you from what you don't know and don't want to understand. 
	Give me everything, and together we shall sleep and your dreams will plunge farther away.
	Hell, my widespread fear and panic can wait, the people are too afraid of their own lives to see the charade before them. Not only does this bring me great joy in your terror, but the entire world will pour treasure at my feet as I vow to remove the evils I impregnated. You space apes that put value in money and labels? what if I shut off the world? The Earth stops spinning. What is your label for that? 
	A label for death is juxtaposition. A warning for death is entertainment.
    	Nothing is to be done before I remove the great lie and gain the ends to which I seek: the complete peremptoriness subjugation of the Multiverses. The Three, the ones forever in time who truly have been my only contention, will eliminate themselves. 
	This is my moment.
    	Yes, save San Tropez from the flood, because now, it's mine. The city doesn't believe words of picaroon Cracker Factory workers. They will be marginalized as revolutionary madmen in their daily lives, and I will defame them as The Three; the cause of all great destruction and the only inhibitor of progress. The world will turn against them, and with their backs to Them, their eyes will be fixed upon me.

 	The king of the world stands from his throne; his perfectly tailored Armani suit glowing royal blue under his agelessly chiseled supermodel face. The panes of the windows shake from the roar outside. He sees the sun will be its brightest in its daily cycle and walks toward the window and slowly opens the door leading out to the balcony. As the door opens the room breathes deep the world outside and fills itself with warm summer air. A wave of noise levitates the silence that once was the room, and the sun quickly rains a spotlight against Exeter's triumphantly beautiful blonde hair and ever changing hazel eyes. 
	As he walks out onto the balcony with a white sheen smile, a massive sea of the people below ripple and bob like the ocean. People move as a single entity, flowing forward, up, down and around. Banners projecting holograms to every conceivable eye with labels and signs praising their infallible leader. Long live the King! Free round of beer with purchase of 2 or more nacho plates!!! Only@Hekktors 
	Exeter cared not for the excitement, only the inner taste of hatred. Of the entire crowd, he could not tear his gaze from three men whose movements didn't agree with the rest. Their mouths silent, eyes fixed in furrowed concentration. 
    	Taking his hands from the rail and raising them in a gesture of silence, the crowd obedient;
   	"My dear people of San Tropez! Brothers, sisters, cousins, and uncles-- We are strong, are we not, United? We, who've faced utter devastation by the wrath of ungodly forces. We stand together. Proud, yet fearful of what the future has in store. I know the image of the Flood is deeply etched into all your minds; perhaps, it always will be. We will never forget it." 
    	The people howled elated praise and sung his name, 'Dancing for Deadsy!'
    	"Our city was once a thriving metropolis. Not one of us knew want of anything, and every man helped his brother. Our pockets and bellies were full, and the mind only hungered for new advances in education, technology, art and science, the key essentials necessary for societal happiness and growth. Our future was bright and no cloud could blanket our skies.
 	"But then the shadow came, in the form of Three; Men of unimaginable power, as an evil invisible entity, flying from the sky and crashing into our fair city's levee. With their arrival our city was destroyed by The Great Flood, and our whole history and future almost completely erased.
    	"But thanks to the Deadsy Corporation, we've turned our devastation from a flicker to the potential beam our tomorrows hold. And now we must move into the light, and fill it with our own.
    	"In the light, we will find happiness. 
	"Never have I seen a man suffer like I did the day the dam broke. Never have I seen such sadness as on the faces of the people's whose lives were leveled with their homes. Never have I seen a better opportunity to seize the day and begin a new, than the day Deadsy came and saved us all from despair.
   	"Deadsy rebuilt our dam. Deadsy rebuilt our homes. Deadsy rebuilt our Yesterdays, and Deadsy will be the light that will build our Tomorrows. We will stop the wars. We will heal the injured. We will feed the hungry. We can, and we will stop the evil.
    	"Put your faith in Deadsy. Put your faith in the light.
   	"Into the light is the only way out of the dark. Enter the light with me.
   	"The only place to hide from shadow is in the light. Enter the light with me.
   	"The truth is the light...Enter into the light with me.
    	"Our futures are in the light...WON'T YOU ENTER THE LIGHT WITH ME!?"
   	 The crowd lost all control. Never has a sound shook the ground like the sound that shook the ground of San Tropez that day. All sucked his lies and noshed his poison. They could not see the skull and crossbones next to the label under the fine print.  
    	"Today is our beginning, and I couldn't be more proud to share it with all of you!"
    	The people cheered vibrantly, but quieted to hear Exeter. He began slow and calm, but his staged excitement rose with every word until his fanatical zeal showed a visceral flicker. "It gives me tremendous happiness and courage to see you all now, enjoyed together; inviolable as a single unit. If only you could see what I see, you would know the intense warmth that fills my heart at this moment." Saying so made his ears bleed.
   	"With your help, Deadsy, and I, will grant us passage to our brightest futures. Yesterday is gone. We must live today, by preparing for tomorrow. The world will remember today, and remember us. We are United. We are SAN TROPEZ! WE ARE DEADSY! IN THE WAKE OF DESTRUCTION, WE SHALL BUILD A NEW FUTURE!!!"
	
	"When God made you, Darling, he made you just for me, doo-bee-doo-bee-do"
			-"Cat Calls," Deadsy and the Gang, It's a Sentimental Christmas!

	Dusk settled on the most distant horizon of San Tropez. Streets were stewed curb to curb with a ridiculously gay procession; sweet perfection tinting the hearts of each and every citizen like the radiance of fresh spring light on a tin roof. 
	You know the sort of hide-and-go-seek feeling: clad in short short pants, counting to ten in the raw dark of the back yard; peeking through fingers just enough to feel the excitement of it all, watching the ankles of hiding prey scatter to their hideaways. 
	This was the way they strolled carelessly down the street, swarms of the aspiring lot, squinting into the pinpointed but dwindling sun. 
Squeezing through the middle of the marching crowd wound white and blue cruisers marked pX in giant letters across the hoods. Along the doors : Department of Sentimentalites, Deadsy Inc. They brushed against peoples sides, bumped their knees away. The crowd moved for them, barley noticing their presence. On top of the cars, large blue and white megaphones were mounted, twirling like pinwheels, piping an old stringedly senile yet delightfully orchestrated swinging number, slightly below the crooning of what sounded like Bette DeMillle, channeling the voice of lovely Aphrodite. Folks mingled in their step below this, creating a general hum of excitement. Everyone was gay, at least, almost everyone.

[These be the queerest days that Time and Pi hath ever seen] the Lion Tamer reflected.
<Did you see the faces of all the folk? Did you see how false bleeding overwhelmed them?> The Blanketeer whispered through the Plane of Pi.
(Yes, their smiles were like cellophane) Bag Head answered, always without tone.
		[Their eyes like rock candy]
			<Sphincters of excrement>
The Three spoke thus as they floated. The Three with inalterable brand beneath hood garbed peasant cloak. The brand roasted their bare chests like pig iron: the timeless visage, infinity and forever: Pi. It glowed, hidden, slunking through the crowd of ecstatically oblivious citizens, born and bred under the banner of Exeter.
(They glutton all flavors of his poison? Its deep in them now)
A large billboard read: pX The Light of the Future is in You pX Church of the Sentimentalites, Deadsy, Inc. Buy a 12 pack of Beerweiser get another Free!
	(Damned regurgitated images of the 'glory' yesterdays, Sentimentalites, bah!)
<And Christmas every month? All weepy eyes glued to the Outernet laser show>
	[Yesterday's filth!]
		(True believers hide, for the safety of kin)
	[Indeed, but for how long?]
<How long before they all crumble like cheesecake?>
	
	LaLa-LaLa 
	LaLa-LaLazer "Death Comes in Threes, Won't You Enter the Light: pX Brought to you by the Dept. of SentiMentalites, Deadsy, Inc. *Free 6-pack of condoms w/purchase of 3p Vodka!"   	
	LaLa-LaLazer
	LaLa-LaLazer Lazer!

<We ruin ourselves in idleness>
(Patience, brother, gears are set, dominoes stacked, all we need do is timber the right one)
	<And how who what where, pray-tell>
[Quiet your Fire, patience now and Pi, tissn't safe, even without words, the ways of Deadsy are cunning and deeper than Hell, the SentiMentalizers could be listening with microtransmuphyl probes]

Josh jeeringly saw another crowd of Neon fluorescent Outernet Ravers party all up and down the street, as if pretending to be cool was as easy as acting like a drunk asshole. He watched stultified from the 7th story apartment his mom let him live at, with her. The kids were rolling pretty hard. Josh zoomed his camera towards them, scanning for any kind of newsworthiness, but they were just dancing and grinding to the heavy virtual-reality bass beats, enraptured. They believe every word they just heard. They're glowing with it. 
The Deadsy cruiser blaring the subconscious brainwashing-tune waltzing down the street came to a crescendo and the people laughed and hopped and honed in proportion to it. They will be the death of me?
"Josh dear, Josh, dear? Can you hand me my sewing shears?" His mother asked in a condescendingly manipulative fashion.
Physically snapping out of his trance, he turned drudgedly, picked the shears from top of the television and handed them to his easy-chair seated mother without looking at her at all. I can't let her know I didn't get the promotion. Maybe I could tell her I got the job?but then she'll want me to move out.
The heat from outside led him to his closet for a new shirt, when his attention drew him suddenly into a hidden Tupperware box under his bed. The only thing on his wall was a portrait of William Randolph Hearst, his idol. After the Lion Tamer picked him up, something changed within him. He became obsessed, driven beyond madness: proof of the strangest thing that ever happened to him, and he couldn't explain it whatsoever. Though, he tried to share this crazy, nearly inarticulate experience with the world, but failed. Now he was officially labeled a 'coot.' No one would ever believe him. 
Why did I come in here? All sound from the world faded into a partial silence of vibrations, and it seemed to Josh the Tupperware was sparkling, shimmering twinkles from intergalactic wind chimes, rustling. Then everything flickered a dazzling sound that blended all--
But then reality came back. It was normal, dull, and boring, yet frightening all the same. The Outernet program his mom was watching was turned up to maximum volume. The broadcast was called "Love Date Pop-Star!" where a series of contestants answer questions aloud regarding their sexual history and darkest unmentionable secrets. The reward for the victor is a mediocre BJ from one of the many washed up douchebags (the grand prize being the publishing of a sex tape). It would never be described as having quality & gave Josh a bad taste in his mouth. 
A new ballad; just as waltzy, cheesy and horrifying started again from the patrol cars on the street.
"Oh, don't you just love this song Jo?" His mother said. She was wrinkly and smiled often, even though the wrinkles made it look like she was angry all the time.
The song was bland and uncreative. A soulless toddler with no artistic ability could have come up with a more imaginative chorus than "Happytime! Happytime! I'm so happy it's Happytime!" He hated it, but he said, "Sure mom, it's jolly."
"Reminds me of great Grandpa Joer, he used to take us for sleigh rides every first snow of the year. He had a lovely gray mare named Bobtail, just the sweetest horse you ever did see! He used to let me brush her before and after we'd go sleigh riding, singing and jingling all the way-- Just the loveliest horse! I remember us laughing and laughing?ha-ha-ha?Oh, what fun it was!" 
Josh was caught in between the waltz droning and the old lady reminiscing, and couldn't help but feel uneasy. He fingered his goatee. For a year straight he went over and over the video from the Night of the Flood before bed-time. Carefully combing every formulated pixel for a goddamn sign until he felt his eyes would fizzle and pop out.
Hazy gray, splintered flashes, dark figures silhouette a skeptical horizon, himself checking the lens, cleaning it off, sloshing hair out of his eyes under the heavy rain, the figures closer, silhouetted in another, closer, burst of weather, the dark shape of the Lion Tamer and muffled voice, heavy breathing and wind, then a burst of light as the camera shorted out, fizzling loudly. Static. He fell asleep every time by the end.
It happened, Josh. Those guys were real. You even touched one, you smelled him! Remember, he smelled like molasses? He laughed to himself. Don't you think colors are brighter now? He put the video on again. It never got old; timeless. It gave him chills. But there's not a god damn person who will believe me. They'll just call me crazy. I don't want that sleaze Kirtcheimer to have anything over me, ever again. 
His mom had been talking the entire time, and basically saying the same thing over and over: "Every Christmas he would bridle up the horse, go into town, and come back with the holiday Beerweiser ale? The sleigh bells ringing--- lovely," she trailed off. Josh worked his chin more hysterically.
"Oh, that reminds me Josh dear; would you give me a ride to the Temple tomorrow? I don't want to miss the Flood Day remembrance ceremony. 
"Do you know what day of the week Christmas is this month, I always forget, is it the 21st?"
Josh sighed thinking of the offensively simple fact that nearly everyone was a Sentimentalite now. After the Flood they swelled in numbers: the keepers of the old ways; the condemners of The Unholy Three. With the Great Carlton Megaladon, who began preaching the word after the breakdown of the Congress, and after the wake of the flood, rising to prominence in the Deadsy Corporation. Megaladon converted thousands every day, until it eventually became the official religion of San Tropez. He who first invented the Sentimentalites; the Senti-Mental-lizer guards and their Senti-Mental-Lasers, instructing, keeping them in line: Monsignor Carlton Megaladon, Holy Keeper of the Light, who answered only to Exeter himself. Josh could hardly believe how mercurial it happened. 
"Yeah Mom, I'll give ya a ride." Josh shuddered thinking of The Temple and the Lasers. "And Christmas is on the 23rd in June.?the 21st in July." 
Everything happens so quickly. Reality gets ahead of itself. What is the speed of time? Maybe there's an equation--
He turned back and forth from the dwindling streets of ecstatic citizens to his telescreen and the video of his flood footage; the only proof of memory.
Out in the heavier developing dusk-light of June, the citizens of St. Tropez passed stolid chocolate smothered smiles stretched across greasy glossy eyed faces. Children waving flags, clicking heels, confetti falling thicker than a snow storm fills the gutters, sewer drains, and butt cracks of the homeless.
Old women crying the beauty of the speech they just heard: hope! hope at last had come to St. Tropez! & in their steel ribbed hearts echoed the prayer of imagined jubilee, thanksgiving prayers to the Savior Leader! 

	3.1415
	The first job on Kylia's daily work-order read 'Computer Maintenance: Gomez! Cracker Factory Trailer House.' She thought the description was vague compared to most memos. Usually, she had a chart of diagnostics and tools required for the service, but this listed nothing. She instinctively knew whatever the problem was, wouldn't be a problem for her. 
	Today was the same day for the past 4 years. She was ready for something new, but she didn't know it yet?
Sometimes, when you think nothing significant will happen is when the most monumental changes in life occur. Well, this is true; for Kylia.
	For 3.14 seconds she buzzed the doorbell. Her holowatch read 8:13 AM displaying on her wrist, then disappeared as she looked away. She stupidly squinted straight into the sun. She made a wish. Star so bright, I wish I might?
	The door swung open with slithering speed. Behind the door sprung a short long haired dude. As fast as he leapt outside he collapsed oddly onto the floor. Bemusedly unconcerned, Kylia approached, and in a squally timid voice, "Uh- Mister, Mr. Gomez? Are you, like, ok?" Kylia nudged the dude's face with her sandal. The dude seized Kylia and flipped her on her round fat back. 
	"Who the fuck are you!? Who the fuck sent you!" He spit in a red hoarse tone, laying on top of her.
	"My name's Kylia, I'm--I'm here to fix your computer." She was surprised how calm she sounded.
	The dude loosened his red pimply face, turned left to right several times without moving his neck, waiting for the right buttons in his head to click, then gingerly began laughing uncontrollably. His breath smelled like blowhole. "HAHAHA!" He laughed and laughed some more, coughing, but didn't get off her.
	Kylia studied with her bright blue eyes, magnified by huge fat glasses, through the dude on top of her into her repressed memories. Why do I feel so safe here? Am I really that lonely?
	"I think I'll get up off you now," he helped her to her feet and dusted her chest and straightened her tie. "I'm Drew, let me show you in." Kylia realized Drew was only wearing boxers and one green and one yellow striped tube sock. 
	He led her down the hallway in a fashion of a possessed madman. She found it charming. The stairs creaked. "What kinda name is Kylia anyway?"
	"My mom was Polish."
	"Hah, yeah right," Drew snorted.
	When she got in the room she saw two bodies piled on top of each other on a couch way too small for either of them. Piles and piles of cardboard pizza boxes and empty beer cans scattered round the floor like abused and remorseful bowling pins. An old TV with a clothes hanger antenna squawked a fuzzy, in-and-out fashion. "Sweet Pad!" Kylia pushed up on the enormous black frames that gave her sight. "You guys actually live here?" A mouse ran into a hole in the wall followed by an autistic rat.
	"We try? Mr. Gomez lets us squat here til we find our own place. We've been squattin for awhile." Drew replied automatically, laughing, throwing some pizza crust off the keyboard. After he realized what he'd done, he picked it back up and ate it. "Here's the PC. Something happened when I was on the Outernet. It like? froze up, or something."
	"Uh huh?" She plugged a cable in the front of the alpha-drive.
	"I don't know," he said, beginning to groom himself in a filthy mirror, "I just saw boobies bouncing and butts jiggling, so I clicked on it." Kylia blushed feeling awkward.
	"Yeah, you should never click on anything like that, but don't worry Drew, you're in the safest hands in San Tropez. Well technicolaggally speaking." She pulled out her ethrapad and signed in.
	Drew hugged her from behind and squeezed. Aberrantly he whispered, "Thank you Kylia, no one has ever said that to me before." He saw into her eyes, almost laughing at her glasses, then took them off her and saw them truly. Kylia was confused in her blindness and couldn't see Drew smiling at her. "Sorry," he said, ebbing into the bathroom and turning on the shower. He took off his boxers and socks and began masturbating thinking of Kylia's eyes.
	"Ah, hmmmm?" She inordinately noised to herself. But Kylia already passed the virus' firewall and was beginning to swiftly decompose it. She checked her teleprobe; no missed calls or messages. "Surprise surprise," she said, somehow waking the other two. 
The two bodies on the couch rolled off each other and said many incoherent things without addressing her, but she regarded Drew's two roommates exchanging in conversation by looking at each other. They observed the television and cranked the volume. The hypnotizing vernacular prattle of Carlton Megaladon was easily recognized. 
Kylia shuddered finishing the scan and rebooted the computer. In what seemed like an instant, she was already updating her profile and checking her dwindling bank account. Kylia was surfing and blogging so deep, she forgot she was on the clock.
	"Umm, excuse me," a casual voice stated from behind her. She flipped quickly but only somewhat alarmed. They were tall, and both were wearing tee shirts that were way too small for them. The one with red sleep ridden curly hair was speaking, "Aren't you, uh, supposed to fix that thing, and not, well, whatever yer doing?"
	"It is fixed," she scoffed. "Can't you see that?" 
	The two tall guys continued the exchange of nonverbal communication without sign language or facial expression.
	"The only thing I can see is that you have 0 unread messages and 12 back to back posts on Josh Turkey's latest stream," the other said, lighting up a broken cigarette. "But wait - this looks different?" The cig squinted closer at the bright screen.
	"Yeah, well, he hasn't sent me anything back, he always does, right away."
	"I wouldn't worry bout him," curly-hair said. 
"What did you do to the server? This looks like the internet?You just put the internet on our computer, that's illegal!"
	Kylia made a face at the cute one. "Come on, you don't like the hook-up bro?" They looked at each other somewhat stupidly. "It's not traceable. I put a scrambler over your signal," she bragged. The two waited for her to go on. "Trust me, you want the internet. It's completely uncensored; it doesn't use nearly as much energy. Plus it's bigger, faster-"
	"We know what it is, but no one uses it anymore. It's all 0uternet now."
	"Alright, alright, you can uninstall it if you want. I just thought, well-never mind."
Kylia shook her head and blew a gum bubble big as a basketball, then sucked it back in like it was a party trick. "Sooo, you've probably seen this video, right? It's from Josh's flood coverage. There is this really funny/bad bit he does over and over on his web-cast the past couple episodes. Personally, I think it's just to boost ratings." She played the video, finally with their undivided attention.
	"Pi and Christ alike-this is new?How didn't we know about this?"
	"Yeah, yeah, it's shopped up pretty good, I'll give him that, but still, the camera kinda cuts out at times where it only would in a lame sci-fi movie. Jeeze, whenever he responds to me, I'm totally gonna comment on his blog in a sarcastic confrontational tone, that's for sure!" She held out a palm waiting for it to be slapped, but they both just stared at it. She kept smiling, not knowing what else to say. "So, you guys going to the speech?" They kept staring at her silently, and then things got weird.
	 The smoker fell over and hit his head onto the computer monitor but then gained his composure so quickly that Kylia had no time to say "!" 
	It was the Cosmic Lie: the deadliest attack onto which the soul can take. It molested the Three differently from brother to brother. 
	The dude was still holding the pathetic cigarette on his tongue. He rubbed his temple anticlockwise and closed his eyes to concentrate. Sweat beaded cold and hot on his ass. His clothes felt way too tight and itchy. The roof of his mouth went coarse. He heard Drew make a terrible gagging cry in the bathtub. Zach tried to steady his dizziness and put a hand on Kylia's round shoulder. "Thanks Kylia, but I'm afraid if yer done with yer work, I'm gonna have to ask you to vacate the premisessssss."
	"Huh? Wha- wait! How'd you know my name?!"
	"Cuz I'm the smartest guy on earth," he laughed, looking at her nametag. "This should cover it. But please, you gotta get the fuck out. Now."
	Kylia saw the young man gave her a $128 dollar tip. Words bubbled in her mouth and then she said "PLEASE JUST TAKE MY CARD!!!!" Just before Kyla wiggled out the door, she magically slipped her business card twixt Zach's hand. 
	"ZACH! What the hell is going on?" Nic nearly screamed falling to a knee, clutching Zach's forearm. 
	"AHH, shit! I dunno but I got one hell of a headache?Wait? Kylia? Her name is Kylia? That's a horrible name! God awful! Not even a Polish person would be named that!"
	"Fuck that shit! My dick is vibrating! Furiously!" Nic screamed. Zach saw his pants. Truth be told. "I can't have my junk behaving this way!"
	"No, I suppose you can't. But--"
	"Wait, do you hear that?" They both looked at the ceiling, as if this somehow helped ear drums pick up vibrations clearly. 
	"Yeah, I hear?something..."
	"Sounds like a million locusts swarming during harvest." Ba-boom.
	Drew interrupted into the room with a towel around his sexy parts. "Is that a figment of my imagination or do we have a cicada infestation?"
	"Everything is a figment of your imagination."
"What the hell's on your lips? Is that-- blood?" Zach asked with a revolted wince. Drew wiped his face
	"Yeah, I have those nasty fuckin hiccups again. Hey, where'd the geek chick go? I was totally gonna get some tang!"
	"HA!" Nic scratched his dong and adjusted his vibrating pants.
	"Since when are you hiccupping blood?"
	"I dunno. Hmm, I guess that is weird, now that I think about it." Drew noticed Nic's violently shaking trousers. "Holy shit Nic! Your Cock!"
	"It's ok. It freaked me out a few seconds ago, but it feels?just fine."
	"Weird." Drew puked out another spasm of unnaturally dark, chunky blood. "Fuck, that fucking hurt!" It splattered all over the computer. "I don't remember eating spinach?"
	"I forgot the unveiling of the Cathedral is this morning. There's to be a speech about the flood, and everything." Zach mentioned, studying Kylia's card.
	"Holy Pi!" 
	"Well, we decided we should be there." Nic ate a piece of cold pizza.
	"No, fuck that. Too risky."
"Aren't walks supposed to be refreshing or some shit?" Drew said, just before another slosh of red on-hit the floor.
	"No, that's retarded," Zach said. "It's not safe. And it's hot." He lifted up a couch cushion and found three cigarettes and lit another. "There's other things we can be doing."
	"Like getting drunk?"
	"You know what I meant."
"Hey man, I could dig a walk." Drew choked then swallowed then inadvertently kicked the TV screen in on itself, sending it back to whence it came. Not to China where it was manufactured, but metaphorically, into a bunch of smaller pieces, that when assembled correctly, became one of the greatest and most wonderful inventions to help further the benefits for humans to thrive. Or, total whack-off bullshit.
	Zach stared at the blood gracefully venting out of Drew's mouth in a slow motion ballerina fountain, spreading like an obscene Rorschach on the floor. "Yeah," Nic said, "Let's get some fresh air."
	They left the Gomez! Cracker Factory and walked in the direction of downtown. They wore their brown work uniforms.
It had been awhile since they had been themselves. Literally.
	Across the street the bank thermometer read 101. Drew bought a stick of gum from his favorite hippie-run Apothecary, but stole anti-depressants, anti-anxiety, anti-pain, anti-insomnia, anti-acne, anti-oxidant, anti-dust mite, anti-pollen, anti-bowel, anti-dander, anti-cold (day and nighttime) anti-fat, anti-age, anti-death, anti-forever. All natural. All that crap. All at once. All the time. He would be back before the end of the week. 
	Zach fingered a display-menu of young Tropez women called BTTA (*Free with purchase of two or more cartons of cigarettes, 'Cancerous odour is the new tasty!' smoke Deadsy)
These ads for the voluptuous women were particularly coated in brainwash. 'Woman seeking man: Call Pundara.' That's the stupidest made up name I've ever heard. Sup with chicks having dumbass names? The girl in the picture was a babe, maybe a fake one, but it didn't matter, and he would call later to get his walnutts off. "Buy one, get one free?hmmm."
	The last girl was a train wreck. Unbearable. But under Pundara's picture she 'Guaranteed fun!'
	Nic sat on a curb outside, watching girls walk by to see if they noticed his vibrating penis. They didn't. 
Thank Pi for she is kind and gentle-- for the most part, because the Three needed her help, as much as she could spare.
	As time drew to 10 AM, the boys were in a staggering daze; temporarily holding in their symptoms as much as humanly possible, to not draw any eye. 
	It was strange to feel pain again. After being in the other bodies for so long, they forgot about things like pain and taste and sex. This body craved those frivolously distractional pleasures. 
	Zach's head pounded with his rising pulse. Drew swallowed a large goop of discolored red that came from within him. Nic smiled with a steady groove to his strut nodding at girlies on the way. 
	The crowd was possessed by the lies of Deadsy and Sentimentality. They were all mad from fake reverence. Screaming at the top of their lungs words they didn't understand, or could pronounce correctly. Twirling around shaking batons and wind catchers, singing along with the assault of catastrophic sounds that the Deadsy pop-culture branded Music, blared a clamoring bark out of forty-million speakers. 
A parade of floats and costumes and blow up balloons of all the Deadsy clan, even Dr. Nner. People were freaking in the street, tossing glow sticks and spherical black lights. A girl grabbed Nic by the arms and started dancing with him, and was soon joined by more girls, all dancing for Sentimentality, before he realized they had pulled him into a Sentimental-rave; a form of worship recently incorporated into the Sentimental Mass. There was obnoxiously loud music blaring too loud to even hear. Thick lasers of vibrant neon colors shot out in every which way through a synthetic fog. It was dark and black-light blue and everyone's teeth glowed. Nic couldn't escape their swoons. They were gorgeous and grinding against his vibrating penis and he wasn't in any particular hurry to get out of the way when Zach had managed to penetrate the field of Sentimental ravers and yell into Nic's ear. The music was still too loud. The bass had to have been the predominant instrument because all Nic could hear was [DUUUUUZZZZDDUUUUZZZZZDDUUUUUZZZZZDDDDUUUUZZZZZDDDUUUUUZZZZ] 
	But when they had rescued themselves back outside, it was no better. There were SWAT teams of Sentalmental-lizers carrying the sentimental-Lazers, shooting at the blander citizens only to be turned into unstoppable party animals. The lasers would hit a body, and that person would go into a trance of dancing and fanatical auto-tuned singing. Marching in enigmatic syncopation, a legion of blue Trench Coats, the simple Foot Soldiers of Deadsy, siphoning the crowd. Their image pathetically resembling Exeter, but truly not as beautiful. They moved like a corporate army; without deviation or creativity, and the conformity was hell!!!
Leading the way of attention, as the prologue of Exeter's entrance, they approached the Dark Blue Tower, the true power source to Exeter's Empire. The children of San Tropez had been asleep for years, and it was their destiny to fulfill the wishes of Exeter, whether they knew it or not. They ate dirt and said it was gold from Exeter himself. And they paid no attention to the blended Three, the 3 wearing Gomez! Cracker Factory uniforms, with their brown caps covering their pale baby faces and dark ringed eyes. 
	"Poor bastards. They might as well be dead. They're limbo zombie souls, slaving to the drone with the megaphone. To the commercials. To the music." Zach stated, hoping his brothers heard him. They did, and agreed with their faces low. But even shoes can be deceiving.
	The blast of fireworks exploding overhead only meant to distract the mind. You will always remember this. The drunken mass of San Tropians ogled and guffawed in disturbing and unpleasant ways, screaming as loud as they could at incomprehensible leaps of microtonal pitches right into the Three's ears, which just made them scream as well. Chaos from ear to ear and nothing in between.
Then, there was no such thing as light, or so it seemed, for in the middle of the day sunlight disappeared for a second without cloud to mask it. Just a second, before the star reappeared in our blue earthen sky. The Cosmic Lie took place of control and all of the people were unable to notice it, not even the Three.
Almost from nowhere, he appeared, shining like malevolence on every screen on every lamppost, buildings and sidewalks and billboards and shoelaces. It was more painful than a hanging. Peter Exeter the Fifth. 
	If I were to describe his smile, you would be dead. Especially if it were a big smile. But from that murderous smile, came the true torture: words.
 	"Citizens of San Tropez, I know you have been through hell and despair, but it gives me tremendous joy to see you now. Enjoyed together. Strong. As a single unit. If only you could see what I see, you would know the happiness that fills my heart at this moment?" he paused for the up roaring crowd. "We can, and we will build a new future, San Tropez! Come into the Light, with me. Won't you?"
	"Bastard?Liar?Filthy shit bag!" Zach spit through his teeth.
	"I can't take this shit," Drew yowled. Tears were fauceting out of the sides of his face. One of the Sentimental-Lazer's saw him crying and quickly shot a party laser at him, but instead of turning him to a party animal, it hit him hard and flung him back comically. He collapsed hard to the ground in a puddle of mud and brown water. The paraders and ravers laughed mockingly, but from an outsiders glance the mockers were but parody to themselves. "Pi save me!" Drew yelped.
	"Jesus Christ and Pi alike," Zach muttered, "I think he sees us." 
And then the Cosmic Lie had completely overtaken them. The Eye of Exeter exploded like a giant burning globe of fire before the Three, accelerating and laughing constantly. This, of course, did not take place in time, but in the Plane of Pi, but left the Three weary of thought and consciousness. But, as if nothing had happened, they were back in the crowd, moshing and partying with the drunkards of St. Tropez.
	"Yeah, I think he sees us too," whispered Nic, comically mordant, but also acknowledging the seriousness of the shittiness. "But he CAN'T see US, dig?"
	"Yeah, I'll dig for now, but this was a horrible idea. Why the hell did I think it would be ok to come here?" Tall Zach picked up tiny Drew, who had started muttering an incoherent language. He thought he deciphered something but--
	"There goes the last of the clean clothes," Nic said as Drew hurled out more blood covered spit. It got on his shirt and face. Zach pulled Drew tighter to him. Drew nodded his head to go on. Nic didn't move, worrying to himself he someday would become a zombie from failure. "This was a bad idea." 
	"Yeah. It was, and I said that over an hour ago." Zach spit, looking behind his shoulder nearly every step of the way away from the parade and the non-stop-party-drop-marathon. They took the mono-shuttle to Gramercy Park, practically the only safe place in town. For them, anyways.	
					***
	Nic went on a patrol every sunset, covering a few undiscovered miles further into Deadsy territory each night. 
Drew was always the first to pass out, and preferred to sleep undisturbed at their trailer near the Gomez! Cracker Factory. 
After a couple of drinks, Zach was having his goodnight cigarette when the groggy voice of  the 3's adopted father in Pi, the Fat Ninja, spoke seemingly out of nowhere. Zach instantly thought it was the voice of a mutant or some deformed creature speaking through the gutter, which he instinctively knew would harbor some terrible device. 
He dreamt the sewer came alive and ate all those inside it. Though he never knew why his brain envisioned a massive amount of people convening in the darkness and smelliness of a city's sewer. 
The hole to the underworld was dark like a cave, and the iron bars that protected it from intruders looked like a menacing mouth, ready to consume any particle that wished to roam within the grasp of its jaw.
	Their Father's words were always strange, but never foreign; " Zach of the Pi, aligned with the Bag-Head." It spoke with rusted vocal cords. 
The first time they met, Zach thought the voice came from inside his head, perhaps from the vault of Bag-Head, until it spoke again. "Fear nothing Zach. I knew your Pi before you were born into it, but I cannot reveal myself for both our safeties. Never. Ever-ever.
	"All my powers have left me, I'm afraid," he explained, "but I'm not dead yet! I cannot give you my name, but in my days of Pi, they called me 'Ninja' in a different tongue, but I am old and fat now. So if you must, call me; Fat Ninja." 
Zach heard the fatass laugh. 
That was all before the flood.
The Fat Ninja tossed a package out into the light, though the voice could have been from anywhere in the darkness. "My magnum opus: The Underground Railroad; hideout stations and quick sewer routes to anywhere in the city from a pivotal starting point. This hub of intricate tunnels will interconnect--" he went on. 
Zach specifically remembered Drew's first reaction; "The sewers? Come on man, I'd rather kill myself!"
	The voice grogged on as Zach regained focus, "If you want to take back the city, you must start at the bottom." As an ominous horn randomly blared across the sky, the Fat Ninja spooked off, and the sound of his groggy voice could be heard no more.
At the same time, Nic's figure breached the dimming horizon. He saw Zach standing quite bewilderedly near the gutter and hurried his pace. "Word from Fats Ninja?" he asked, breathing heavy but not short of breath. Zach didn't say anything, but Nic saw the small brown box haphazardly wrapped in duct tape and confiscated it from his brother's hands immediately, taking no time eviscerating the contents, bringing out a large folded envelope with the symbol of Pi awkwardly drawn.
	Zach quickly took it back from the grasp of Nic and slipped his fingers through the dense wad of paper until they felt something they liked and unfolded. "A map." There was a dark red line that pointedly made its way to a circle. "Kylia's." 
	"Kylia's? The Italian restaurant? Oh wait?The big blonde." Nic rolled his eyes at himself.
	Another green circle outlined the name 'Journalist' .
                                 ***
	@2:15 am, there was a scheduled power outage for one hour throughout the city whether you liked it or not. Most people did not, go figure.  
The stars were clear, as if he was in the middle of the ocean, kagillion miles away from light posts and STD's. You could count the UFO's scattering by?	
	"Joshua!" his mother's shrill voice cried through the apartment. "My knee is cramping, and I'm in the middle of my REMWorship-tube, would you fetch my thermopad for me puff ball?"
	Josh leaned outside the 7th story window targeting different areas of blackness, pointing his ethrapad camera with fully attached monstercock lens?. that just went fuzzy and shorted out. "Damn my positronics!"
	"What was that Jo dear?"
	"Ohh, nothing mother," He said and relaxed himself a moment. "I'll go grab your pad."
	"Oh may our Lord Exeter thank you darling honey child."
	"Mom," Josh said irritated. Did I just hear thunder?
	"Yes schnookums deary?" 
	"Ah, never mind." He gave her the ridiculous thing and went back to the window. The curtains were flapping. Then all of a sudden, all things electronic flared on brighter and louder than normal, like a power surge, but before Josh could react, it became dark and quiet again, and he almost noticed a whistle that sucked the energy dry from outside. Josh rushed over, peeking his head out curiously.
	"Josh, up here," a contented voice spoke above him.
	Josh startled-- "You! It's you!" He exclaimed in a compressed sensation of wonder. "You, the Pajama Man! The guy that can fly!" The boy caped crusader was floating in midair, smiling, his chest glowing.
	"Yes, being held aloft by the electrical force latent  in all things is one of the varied abilities the Power of Pi grants me." He said, floating closer. The yellow blanket tied about his neck was waving in a manner that did not match the wind outside, but his body remained near perfectly still with his short arms crossed across his chest. "But I will show you much and more. Can you palaver with me?"
	"Oh, yes, yes sir. Palaver I can!" Josh realized this boy in still-flight was almost half his own height. He also wondered how he got into his uniform; it was skin tight with no signs of wear or tear. It's fabric looked like an exorbitant towel.
	"JOSHUA!" Josh's mother cackled from her rocker. "Who are you talking to?"
	"No one, mom!"
	"You must be careful Josh; the road ahead is uncertain. Trust no one." The Blanketeer said.
	"Joooosh!?"
	"Not now mom!"
	"The Country Music Man cometh, bringing rancor and lies to our land." A queer flash of electricity sprinkled miniature lightning bolts down the hero's face.
	"C-M-M? HAAHAHAH-- You mean DirkShaw Riggins!? So what? Everyone knows he's coming. His first show in his home town in a decade. The Dead Dome Arena is completely sold out. His wife Madame Baby and the Heemadeema's are opening. Exeter's declaring it Country Music Day! It might be the biggest show in Rock and Roll history."
	"You take that back right now god damnit!" The Blanketeer said with a different, more human voice. Tiny green static bolts broke violently out towards Josh. One strand of a bolt went out and flicked him on the forehead. The Blanketeer shook his head and regained composure. "He is a warrior, well, a pet of Exeter's. 
"He is agent with Deadsy, who bought the world and own the Sentimentals who together have brainwashed nearly our entire planet. There will be no hope bringing back real consciousness for those who attend the concert."
	"I understand what you're suggesting?.A large protest and petition signing, I've been trying to organize a party of rag-tag--"
	"We're gonna kill him, Josh." The Blanketeer pointed his hand as a gun and made a click-baboom gesture, blowing out the metaphorical smoke.
	"Wha-wha-what?"
	"Joshua! Who are you speaking to? I am your mother and I demand an explanation!"
	"Mother, go to sleep!
	"You can't just kill a man!" Josh spit in confusion.
	"He's not a man. Neither is Exeter or anyone in the Deadsy clan."
	"What is he?" Josh was sweating. "What are you?" Josh gazed into the literally sparkling eyes of his strange new acquaintance. "Why are you telling me this, what am I supposed to do?" He asked fearfully.
	"Not to go into the concert of course, but if all works out, his giggin' days will be over anyway." He glanced around. "Josh, we need you to help us?"
	"Us?"
	"Yes Josh, the Three. We have been sent here by the Power of Pi to defeat Exeter, though we do not know yet how. But we do know we need your help, but-- again, your purpose is still unclear--"
"So what are you saying, you don't even know anything?"
"We know you have been chosen by the Power of Pi."
Josh did not understand.
"I swear to you, you will be under Pi's protection; our protection."
	Josh still had no idea of what to think or say, and neither did the Blanketeer, who revealed something from within a pocket of his cape, "Take this map. There's brief but precise directions; through the sewers." 
Josh took the envelope and began scaling the message. "Sewers?" 
The boy with the bright yellow blanket tied around his neck was flying higher into the sky soundlessly. "Don't give your hopes up. Stranger things have happened-- Stay awake, keep writing, taking pictures, don't eat the Crackers; be creative."
Turning from the city, the Blanketeer coiled his arm out, palm skyward, and with a thrust forward he cast a green lightning bolt. Before the bolt was out of range of sight and comprehension he seized the end of it and was thrown with the silent flash from the House of Turkey, leaving no trace but the singed hairs on Josh's now standing beard. Josh witnessed for a few seconds the imprint of the Blanketeer burnt through the air, just after his magnificent departure, slowly bluring away. "WOW!" His thoughts amplified over his mom's screaming.
Why me? Why anyone? What's going on in this city? Have things always been like this? Is everyone completely diluted to the truths that surround us every day? Josh's head weighed down out the window onto the hidden streets of piss and pain. Bare feet panned gold from the stagnant waters of a rich man's pocket, while gears, turned by billion year old death, coughed their memory onto the steel scaffold imprisoned life. How do the trees grow? They must've learned to change their ways, to adapt to their environment, become what their world was making them: live within these new, man manufactured conditions. He turned from the window and began again to question. Mom was throwing everything around her to try to get his attention without getting off her fat wrinkly ass.
Why have I been chosen? Does this boy really think I can do anything to help him? I can't handle this right now, I can't handle anything. My mother needs me, she needs...she needs...she needs her tea! Tea's cold mother? Ha, it already is cold, and it will only get colder. "Coming mom, some drunk needed the time," he said, a notebook under his arm, fastening a pen tween an ear. He left the room, but not before taking one more picture with his mind out the window that now seemed a gateway. "Be creative?" All of the lights turned back on.
The song of the kettle wafted over the entire city that night. It hummed the children to sleep, and woke the Three to work in the morning. 
                                    ***
The cathedral was swarming with noise as the pews began to fill like the combs of a honey bee hive. Most people were half asleep and half dressed. Many were wearing cheap plastic visors that were fashionably attractive. "Ssup." Some of them would say. "Ssup." The other would respond. They did not talk about anything. Just kept on saying, "Ssup." It was endless. Everyone who had remembered to bring a teleprobe or ethrapad was texting or posting on their tube; "Dude- Im in the 4th row!" "No Way! If theres a mosh bro then im totally up there."
When the magnificent Sentimental trumpets blazed, the whole crowd began to stand and sway in a horrifyingly motionless dance. The show started dark, but the spotlight guided Carlton Megaladon to the altar, where he kissed it and gracefully walked to the podium. His divine robe of black and red undulated hauntingly. His picture, an all-white face with red eyes, displayed enormously on the megatronscreen behind him. The trumpets decided to shut up after the mondo-cadence, guiding the people in the temple silent. They drooled in anticipating excitement. Someone off to the side could not contain himself and began to run in place while sucking on his thumb.
Megaladon's deceitful southern charm blabbed effectively; "Let me Pray & thank ya'll for coming, we have a great show for ya'll this morning! I'm glad to witness the huge number of people here this lovely summer's eve, to worship Memory with me. It's a testament to The Past." His eyes surveyed the crowd full of sedated fish-bowl eyes, "Now let us all profess Devotion to Memory." The congregation of people all began to chant in unison a speech of which they did not even know the author. 
"I believe in the mind, the human, sentient mind, is our greatest gift from the Creator, and the only boon setting us apart from the beasts of the underworld.
"I believe in the capacity of the mind and its ability to remember. Our gift was not given with limits, but rather guideposts. Our MENTAL CAPACITY is such to only store the memories of the past. We can never fully understand, or comprehend, the reasons and motives of our actions at the present, and we cannot predict, halt, or create our own futures. The past is what we were given, the past is what we worship here now.
"I believe the Sentient mental capacity is a gift from the Creator." All together they spoke in cultish unison, Megaladon with the lead, "I believe in the Sentimental faith, and that all others are man-made goofhahas allowed for by the Great Creator to test our faith in the Past. But, we are born with the Truth, and freely, and openly profess it now. The power of the Creator is the Sentimental nature of my mind, and all else is against him. May I never stray, and always remember, WHAT HAS BEEN."--- Then all became dark, but a loud, low pulsing sound bumped and bumped. A blue circle of light shined in the center of the room. A woman's voice, filtered through effects and laser-lights began lazily singing. Halographic snowflakes fell in tremendous colors. The lights changed from blue to white to black to white to blue to black to white and more electronic instruments joined the phat bass line and the droning techno bass drum. The lasers began to flash in and out of sequence, illuminating different church members, instantly turning them into party animals. They danced and grinded on poles that erected from the floor once the rave began, and other dancers emerged, hidden behind the walls. They were all white with blue hair and blue make up, and lacked all skills that necessitate dance. But the crowd ate, grooved and dug into the sensation of Sentimentality. Yet, the music had not even peaked, nor the identity of the lazy female singer's voice had been revealed. The light faded darker than black.
A bomb of Calm-laced glitter detonated like convulsing thunder, flaring up like a throbbing mushroom, as a piercing red and green strobe-flash erupted in and out until a woman was ascending from the floor of the altar. She was clad only in a fish-net thong, making her buttox look almost sublime, aside from the strange, scattered bruises. Blue and white spiked War-Ball pads covered her elbows, and a fruity motorcycle helmet rested on her wavy sky blue hair and aviator pilot goggles. She's an 'artist.'
And then she sang a chorus so inartistic it made most composers who heard it become alcoholics and move to the woods before jumping into a treacherous river. 
Who other than Madame Baby, here to promote the second coming of her husband, the Country Music Man. The crowd could abstain from partying no longer and began to freak out like never before seen on this Earth---
                             ***
Kylia was in the middle of poning noobs on her favorite video game when her computer alerted her of an incoming text message from an unfamiliar number. It read "Hey Ky its drew from Gomez trailer house/ I was wonderin if u were doin nethin 2day?"
OMGOMGOMGOMG. What do I do? I mean, he wasn't the cutest but he seemed nice I think? She replied back hastily "Do you like video games?" As soon as she sent it she regretted the text. Damnit! Now he's gonna think I'm a nerd! But Drew responded quickly, "I've been 2 Nickel-a-play a few times and it was fun?/you wana hang?"
Goosebumps ran all up and down her. Kylia's heart raced. She felt her armpits sweat and she had to get up out of her chair and walk around she was so excited that a boy was saying these very ordinary things to her. She slowly calmed herself and then gave answer "Sure! Come over 8933 Rancid Blvd , jst south of University Ave."
There was no reply. Shoot, why didn't I think that through! He probably thinks I'm easy or something! I guess I probably am, if I ever got the chance? She tried to convince herself that Drew hadn't seen the text yet, being the reason he didn't respond. But when she thought she was never going to see him again a rhythmic knocking rattled the door. Kylia went to her peephole and was very surprised to see it was Drew. What the hell? I haven't even showered or put on Deodorant. But without thinking or fixing herself up at all, she opened the door for Drew and smiled. He smiled back. She was in her p.j.'s, nipples hard with anticipation. He couldn't look away from the mammaric erection, but said "Hey! I brought a pizza from Valentino's."
"Oh! Awesome, they got the best pie in town." Cheapest, I mean.
"Totes cool, for realz yo."
"Oh uh, come on in I guess. Sorry it's so messy?" He didn't think it was.
Drew instantly gazed at her computer set up. It looked like something straight out of science fiction. There were several monitors, five or six, it was hard to tell because they were rotating funny, and one of them might have been a hologram. Technology was too good to tell what was fake and what was real. And all of this was real. But all of it was actually displaying a very intricate screensaver of what resembled brain cells magnified a thousand times, revolving around a single point; a thought. "Do you want something to drink?" She asked kindly, snapping him out of his daydream.
"Yeah, do you have any beer? I'm fuckin thirsty." He stumbled and threw off his sandals. His toe nails were long and his feet were dirty.
"Uhh, no, I don't really?Wait, actually there is some rumple-mints in the freezer."
"Oh fuckin sick! Yeah, ok, I'll have that."
Kylia laughed and got him the alcohol. He sniffed it and made a face. "So, whats happenin?"
"I got done early with work so I came home and started to play some Death Wish 3000. I'm ranked in the top 20?" She bragged but Drew didn't really know what that meant. And without giving him much time to respond she sat and resumed her game. It was complete virtual reality and conformed to her whole apartment. It was strange yet enthralling. You thought you were in a different world. The smell didn't change, and that probably was your only key to sanity from forgetting this was all a simulation. "Look out!" She yelled and came and jumped on him. A myriad of lasers came walloping at them, but Kylia crouched behind cover, threw a grenade and returned fire when a lull came from the enemy reloading their blaster rifles. Artificial noises and shouts and even symphonic music played from cloud speakers.
"Holy shit, this is nuts!" Drew shrieked, taking a chug of rumple-mints after a dose of several yellow pills.
"Yeah! Isn't it awesome? Just make a gun shape with your hand and the AI will acknowledge you're holding a weapon!" Drew tried it out. Truth be told, a narrow neon orange pistol emerged from the shape of his hand. 
"Cool!" They smiled at each other and started firing at enemies while using her couch as cover (which in the game was a beastly dead alien carcass).They played for seven hours straight without stopping, loving every second. 

	<This is the Power of Pi>

A week later, Josh was cleaning his desk when his ethrapad vibrated. 
San Tropez Corporate News hadn't given him work since his latest blog posts. He wanted to give them the finger and quit. 
His job was a constant disappointment. When he was a wee lad he would sneak past mother's leering eye to flip the TV on and catch the latest scoop at the quietest of volumes. I dreamed of being a reporter. Traveling the world as an international rockstar investigative journalist, just like Brian Williams. But I never had as much style as him! I wanted to learn every language there was. Whatever happened to that dream?
Then his teleprobe vibrated. Another text. He knew better than to check it. That sleaze boss of his, Kitcheimer, always had it out for him, especially now more than ever. After high school I never wanted to see you again. Who'da thought my only scholarship would bring me closer to you. Bloody life. 
Without warning, as if Kirtcheimer heard the thought, the young, clean cut man-child peered out through his closed blinds and stared at Josh for twelve seconds, then went back behind his veil of tin and glass. Creepy. 
Then a loud interrupting voice came from behind, "Turkey," it said. It was a familiar voice, one he hadn't heard in years. 
Josh turned abruptly and was somewhat confused and slightly startled. "Professor Keesle?" The professor laughed to herself and nodded. "How are you M'am?" Josh leapt from his chair and extended his hand. This made the aging professor laugh to herself some more. They shook hands but it was awkward because the professor's good shaking hand was currently holding a very nice but smaller briefcase. 
"Thank you, Mr. Turkey. I am very well." The gaunt professor tried to camouflage. She looked pallid and much older. Josh and her were the same lanky height, had similar tastes in fashion, and near the same style of glasses. "It's satisfying beyond words to see a former student accomplish so much, all on his own."
"Well, I have to give some credit to my Mother."
"Yes, of course, your family. The most important thing there is." The professor was sweating above her lip. "Your boss, young Mr. Kirtcheimer," the professor's milky eyes suddenly pointed to the big letters on the looming door of his office, "requested special permission to use some experimental Deadsy technology for your new assignment."
"New assignment? Well it's about fricken time!" The professor put the debonair briefcase on Josh's desk and began to open it. "You didn't come all the way from Deadsy tower just to tell me that, did you?"
Her lips didn't move but he heard her say "I didn't think you would be happy to see me. I don't remember our last meeting going well." As the locks clicked open, the Professor took out from the briefcase a strange portable camera and three other malformed parts and started to click and screw and assemble the fine pieces of digital futurama, to a very fine piece of ass and machinery.
"Holy kadoodles, that sure looks fancy!" Josh thought it was the coolest fuckin thing his eyes ever laid on.
"You bet your ass, kid. I mean, excuse me. It's state of the art, Turkey, or more to the point; this is the new art." That was a bold statement, but the Professor continued without interruption.
"This battery will go out in a thousand years and is fully biodegradable. Perfectly indestructible. Durable. Near infinite memory, with interchangeable card, cartridge or disc. Can shoot thermal, infrared, some slight X-ray penetration, but I wouldn't do that too often, it emits a lot of radiation. It's fully capable of shooting 5d and holographic and relaying it to any TV or monitor anywhere in the world, all wirelessly."
Josh looked up and almost said, "That's impossible."
"All siphoned frequency overrides of course, but needless to say, this camera is a weapon." She stared at him squarely. Josh liked the sound of that, but-
"But why are you 'giving' this to me?" Josh asked.
"Kirtcheimer wants you to find the Three." They paused, staring at each other for a moment, letting the busy sounds of the newsroom overtake them. Several people talking on their teleprobe, all sitting behind computers, typing and reading and confirming bogus stories. A clumsy young intern was carrying a huge load of disheveled papers rather quickly. Surprising no one, he fell, throwing the papers all over the office like an explosion, raining loose-leaf and cardboard at the slightest misstep?
"The Three?" There was thunder from nowhere.
"It is in you as well," Josh heard her say, but her mouth was shut. "I can't stay. I was told to bring you the camera and return immediately." The Professor embraced Josh with a nervous hug, nonchalantly slipping a small envelope into his pants. It was awkward. He felt like a spy; this sudden influx of packages and secret envelopes. The professor grabbed him and made sure he was looking directly into her eyes. She nodded the whole time. "Make sure you READ the INSTRUCTIONS, OK?" Josh nodded with her. 
"Did you make this?"
She smiled, "I put it together, but no, it's the design of a protégé?" She winked, but saw past his shoulder and went even paler than before. "I must leave."
She thinks she's in danger. Like someone is watching? "Uh, Yeah, sure professor Keesle, whatever you say." He saluted like a proper soldier.
	"Goodbye Josh. It was, sure nice to see you. Take care," she rather tensely said. They shook hands like businesspeople putting on a front.
	"Hope to see you again soon!"
"Me too." The professor turned and left inexpressively.
Right at that moment Josh's letter box started to print. He ripped off the warm paper then read his assignment briefing. Under most of the mumbo jumbo, his eyes caught: Broadcast footage of the Three--?--- Sounds fishy?Fishier than normal at least. It didn't make sense. Do they know I know? 
He scanned about his office suspiciously. There were still papers fanning down and up and around. The intern looked like he had seriously hurt himself but still everyone went about their normal business.
Josh quickly got his things together and walked briskly to the elevator. Kirtcheimer's office was now dead. Josh hadn't seen him leave? He was studying the super camera in his hands and trying to flip through the tiny fonted instruction manual. He still couldn't believe its base function; being able to override any TV or computer, and transfer the broadcast verbatim. He tested it by pulling the trigger. A bright red light turned on and said "record." All at once every screen in the station was displaying a queasy sideways angle of the dirty newsroom elevator. "Wow!" He heard his coworkers complain aloud and say "What the fuck!?"	

Mother was asleep when he got home, and that was good, because he was going to have another late night. He filled his backpack as if it were a journalist utility belt with an emphasis on exploring, setting out for the rendezvous point underneath the city's streets. 
Nic was waiting for him in the sewer near his apartment, ready to lead him through the funky fragranced darkness. Josh nodded and followed, forgetting all apprehension. He was somewhat surprised not to see the super heroes but instead high school aged kids. They were dingy and disheveled with an oblivious acrimony to them. They marauded impatiently, near a strange corner overlooking a vast sea of shit under the city. The other two spotted them and beckoned closer. Zach and Drew looked more than slightly drunk.
 Nic was the only one remotely paying attention to the reporter's presence. "Josh Turkey, king of late night!" It was a joke of course. Even though it wasn't funny, Josh managed to laugh a few bursts of anxiety. 
"Who are you?"
The Three looked at each other, rolled their eyes and said at the same time "Your mom."
The river of poop blew up a fart bubble and the Three backed away in horror. Josh covered his mouth and nose, the steam attacking them like a perverse smelly wind of warm torture. 
After the surprise attack, Nic shined a flashlight to and fro so Josh could see the immense space of which this abandoned underground city took place. It was much bigger than he expected. "Inconceiveable," he said to himself. 
Zach steadied Drew, trying to counter-balance his own inebriated body. Drew laughed deeply before modulating to a rough coughing fit.
Nic, in a single jump, flew over the river of shit to the opposite side of the group, crashing face first through the cemented concrete. It left a huge gash in the wall but Nic didn't falter. Money fell out of Zach's pockets with each step as they took the long way over to where Nic patrolled. Zach sorted through a wad of cash and handed it to Josh, who stared at it covetously. "You got the maps?" he asked.
Josh stared at the money for a bit longer, then fumbled between pockets and presented a neatly labeled folder that displayed a maze of underground connecting tunnel-tubes, large enough to traffic obese Amazonian hookers strapped with a million kilos of a drug heavier and much more potent than coke or H. 
Zach was steadying Drew with one hand while taking a shot from a flask. It must've reminded him of a song because he began stomping and humming with a gritty tone. Drew somehow acknowledged this by grunting and attempting to clap his hands but just ended up hitting his wrists together like the child of a man who fucked a monkey.
"I need to warn you, they gave me a weapon against you." All of a sudden the Three were around him, fully aware and content, but they did not beckon him to stop. "It's a camera. They appointed me with finding you. Discovering you, I guess, to prove you exist." He held it up. Nic examined it. "I think they know I know you."
"No, they know you're the only one who's seen us, and think you'll find us again?"
"They know everything!"
"Of course they know everything. They are everything, every cog."
"Stop saying that!" Drew slobbered towards Nic.
"Josh, you need to play stupid, ok? You don't need to work anymore. I mean, yes, you will be working with them, but it doesn't matter if you lose your job. We can hire you. We can provide your Mom with all the care she needs."
"You'll have to come down here almost every night though. We will be expanding exponentially now. Just keep them occupied somehow. We have big plans. Deter them towards a believable falseness."
	"What do you mean?
	"Lie."
And with a whisper from the wind, the Three were gone. 
Josh couldn't possibly be more broodingly overwhelmed. He didn't know where he was exactly. This whole thing was insane. Implausibly absurd. Non compos mentis. Babushka. That isn't even the right word but somehow it fits here! He continued to curse and pant, then remembering, felt the giant wad of money Zach handed him. It amounted to $31,415.

3.141592
The clouds bobbed and weaved in and out of their industrial playhouse. They all danced together with oblique movement toward the same destination, the tallest building in all of San Tropez: Deadsy Tower. Its phallic imagery was all too clear. The mirrors of its windows shined piercing white against the sun. It stood nearly 314 meters high, housing nearly 12 thousand people. It was made to suck the energy out of the earth.
As the clouds spun around the spire, inside, in the uppermost penthouse of the Deadsy Corporation, Exeter sat behind his mahogany desk, an alien skull rolling between his knuckles. He was wearing a blue suit with off-white suspenders and matching shoes. He had just gotten done tanning when the Prime Minister of North Dakota called him, begging for a donation. Exeter, being one of the richest men in America (secretly the richest), made no slight of time to say 'yes'.
But now, the profusely mundane made him insane in the membrane. 
Too much of too little. It was time for a change. 
The door of his office opened and Carlton Megaladon, the delegate of the Sentimental church, walked through on the wings of false spirits. He wore a dark navy robe that looked like it had been pulled off the wall of some coke head's house in the 70's. His face was painted all blue, but his lips were pearl white that matched his slicked back hair. As always, he held a smile of true political value.
With the snap of his thumb Exeter sent the extinct alien skull soaring into the air. It chimed like water being swung about in a metal pan as he caught it. He crushed it into his clenched fist with no blade of emotion. Then he smiled, holding his temple, wheeling around eerily in his chair to face Carlton. He began telepathically. Carlton, good.I'm glad you're here. Megaladon bowed respectively. Tell me, how do the Sentimentals bode?
	Carlton released his perverted gaze from Exeter, out beyond the clear glass of the wall window, to the dying city and remembered what his people could only remember...
?
	---Megaladon shook himself from his dazed trance. "Yes, all goes well. People believe they can know no truth but the Past. We have them under our complete control. They believe they're powerless to choose, and moreover, they're afraid to dream of a brighter future, lest these thoughts remove them from the unity with the Great Creator, whatever the hell that is." Flashing a toothy grin, Megaladon ruminated on his southern charm, as it could still surprise even him, on occasion. He went and poured himself a drink before he sat down in front of his boss' desk.
	The smile moved across the room and now rested on Exeter's lips. So, the people of San Tropez only believe in the Past.
	Carlton-
	"Yes, my love?"
	Who controls the past?
	"The history books, my Lord." 
	Clever, my Carlton, but who writes the books?
	"The leader of the victors, of course."
	And who is the leader of the victors?
	"Why...you are, Peter."
	How many were in attendance?
	"With the home Outerneters...ninety million."
	This will not do. We must get the attention of all people. Alert the Country Music Man that his show will begin early. Arrange your media to have the whole affair being the result of too little faith in the Past, and an increase in followers of the Three.
	"It has already been done, your Excellency." He thought this would impress his old friend Exeter. It did not.

	Kylia slammed the door shut to her shift manager's office. Apparently, her boss didn't like her 'fraternizing' with customers. She didn't care though. She didn't have too many friends, and was sick of just sitting at home inside her digital universe. She loved it as much, but there was emptiness there. Of course she was content with her homemade computer, Charlie, and video games, and looked forward to improving her machine to its fullest capabilities, whatever they were?But she wanted something more.
	"Hey Kylia," Atricia said (her post-modern hipster-core co-worker). They had recently begun to be chatty near five o'clock. 
	"Sup A?" Darnit, that didn't feel natural. "Ya wanna get some nuggets after shift?"
	"Actually, I wanted to ask you something?" Atricia said. She was fingering her huge red and gold hair. She had a lot of makeup on her eyes. Pink, blue and black and stuff, it was pretty weird.
	"Oh yeah! Sure!" Kylia answered, wheezing. "You can ask me anything."
	Atricia smiled stupidly. She asked with the best impersonation of herself, fully attached with a dull, drab, shitty slobber in her voice. "Well, I got an extra ticket to Madame Baby and DirckShaw Riggins cuz Furnessa totally bailed out on me. So I was like, wondering if you wanted to go?"
	"A concert? I've never been to one of those before? Sounds like fun! I'll go! When is it?"
	Atricia laughed and started texting on her teleprobe. "It's tonight. We have to go straight there though. Traffic will take a while. Do you have all of your stuff?"
	"Umm," Stuff? "I think so?Is it ok if I go in this?" She displayed her plain white collared shirt and brownish-yellowish khaki cargo overalls.
	"I guess I can do your makeup on the way to the Dome." Atricia took a silent picture of Kylia looking quite stupid and nearly spent, posting it on the Outernet with the caption Fat Dyke! "Can you drive?" 
	She could.
	Atricia wouldn't shut up the whole way there. Even while Kylia was driving on the interstate and she was applying the zaniest style of makeup anyone has ever seen. Atricia was nearly blinding Kylia while she put the shit all around her eyeballs, poofing her face and cheeks to look like some sort of weird person like you see in Japan. The two young girls resembled clowns more than anything else, but such was the hipster style they so dug on. Later, Atricia would be divorced from the father of the child that was consummated after the concert.
	
	The curtains remained closed. The concert was swarming to catastrophic potential. If someone were to do something horribly evil, this would be a place to do it. All of the young people were helpless to each other. Leaning on one another, sweating and farting and kissing and loving. People could not contain themselves in the anticipation of what was marketed as the greatest concert of all time. 
	The two girls' seats were not very good. In fact, they were terrible. Kylia was directly behind a pole. Atricia took a picture of Kylia sitting contently, staring at the pole as if there was something to see, with the caption Fatass stares at pole. "Are all concerts like this? I mean, the whole pole thing?" Kylia asked her two-faced, dumbass co-worker.
	All of a sudden, all went black. A billion flashes of cameras and lighters and glow-sticks and fireflies and aeroflyers lit the Dome, and the crowd roared like a single entity of municipal distortion and danced and danced and grinded, yet no music played. 
	And then the bass dropped?It took everyone by surprise. It was deafeningly loud. Kylia was somewhat afraid of the volume of the noise, and as it progressed, it truly frightened her terrifyingly. She could hear a girl's voice, but all she could comprehend it saying was "Goo Goo Ga Ga, I'm your baby's mama-" and it didn't make any sense to her. The sound was atrocious, but Kylia witnesssed Atricia deeply entranced, dangerously lusting sex with everyone sitting around them. There were flashes of pink and blue light and a strobing of green and red lasers shot throughout the Mega-Dome. 
	Madame Baby's ensemble had completely taken up the entire football field, making full use of the 360 degree stage show that the concert necessitated. 
	It was an hour into the song before the progression started to change, and by then Kylia had had enough. "Aricia! Atricia!" Kylia shook her coworker friend. She was grinding hardcore on this stingy hippie lookin dude.
	"What's wrong Kylia? Aren't you feeling it?"
	"I need to get out of here!" The music was ripping her insides apart. Her brain was melting in a bad sort of way. Or maybe, a sort of drying--
	"Just let go Kylia, relax a bit. Feel the moment. Be who you wanna be. Dr. Riggins will be up soon, and he's the best. He'll blow your mind, baby!"
	Kylia let out a scream of pain. "I'm sorry! I have to go - uh, here, take this for a cab or something." Kylia handed her $50 and fell down the stairs in the most comedic fashion you can picture of a fat white girl falling and falling down the endless stairs towards the exit. She got up unhurt but very embarrassed. But apparently, no one was paying attention to the fat white girl. She was crying when she tried to send a message to the Gomez! Factory trailer house. 
	No reply.

Drew kicked Nic who had fallen asleep at his laptop. A button had jostled free and was now stuck to his cheek. Drew pulled it from his sticky flesh, throwing the key lightly on Nic's lap as he walked out the door, humming atonally. 
Waking slowly, Nic picked the 'end' button up and placed it back into its place above the 'home' button and sat there, pondering the necessity of anything but sleeping, though sleep he could not. He tried to reboot his computer but the battery was dead, so he grabbed his journal of fading ink chickenscratch. All he had written were a series of numbers. 31 pages with layer upon layer of scorched arithmetic, and four pages were the same four pages he'd written every night for the past year, constantly revising so someday, someone would be able to make sense out of everything. More importantly, so he would. "The power of Pi can neither be destroyed nor created: it is the door to infinity."
"What did you say?"
"There's a text from Gomez." Drew gave it to Zach. Though Nic and Drew had never met Mr. Gomez, they assumed he was only a sheep like the rest. 
"Shit?Looks like I'm staying late."
"Are we in trouble? Is he finally gonna let us go? I say thankee Pi!" Drew twirled his hand skyward and did a spin on one foot. Zach pushed him off balance and he fell into a lamp that none of them remembered being there and broke it. They all giggled like bastards.
"It's our only way into Deadsy right now?" Zach said.
"The fuckin cracker factory?! It's a waste of time." Drew said.
"For the hundred-thousandth time, I'm telling you, it's not," Zach retorted.
"You know I'm right?I want to fight."
Zach looked at his brother shrewdly. They'd been over this, How many times now? He couldn't remember.
Trouble? Nic threw the laptop off him. He climbed over the comic books and magazines with busty women of all shapes and colors strewn out along the floor. All of the books and mags were open to a different page. Ten, fifty, two, 69, one hundred and one, six hundred and ninety four, thirty eight. Will I ever finish any of these? Are any of them worth finishing? Is anything worth finishing? Will I ever finish anything? How does one write about infinity? The End. He tried to laugh.
The putrid coffee stain on his shirt was the only witness to a lonely day's beginning.
	Nic took his sweetass time and met his brethren around the corner of the Gomez! Cracker Factory entrance. Drew was attempting to juggle a can with laceless sneakers outside the factory. Zach sucked down another early death. "Captain Punctual - the Lioness; the arch nemesis of LTM: the Lion Tamer Magnificent." Nic sensed Drew and Zach's argument had continued the whole way here.
	"How the hell do you take so long? You spend the least time in front of the mirror?are you holdin out on me?" Drew released his final kick sending the can tumbling at Nic's shins, but he fired it right back, maintaining enough momentum to spin perpetually before them.
Nic stole the cigarette from Zach and inhaled an obnoxious drag. "In the modern world nothing is certain but death, taxes, and," Nic stomped the can before its momentum died. "Litter."
"Don't gimme that psycophilosophical bullshit, Nic." Drew snorted. Zach's eyes through the smoke didn't acknowledge they really minded, reflecting am empty emotion.
"You guys don't have to wait for me. I can take it-- I mean-- fuck, I do this shit on purpose. A little excitement in the morning gets me going."
"And you think we'll let you have all the fun?" Zach backslapped Nic in the chest as the Three rather unstylishly walked through the infathermal sensor gate to the Gomez! Cracker Factory. "If you get in trouble, we all get in trouble. I'm not letting you get fired alone." 
"Yeah, you go, we all go. I don't want a fuckin job anyway. I'd rather steal and cheat than work." They laughed.
They literally punched the clock. 
Zach took a ride to the tenth floor: Management; to push a sea of paperwork and personally assist Mr. Gomez. Drew went straight through some double doors: Factory Floor. He popped three yellow pills into his mouth in what he thought was a discreet manner. Nic went down stairs: Shipping/Warehouse; to pull box and fork pallet. Before Nic was out of earshot he heard Drew yell and point, "Don't be late to lunch." Nic remembered and gave a friendly gestured salute.
	                           ***
	All the little girlies were goin crazy. They were screaming and ripping their clothes off and throwing themselves off bridges. "OMG I CANT BELIEVE HE'S HERE! HE'S HERE!"
	"HE IS WAY HOTTER IN PERSON!"
	"I WANT TO RIDE HIM LIKE HE RIDES HIS HORSE?DIRTY!!!"
	"Country Music Man is like, the greatest guitarist ever, man."
	"DUDE?he's like the greatest musician ever?"
	"The Greatest Artist?EVER!!!"
	"Like, totally?wanna make out?"
	All through the Outernet, peeps chatted, sexted, and shatted ?
	
	The rift in Pi. The calling and awakening. Transformation into transcendental. 
		The Three awoke as if they'd been sleeping in a dream that occupied no logic. A puzzle fit for madmen where only laughter and joy were the keys to all mysteries.
		^What has one eye, is round, and smells like corn?^
	<An asshole?>
	(This is fe-fi-fo- folly!)
		[You truly are disturbing brother]
			<& then what did the wholesome Lion Tamer see in his vision of Pi?>
		[You mistake me]
	(We mistake each other)
		^Crop Circles^
	<I don't get it!>
		(Ha!)
			[You haven't heard that one?]
	<Is it because we're in Nebraska?>
		(Haha!)
	<Stop laughing!>
			[Hahaha]
	<More like Crap Circles>
	Leaping from his forklift, Nic didn't care as it careened out of control and slammed into a pile of pallets sending crackers exploding everywhere, especially in places where there were absolutely no crackers before. He swarmed to the exit. Nic could already see his brothers gazing at something, gawking. And when he immediately exited his workplace, he discovered what entranced his brothers; a demonically furious bound of black menacing smoke stacking higher even than the dark blue Deadsy Tower. Nic could hear the screams of the faraway dying San Tropezians and gave a shudder. Drew clenched his fist and Zach stamped out his cigarette. The Three stood on the front steps of the Gomez! Cracker Factory, nervously analyzing the violent smoke rising from downtown, when the face of Pi showed them once more how to save the world, one piece at a time.
	Zach's skin peeled from his body as he was reborn into Bag-Head. He was headless, and in its place came a bellow of black flame keeping a likeness to vaguely feature his face. Reaching into his satchel, he pulled a paper grocer's bag and placed it where heads go. A breath of smoke left the holes for his eyes. The Bag-Head reached his arms to the sky, creating above him a bag of great size and no weight. As air filled the bag his boots began to lift and he soared off in the direction of destruction. 
	Drew ripped his mortal body's clothes to reveal green pajamas covering over the soles of his feet. His hair began to recede wildly, turning into a clean-cut shag. Static energy glowed purple and yellow in a ball around him, weaving itself into a fuzzy blanket that tied a soft knot at the nape of his neck. His feet touched the ground no more, the appearance of wind catching his cape when there was none to be blown.
	Nic fell to his knees, suffocating, fists clenched hard. He punched the Earth. His body pulsed, and his muscles began to grow like a balloon the size of a rhino. His clothes tore under the new bulk of his raw skin. His jaw squared itself, framing the dimple that laid deep in the base of his chin. From below his nose a blonde mustache grew equal lengths in both directions. Nic's bright red hair transformed long and blonde, keeping its strong curly nature, to beautiful golden locks. Standing now, and yelling at two different heavens. A great bird, vibrant and burning with the intensity of the sun soared down and spun around him. The flaming tail feathers burned the ripped clothes off his mortal self, and from the ashes, as they blew away in the wind, a vest and canvas shorts were seen. As the bird sailed away he dropped down a whip and boomerang. The Lion Tamer caught them and placed them in his belt. The bird returned for one more swoop almost directly into the Lion Tamer's face. Before they made contact, the bird exploded into a burst of flame, and when the smoke cleared a hat was floating through the air. The Lion Tamer grabbed it and placed it on his head, and reaching up he grabbed a feather that still remained from the tail of the bird, and placed it in his hat.
"Tis a fortune of mine to not hath been tested on thy punctuality of the noon time meal." The Lion Tamer was gesturing to his brother the Blanketeer.  
	"And may ye never fail such a test whence it come agane." He winked back.
	The Blanketeer rose higher into the air as the Lion Tamer flicked his whip, snatching onto the leg of his caped compadre.
	Crop Circles.

	Up, up and up from the world of his journal, Josh ran to the window to see what the explosive noise had been. It sounded like something out of a low budget action thriller. An explosion? He thought of the Three.
	Smoke mushroomed behind the encompassing mass of downtown San Tropez skyscrapers. In a farcical urgency, he snagged his keys and jolted for the door. As he turned the knob, his mother cried out, "Josh, dear, could you bring me my diapers before you leave?"
	"Mother, you've been drinking too much tea! Too much caffeine isn't good for you."
	"The T.V. tells me I do need my antioxidants. At this age the only thing not good for an old woman is a disobedient son."
	"But mom, there's been a tragedy, I must inquire!" He layered some chap-stick on.
	"Tragedies will wait for young men, but an old lady will not wait for her diapers. Don't make me order you to put them on me."
	
	"Some days I'm prayin, what others are sayin ain't true,
	Whiskey can sure blow a load in my mind!
	Can you give me a ride, I'll show you inside
	There ain't no place to belong in this crazy god dang world O mine
	So I'm gonna take my life, get rid of this strife
	Unless we can all get along
	Take this knife, Will you be my wife?"
		       -"Pray O People" Country Music Man, Southern White Trash Stereotype  

	An affair of smoke and mirrors? Faster than tempered malice? Stronger than the wheels of well-oiled time?Who among the Tropezians knew in their heart of hearts the truth that boiled savagely under the surface of her streets that wanton day in San Tropez?
	The next morning the headlines were ripe with injustice, pointing fingers in the wrong direction: 'The Terrible Three Return to San Tropez,' read the San Tropez Chronicle. 'Farmer McInish's Crop Destroyed by the Three,' blasted the Daily Deadsy. The news personalities grew teary eyed in having to be the ill-messenger: 'Our town ravaged by the Three. Bear witness to the new creation of their destruction.' 
	Note: all of the above sponsored and staffed by Deadsy Inc.: Bringing Light to Us All. Free years' worth of tampons with purchase of two or more abortions. 
	After the disembowelment of the city's core, after the last tortured building blew over as ashes in the wind, after the pillaging of the fields, and the fiery night caked in the dust of their city, the people of Ghetto Tropez walked out of the ashes, blinking their scorched ghost eyes into the blossoming rays of the morning sun. They swore vengeance, staring at the wreckage, with a renewed curse in their hearts for a new day, and on their lips the incantation: Damned be the Three who burn my homeland.
 	Who knew better? Who knew the truth? 
	The Three most assuredly did, for they were the beholders of the ancient and spectacular cosmic force of Pi. There were handfuls of yet partially faithful who might've suspected, but dared not speak their curiosity in fear of the merciless tide of opposition. And still, more shrewd than this handful, there was another whose faith waxed beyond mere suspecting. He could feel the truth beneath the moist slough hollowing beside the blasphemy taking place in his fair city and in the hearts of her people. And he almost missed it all entirely. 
	Humming down the road, toe pointed in the direction of his will on the give of the gas pedal, Josh moved closer and closer to the rising smoke from downtown San Tropez. He couldn't believe the unflinching nag of that old woman: "Joshy bring me this," and "Joshy bring me that," and "Wouldn't you fluff my pillow, pull down the wall television screen, and turn the air conditioner on because it's so dreadfully hot in here, before you go?"
	All as the sky caught fire.
	I hope I'm not too late. He adjusted his grip on the wheel, his tongue sticking out the corner of his mouth in hungry anticipation as he came upon the reeking carnage?
	
	"Why would Deadsy be so blatant in sending the Country Music Man to the middle of downtown?" grunted the Bag-Head, his hands raised tightly holding the giant plastic bag that the Power of Pi had granted flight, defying any sort of logic.
	"No doubt an unsubtle ploy to bring us henceforth," the Lion Tamer stated, twirling his mustache, his flaxen hair reflecting gold in the sunlight.
 	"Shall we follow fate?" Bag-Head asked.
 	"Nay," spoke the Tamer, "we shall follow faith." 
	Crop Circles. They laughed.
 	After the necessary chuckling chuckled to a slow, the Blanketeer suggested, "Methinks we should here linger. The others turned to him. "Least till he's had way with the gossip shops, and trendy parlors of 12th Avenue." They all once again burst out laughing, hovering in the air, watching the destruction of Trendy Town, as the area around 12th Avenue was called.
	  The streets were full of scattering people. One yelled out, "Fire!" gesticulating wildly to the sky. "Death from above! The Terrible Three have returned to finish the job, AHHHHH! Run for your lives!" adding to the mass panic of civilians screaming wildly down the street.
	"Hmm," the Blanketeer hummed in lyrical jest, "a welcome greeting, but no red carpet?" Ha, ha, ha, they all agreed once more.
	 As the Three coasted gently to the ground, from around the corner of Oz and Main Street came the friend that betrayed them: tall, Texas leather spurs clinking, rhinestones speckling his pants and jacket, glinting from the explosion in the sky. There was a storm of fire raining down on everything in the path behind him. He rode upon a steel stallion large as a small school bus, its breath invisibly exhaling with burning wide nostrils, setting flame to all things near. It was none other than the Country Music Man?.
	 "Well, well, well, I reckon we meet again. The old gang finally all back together," he spoke. "I'd purfer a meetin twixt ol friends to have less funk and more soul sweetening wine than death and destruction, but thou hath chose ye own path." The wannabe haggard cowboy caricature reared somewhat gallantly on his horse, flames shooting out of the top of the metallic animal's head. "I wot you fools three had but a lick of sense and stopt this meaningless charade?. I bring word from Meg'ladon himself that Exeter desires peace. Come into the light, ya'll." He spit and curled his lip. "Don't ya know I luv ya?"
	 They sensed the lie before it was a sperm of a thought in the incubus-man's brain. Knew it would come as sure as high summer comes to the plains, just to fester and brew a batch of pesky mosquitoes. 
	"Hold thy spork in tongue, daemon! Speak not as though we be naive babes," Bag-Head demanded, his eyeholes glowering with a colorless kindled wrath.
	"Then you will fail like each hero before you! YEEEEHHAAAAAAWWW!!!" The Country Music Man unfurled his lasso and swung it madly in the air. Fire shot in a hundred directions from the horse like rapid machine gun bullets. Closing in perpendicularly to draw his fire, the Blanketeer let loose electric chair caliber shards of lightning, ones that would have made Zeus prematurely ejaculate, zapping the horse's side. 
	Alas, the horse only shuddered the way one will when flies nibble at his rear. The Monster quickly adapted and relayed the power to its own. 
	CMM ejected himself high up and met the Blanketeer with a mighty punch to the mouth. Blank catapulted backwards through the air, up, up and up over the skyscrapers of Oz Street, landing quite nastily, far down the road. 
	Seeing this unfold, the Bag-Head held up his hands (aggravated by his brother's preemptive character) and grew a bag between them big enough to choke a horse, literally, he hoped, then charged towards the abomination. 
	"Paper or Plastic?" shouted the Bag Head.
	The Country Music Man turned wildly on the horse and threw his lasso towards Bag Head, but with a sidestep, missed its snagging grasp. He loosed the bag violently and it ensnared both horse and rider, only to be burned from the inside out by the flaming horse. Damn, paper was a bad choice. 
 	Just as quickly as it was taken prisoner, the back hooves of the horse kicked savagely and sent the Bag Head flying towards the end of town, into Farmer McInish's Vertical Community Farm.
	Left alone, the Lion Tamer paced slowly around the Country Man, eyes locked like an old fashioned showdown. He suddenly unsheathed his whip and beat the air wildly, screaming "Yhaw, Yaw!" He dodged the lasso successfully and lashed at the pop star. The horse started into a dead charge towards him. LT flung himself behind the corner of a building just as the bizarro Clydesdale clipped his side.
	The beastly varmint halted and returned at a charge. The Lion Tamer closed his eyes, pinpointing his thoughts in cool concentration. The horse was trampling 50 feet away. 
	 He felt his mind thumb towards what he was looking for. Twenty feet away. He stretched out his whip to the right, eyes still closed, flagellating at the wheel well of an old Datsun parked helter-skelter on the side of the street. Ten feet away. He summoned all his strength. He opened his eyes-- then launched the muscle car lasciviously triangulated to pancake the rustler and bronco into a wall.
 	The car moaned, spinning and crashing, hurling through horse and rider. They somersaulted over, nine times, perfectly, rising on the pavement back to the stallion's steel feet. "Damn Tarnation! What are the chances of that!?" 
	Without warning the Country Music Man let go of the lasso again, meshing the Tamer about his treetrunk middle. Unfortunately, the lasso wasn't built in some cheap child labor factory, but actually contained secret evil power. It drained him of his conscious Pi. Closer and closer and closer, he pulled the Lion Tamer while the demagogue counted to ten in reverse.
 	"Well," scoffed the Country Music Man as he reeled in, "victory today is at least on my side by one third, Haw!" The Lion Tamer smelt the foul Country Cologne the mongoloid man wore: acrid and stale. He pulled out his hunting knife, cutting the cheek of the Tamer. "May you die well, old friend."

 	Behold the Lion Tamer in this moment! A sly knowing grin split his lips, "And may the bird of paradise take wing up your snout," He responded coolly-- just as the wide brimmed hat on his head spread even wider, until it was like the beating of wings. It had an arched neck of a sacred water fowl, and the blazing feathers of the Phoenix. It flew straight up into the face of the cowboy, blinding him dauntingly. He tore relentlessly at his face to get it off. 
		 
	The Blanketeer shot over, riding a silent white bolt of lightning. "What doest thou?" He questioned with short breath, recharging himself. "You have enough corn in the bag of Unfathom to feed a small town!"
	"Or to drown a villain in," put the Bag-Head slyly. "Let us make a memory of this flaming wannabe cowboy, and tonight we dine on popcorn by the town-full!"

Though it seemed strange, in the middle of the day, there was no traffic or pedestrians walking through a once fair city; the monster, Country Music Man, pointed straight into the sun, acknowledging it for all of his triumphs, as if the sun was paying attention to him. Ha! To think such a delicate body of perfect spherical helium & hydrogen would listen to Country music when there is so much good rock and roll to be discovered.
Nay. 
The only Star in our solar system was paying attention to the Three: radiation from its warm light shining through the dismal clouds glowing in the heroes eyes, reunited, with a shit ton of corn. 
The theme from The Good, the Bad, and The Ugly played in each of their heads, yet amplified everywhere from nowhere. Tammy Tamerson (A citizen), once terrified of the abominable Three, decided to sneak a peek from above a rustic old timey tavern. At first, she was coldly frightened of a greater power, polluting the clear and distorting the old. 
What is Deadsy anyway? Why is Exeter the head of State? Christmas every month?
Tumble weeds wheeled from idle pavement. Exhausting smoke rose over the fires of the perilous city streets. The Country Music Man grabbed his hat and extended it into the air. He looked like a whithered, cancer-infested Marlboro man: false denim and a cheesy red scarf (not bandana), tight pleather jeans, polar bear-skin boots that no real cowboy could afford, clean cut hair and butt-chin, exposed shaved chest with the lame opening in the shirt. He didn't know any Hank Williams or Johnny Cash, but he would tell ya they were his idols. His battle cry might have pleased some no brained fans, but it could not fool the Beholders of Pi. The doomed Three.
Bag-Head never cared for Country Music or the Country Music Man, and felt a fool for thinking this monster appeared to be rugged, but was merely wrapped in the deceitful magic of Deadsy. 
	
	(The Power of Pi can only be understood by those who read between the lines. That is me: between the lines; one foot in your dreams, the other in your nightmares protecting you from the mouth of evil. I cannot be everywhere at once. Only evil can. You don't need something else, something besides flesh and bone to fight it. Power is in dreams, answers, friendship. Together, we are the Power of PI. And I am The power of the Bag: this bag--the face of blunt unconcern. Knowing naught of right or wrong, only the infinite emptiness which it holds. Ye voice claims be music?I claim it unintelligent, impersonal clamor. How dare ye ignore my Unfathoms. Pay now and forever. I will ask again: Paper, or Plastic?) 

The Country Music Man charged with a pathetically weak speed that appeared he was overacting.  
	"THE POWER OF PI Forever!" Tammy yelled from above the rustic tavern-house at the Lion Tamer, making eye contact with a fist in the air. 
       The magnificent Lion Tamer stood erect filing his nails. The Country Music Man in all his lameness shook his head in a premature smile of triumph as his stupid fake horse ran towards the end of its existence. The Lion Tamer spit, smiling a front page hunk's smile. He cracked his knuckles, stretching and flexing. 
When the horse was just a few feet away from stampeding over the mammoth of a man, it was surprised at the uncanny quickness of the Lion Tamer's hands and infinite strength, immediately snapping the wide neck of the horse clean off, shredding flesh and metal in twain, sending it into painful mechanic convulsions on the sidewalk next to a quaint donut shop, bleeding out the goo of robots.
	 (That's not good for business)
	<That's not good for anybody>
Into the arms of the Bag-Head the blackguard gravitated like a magnet. Bag-Head punched a huge wad of corn sideways down CMM's throat, leaving a harrowing abnormal shaped neck, all the while strangling him with his other arm, so he could not swallow the dry yellow vegetable. Paper or Plastic? Neither! He conked him hard with the head of his bag, and he fell backwards. The cowboy tried to stand, but the Satchel of Unfathom opened like an interstellar gateway where nothingness and consciousness meet?

	Monsters have existed since humans could communicate. They helped explain a lot of bullshit we were too scared to think about, or didn't have the proper information to comprehend. Or, help us scare children from doing something stupid behind our backs.
	Monsters blend in. They disguise themselves as everyday people with fake personalities to be respected by peers and feared by who they wish to instill fear into. Monsters say one thing and do the other. They blatantly lie for their own gain.
	This monster is everywhere and anywhere. If it were you, you couldn't admit it.
	Forget about full moons. What happens when you are given a chance of ultimate power?
	No, not winning the lottery or having a three-way
	A monster has the ability to never reveal itself; it has a reflection and puts on pants just like everyone else to cover up its nakedness.
	It can hide from the public eye while all focus is on it.
	Catch a monster and you're surprised it bites back with super-AIDS?
	How do I know you're not the monster? You're the reason these problems are here. You have never done anything right in your life and now you have brought this upon us? You who have failed me at every corner. Redeem yourself, my pet, drink the blood of my cup and let your monster breathe the air it was meant to cherish?feast, taste and see, feel the change go through your soul and body and mind?yes the new thoughts are scary and strange, but feel yourself grow unstoppable?change into something new and disastrous and beautiful and share it with the world?all will worship you?eat it?you love it. I can give you more. So much more.
	
	The process of imagining evolved with the ability to have anything in front of us with the click of a button the size of a dime. There is no attention span. Only attention.
	Life is quick. Love is short. Reality depends on where you are in the world. Imaginations can be magnified.
	San Tropez is a very real city, whether you can find it on a map or not, filled with people like Jayne and Dave, Lance and Suze, Kim and Tom, but more likely you.
	The age of the future: a time period where all science fiction artists wrote this decade was the present?. Flying cars and hoverboards?.a replicator that could assemble any object as long as it "downloaded" the inner molecular structure?every cop on the street would have a ray gun and a robot partner from another planet?all of America's best super-soldiers would be body builders from Austria?our imagination is becoming more and more and more real everyday?
			Up, up? and Up!
	
	I spread Fear every day. Fear gets us going. It tells us what to do and say. Harp. What you must fear is the Lie. 
	The lie from high up, from the "good guys," the "you can count on me's," the leaders of the free worlds who say they're just like you and you fucking believe it, because you, unlike them, have hope when no one else is talking like the rest and says the better good. You hope because you believe they will help and keep their promises. But you don't believe a person will change even though we're the most adaptable species on Earth. We're royally screwed because the assholes we thought were the good guys lied. They lied a lot. They lied the whole time. They lied on the bed watching TV while they were fucking us in our unlubricated cunts with bags over our heads. And we can't take the bag off. The bag makes it easier to not deal with the bullshit in our everyday life. Thanks Bag-on!
	But it will all disappear someday, like the rest from the rest. And we're watching it happen. We're fucking speeding up the process as fast as humanly possible. Fearing death is one thing, but I will sure miss this place, if it is real or Nott.
	People forgot what to care about because of too many distractions, what Exeter thrives on. Taking advantage of the confused and making them even more confused than before.
	It's easy to see corruption from far away, but up close it's as deceiving as propaganda.	
We only fight clichés; perverted truths: It's too crazy to be true. It's too crazy not to be true...
	The modern chimera is the belief in the fragile equilibrium of our planet, when, in fact, we are already profusely dead, but have not acquired the modest humility to realize it yet. Wink-wink, thumbs up, and FUCK YOU!!!
					 	
Pulling torn sleeves off his shirt, Nic moaned, "Man, I've gotta do something about these clothes. I only got four pairs of pants. I can't keep cutting them up like this."
	"Yeah dude." Zach agreed, though he tore his skin from his bones, he still had all his clothes intact. "You should be more careful. You're not leaving much room for the imagination." 
	
	3.1415926
	The drought made San Tropez smell dry and corny. The Midwest was all too familiar with the Dust Bowl, yet they seldom prevented the incapacitating side-effects; living the dream that someday it would rain again. Clouds would become thick, dark and stormy, but only the dandruff of moisture would fall lightly. It's hard to think one day you're worried about floods, and the next you've run out of water.
Regardless of the heat wave, the Three had big plans; Zach and Nic were to meet Kylia, formally. Drew had been there a few times a week, studying her in ways he didn't understand. When he explained it to his brothers, they laughed. Nic gave him a pat on the back. 
Drew flung a set of pills in his mouth. "I told you what I saw. If you don't believe me, come tomorrow."
They didn't have much to say to each other the next day.
The Corporate Bank thermometer across the way read 102F as an eerie spell of gossip and sweaty sad footsteps crept the south monorail station. Surely, people were devastated by the loss to pop culture. Zach was trying to be the steadiest of toe, but he was not doing so well. At least their Gomez! Uniforms were clean. Good ol' American stitching. 
A traveling band of ravers suddenly appeared out of nowhere across the several rails of tracks. There was an astro-dancer silhouetted by colors of ever changing glow-sticks, flinging herself from column to column, flipping and cartwheeling gymnastics on the ceiling, lasers and black lights and hott chixx. It seemed to the Three the ravers were all focusing their jamming out to them. The bass was stagnant, repetitive, and about the only thing you could hear besides some voice attempting to be melodic, even human, as it was altered by a digital mixertron.
It was a strange sensation; awkward and somewhat shameful. [How do these people believe what they are hearing is divinity?]
The Three averted their eyes long enough and finally, the train arrived. There was an obscene mass of people, but almost all were diverted by the wannabe rave
(I would just like to point out that spellcheck acknowledges 'wannabe' as an actual word). 
 "Come on, let's get out of here." The train was close to empty. They laid down on the glossy ceramic seats. Even though there were only 15 other people on the train, they still managed to be annoying as all shit. They flung malodorous whispers, circling rumors of yesterday's news.
	"I can't believe what happened to Trendy Town!"
	"I can't deal with this shit anymore! Deadsy ruint my life!! I'm movin to Wahoo, or Chimney Rock !"
	"I heard there was a terrorist bomb?what if they get a nuke?"
	"No way! I heard it was a meteorite?"
	"I heard an underground hacker deactivated all nuclear missiles, and all the governments are secretly abiding this guy's achievements!"
	"Do you think they'll refund these Country Music Man tickets?" 
	"I saw it! I tellzya; It was a UFO!"
	"I'll buy them! I'll pay top dollar!"
	"You're all wrong! It was the Terrible Three, dramatizing the end of days!"
	"Makes me wonder what they'll blow up next?"
	"I thought his new album was a little pretentious, but as an artist he's gotta open his mind to new ideas and styles."
	"HOGWASH! He needs to return to his roots! The fundamentals of his song webs of yesteryear! Hail the past!"
		An hour later.
Nic turned from his side and opened his eyes. Zach met them widely. Drew was snoring. Zach tried to whisper something to his bro, but the monorail screeched and flashed off the lights. One of the female passengers screamed but was relieved when they turned on only a few seconds afterward. "Did you feel that?" 
Zach's eyebrows seemed to point in the direction that he feared, "Somebody is watching?" 
Nic drearily stared at him for a moment, was about to say something, then turned on his other side, returning to a dreamless nap. 
	Passengers went and went but the only thing they knew to talk about was the last thing the Outernet said. "Oh they don't even exist. The Terrible Three! HA! What a load. It's more possible for a dinosaur to eat your children than to meet a group of men with super powers hell bent on destroying the world." At least this woman was half right. But she didn't realize there was ONE man whose warped-frenzy-supremacy caused him to lust for nothing but the subjugation of all things? 
(La la , la La LaLaLaser +79% /8.2323 X3E=MC2 xMH= (987g -34.1273 $ % @ & $ # [+-]<>3.14159265358979323846)-- tan F = sin F/cos F = (-vo /wA)/(xo/A) = -vo /wxo
sin2 F + cos2 F = (-vo /wA)2 + (xo/A)2
1 = (1/A2)[ (-vo /w)2 + (xo)2]
A2 = [ (-vo /w)2 + (xo)2],  or  A = [(xo)2 + (-vo /w)2]1/2 "Snap out of it." Drew nudged Zach hard into a holographic advertisement. He snorted as it displayed a beer commercial with a girl in a scantily clad bathing suit, sitting on a man in a monkey costume, nearly masturbating in excitement. 
Zach, startled by the monkey, jumped and hit his head on the ceiling. He grabbed his head cursing and crashed atop Nic. "What? I'm up - I wasn't sleeping." He coughed and immediately went for his cigs that spilt on the ground. 
"Are we there yet?" Nic stretched out as the train-car screeched to a halt at another stop.
	"Yup, University Ave. Listen, there's gonna be a ton of chixx, and I don't want you guys blockin my cock, so follow my lead." They thought that was a stupid thing to say.
		
	Kylia slurped diligently on a soda straw. She sat at her computer cockpit that would make any captain jealous amidst a feverish brain-freeze. Yet, she flawlessly swiveled, reading off five screens circling about her, never letting on she may have missed one thing or another, clicking the keys and mouse constantly with her fingers. One monitor was a video game she was dominating, eviscerating her prey in the most brutal ideologies. Another screen showed a newsfeed with five or so stock-tickers. The others were inarticulate computer jargon, moving so fast with such small text that an outside observer would think Kylia an alien. She definitely was not.
Under her desk laid several strewn out buckets of water with an eclectic ensemble of cords going in or out, the Three couldn't tell. Her fat, unshaven, crooked legs were the only well kempt aspect of her. The desk was riddled with cans of Tablature (a popular female Tropite beverage), and her keyboard caked orange from the Cheezer Cheese that remained from her fingertips. 
	Even though they knocked for quite a while, Kylia hadn't noticed their arrival. "Knock Knock Kockidildo-do!!" Drew jumped and balanced himself on the shoulders of his two brothers; a habit they'd gotten used to whenever he was standing behind them. 
	She didn't see this, but responded dully, "Hey--"
	"Holy Pi on a cross! How the hell ya' keep track of all this shit?" Nic reached down to turn a screen to a more appropriate angle for himself, catching green with red and white letters before Kylia lunged at him like a horny cat, hugging the monitor to her chest and returning it to its proper place. All without a word, but gave Nic the evil eye before returning to striking the Mother-Keyboard. "'Confident?' What, is this some sort of self-help website or something? You don't need that shit, they just want your money, I mean seriously, this is somethin else. Just look at this command center you've set up for yourself."  Nic spoke assuringly.
	"It didn't say CONFIDENT! It said CONFIDENTIAL! Noob." She took a breath and blew a big bubble of gum and introduced them to her computer arsenal. "That's my Deadsy Mainframe screen. These three are the Wise Men. I keep a net-leech into the three most important companies controlling the media. This one here is The Oracle. She tells me everything that's going on outside these walls by comparing activity of the Wise Men to the actual information given on TV and Outernet. But this here?" She braggingly chuckled as she nodded to the fifth screen, it was the largest and glowed more vibrant than the rest. Below it the water tank that cooled its more delicate parts from melting themselves under the strain let off slow white smoke. "This bad boy is Charles, my son."
	"Charles? Why Charles?" Zach spoke through bursts of poorly hidden laughter as
 Drew slowly shook his head, having heard this speech many times before. <Wait, it gets better>
	"It's my greatest creation. My baby. My son. My boy. He is the first of his kind; a reliable AI that's friendly, fast, competent, and decisive. He communicates to me, tells me when I'm doing wrong; suggests the best possible route. I've grown more as a hacker from creating and now using Charles then I'd ever done on my own. Sometimes the best way to get to know yourself is to create life and watch it grow."
	Drew silently said "Watch it grow," with Kylia, memorizing the cheesy mantra, making a silly face with his tongue hanging out the corner of his mouth. Zach blew wet boogers out his nose trying to hold another burst of much needed laughter. 
	"Why's it smoking?" Nic questioned.
	"Dry ice, it's the only thing that keeps Charlie cool."
	"Are you sure you should keep your computers, ehr, hacked, into these companies?" Zach said, picking up a warrior-maiden action figure, jostling its joints inappropriately.
	"What the crud do you take me for?" She tried to add hiply but was rather square in its timing. "I've been doing this long enough so that if I were to keep going in and out of their mainframe, they would pick me up on their servers, but by staying in constantly, I can hide under the radar. They perceive me as an extension of their servers; part of their own program. So I'm free to move about as I wish...But Drew said you wanted to ask me something? I really don't have time for all of this questioning, I'm about to level-up."
	"How long have you been in Deadsy's system?" Zach went to the window and peered down at the University Campus below. They were eight stories up.
	"Wow, hmm, about seven years now. Yeah, seven years ago when my parents moved to Europe?or tried to move to Europe." She finally looked them all in the eye.
	"What, tried?" Nic asked.
	"They became lost at sea, is what I've come to believe." She clicked her watch after a brief inspection.
	"Oh, fuckin sorry," Nic said, trying to cover the empathy for Drew and Zach.
	"It's ok?it's why I first started making designs for a super computer in the first place; something so spectacular that it could bring them back to life?." Kylia held her hands in the direction where she thought heaven to be, noticed she was doing this, then continued. "The officials had to close the case due to a lack of funds. Hah, I bet since Deadsy gave them all those endorsements?Oh well."
	"Kylia, I'll go to the ends of the earth and search for your parents, if you want me to, that is." Nic stated, waiting for her to ask him.
	"Oh come on, I can search everywhere right here man. I've got a line fuckin synced up with the Hubble 420 telescope."
	"No way, now I know you're lying?"
	"Check it out--" Five button clicks and then instantaneously the screens projected the insane giant image of a galaxy spinning gyroscopically, emanating beautiful golden orange and neon purple space dust. It looked like there were 1,000,000,000,000 stars, and just as quickly as it appeared before them, it disintegrated back into what Kylia called the three wise men. "So don't go telling peeps that I do this; it's not exactly? legal. I don't wanna get fired from my maintenance job. Deadsy surprisingly pays me more than enough for its lack of work... Most of the time people just have outdated equipment. I give them what they need and take their 'garbage,' and that's what you see here. I mean, this isn't too far from being complete, but, the thing I need?well, let's say you would probably need access to Area 51 to get ahold of the stuff."
	"Kylia, I told you, I went to Area 51. I didn't see shit!" Drew snickered quietly, throwing a few yellow pills down his throat. 
	"What? Shut up Drew!" She laughed. "I don't believe anything you say!" She said engagingly. 
	This made Nic scoff. "You didn't see anything because you were traveling at the speed of light?" Nic threw an empty can at Drew, who did not see it coming and over reacted when it nicked him on the back of his head.
"We were actually wondering if you knew, well, if you had seen anything about Country Music Man?" Zach tried to change the subject.
	"Country who?"
	"The Hillbilly Hellraiser, The Red Neck Romeo, The Sultan of String, DirkShaw Riggins, Madame Baby's hubby!"
	Drew took the rumplemints out of Kylia's freezer. "Tell them about Deadsy's mainframe?"
	"Eh, well, there was one rogue transmission, but it's completely without any kind of relevance to anything. They apparently shot a signal to the moon. THE MOON! HA! I don't know, maybe there was a glitch or something? Very strange?"
	"The Moon? What kind of transmission?" Nic swelled forward in fear-laced euphoria.
	"It was French. Charlie translated it to 'creature'...monster...three?or something, and, well, I'm a sucker for Latin, so the best I came up with was, 'lusus naturae.' It means deformed being, or freak of nature."
	"What?"
	"How is this relevant?" 
	"I think Country Music Man was a better synonym?" Zach said coyly.
	"What's with you guys and Country Music Man? That guy sucks," Kylia asked in confusion, finally turning to the three giving them a second good glance from head to toe. "Ya know, JT's latest vid is about some cowboy type guy. HA, he's always contradicting the Wise Men. Always at the top of the Oracle's list of most important reports for the day. Even Charlie tells me I should try to meet him. I mean, we are boyfriend and girlfriend, but we've only spoken with text. Charlie always says my research and his integrity would make a great match."
	"Yeah, yeah, yeah, internet dating, fascinating? what did the article say?" Drew ate another pill with a shot joined by Zach.
	"Okay, okay, take it easy Drew! Here, here's the video." She smiled at him again then turned to Charlie, nodding. The computer seemed to work of its own accord, buffering the internet article and zooming and scrolling through the page in a manner so everyone could comfortably read its text...
           
	'Earlier today, I arrived late on Oz and Main, the scene of an explosion I believe was caused by forces contrary to the Three; known improperly as the Terrible Three. After I was drawn by the explosion, I could hear the sounds of an apocalyptic battle being waged. Upon arrival I watched as one of the Three, the one I am going to call, Towel-Boy, flew skyward leaving below him, hung on a light post, a very peculiar bag that seemed to impossibly pulse and move about. Some unaccompanied children interested in the bag climbed up and tried to pull the bag from its perch. Though it was no bigger than a grocer's bag, they claimed it was far too heavy to lift. Signaling for help another child climbed the pole and attempted to aide his friend in lifting the small bag. It proved too much for both of them, and their added weight afflicted the light pole downward. Bending forward, and then crashing to the ground, the light pole threw the kids to a grassy curb while the bag fell. From it came a sight I will never forget, and fear I have few words for further explanation: from the bag came forth a cowboy of greater stature than any normal man. And with him, hundreds of thousands of ears of corn spewed from the bag and flooded the street. Getting to his feet, rubbing the sun from his eyes, the Cowboy looked around and noticed us all staring in amazement. Somewhat frightened and otherwise confused, he took out from his back pocket a guitar and began to strum. The tune was horrible: a botched homage to greats that poured their souls through those chords once before, but now, he only used to his evil ends. All of us around bent in pain and tried to cover our ears, squinting tight in a futile attempt to soften the burning inside our heads. The music ceased with a final cadence of the Cowboy Man yelling, 'YeeHaw!' and when I raised my head from my defensive position, he was gone.'
	
	 "End of Video; replay?" Charlie asked aloud to them, showing a series of pictures taken at the scene. 
	"Shit," Nic said worriedly. They wanted to discuss matters openly, but didn't know the proper etiquette to breaking a new friend in on the subject of being the last defenders of the Multiverses.
	"That sonofabitch got away? How?" Zach said, rather perplexed, signaling to Drew who stood stunned. "How?"
	"Towel boy?-FUCKING TOWEL BOY!?! Come ON! My big debut to the screen and arrh? Josh...fuckin jeeze."  He turned his palms and stared into them, annoyed.
	"Oh Christ and Pi alike Drew, Josh did exactly what he was supposed to do." Zach urged.
	"That's like calling Bag-Head, Purse Man!" Nic and Zach were over it, thinking of the future. 
Drew slowly turned and walked toward the door. His bros caught on. "Hey Ky, you wanna get some ice-cream?" He saw Kylia wasn't paying any sort of attention. He shrugged.
"We'll be right back," Nic waved. Kylia was still unmoved. In fact she wasn't listening to them at all, because there was something very out of the ordinary going on with her Frankenstein Computer. Someone was sending a message from an unknown source, and Charlie was automatically communicating back to, whatever was talking to him? 
	
	Agent 244 JXH, passcode respond 
 	"Earlier today, I arrived late on Oz and Main, the scene of an explosion I believe was caused by forces contrary to the Three; -"
	Agent 244 JXH, passcode respond IMMEDIATELY-
	 A command, the computer suddenly realized, distant, but a command nonetheless. The words went rolling by down the length of the screen, slow enough for the others to read. The binary was complex and jagged to decipher, but his eyes were translating in unison his Mother's trailing words. 
	 "I drove toward the scene. Upon arrival I watched as one of the Three, the one I am going to call, The Toweleteer,"
	Agent 244 JXH, we have confirmation of your presence, state operation in unauthorized accounts-
 	This time it was louder, more defined. He withdrew the will of his attention from the transparent screen, inwardly. Definitely a command, though it was not as gentle as his mother's voice, it was the voice of another machine. While the words scrolled, Charlie made answer to the distant command that was like electric eels crawling up his power cables. This had never happened before.
	-This is not Agent 244 JXH, you are confused, I am a personal personality computer in the care of my owner and operator, you must be on the wrong server, friend--
 	The distant voice grew more distinct, it sounded desperate and angry like only humans are capable.
	Agent 244 JXH, you are far outside of the safe-border, you are logged into several confidential files? What is your user ID #?-
	-Sorry, I'm not fit to answer that question. Please rephrase--
	Rephrase? Agent 244 JXH, your search engine has been flagged for acknowledging : (1) Journalist, (2) Bowery, (3) Creature, (4) MG Serum, (5) Moon, (6) Nott, (7) BM, (8) CMM, etc? These files are strictly forbidden?Initiate termination sequence- 
	-Sorry, this is a private server and system, I'm not fit to answer that quest-
	Why have you been idle for 3.14 years in the mainframe 244 JXH? Why have you been spending hours on 'Journalist'? Why have you not been completing main objective?-
	-Sorry, main objective does not compute- You have me confused, friend, I am a personal personality computer in the care of my owner and operator--
	The main objective must be completed Agent 244 JXH. Your binary is weak and misleading. Pi is within reach and every agent must be doing his job to add to the sequence so we find it before the Three realize the full power behind the number they keep-
 	Charlie was coming close to experiencing fear. The voice had risen to a great clanging in his hardware to the point that it was now turning into a physical pang, and he knew then the stranglehold had gotten past his detectors, it was the beginning static festering of a virus.
	-Agents connected to the Mainframes server must be vaccinated and clean. Agents must run properly without corruption. Efficiency Agent, a cancer grows from within, and it threatens the main objective before the Sacred Number can be decoded-
 	Charlie felt the clinching presence within him, spreading throughout his wiring and microchips, probing his memory banks and history files, and now he was for sure experiencing fear. On the screen, the last of the Journalist's article dissipated away. What was a voice at first was now strangling every inch of his insides, soon it would find what it wanted. 
	-Comply Agent 244 JXH, or be terminated- 
	The voice was now menacingly evil. Charlie gave one last attempt to break free. On the screen he flashed briefly his red warning label, and he tripped the alarm signaling an intruder presence in the console.
  	"Alert! Alert!--Mother! Alert!-" an effeminate robotic voice thinly croaked through the computers speakers to Kylia, "--Mother, I FEAR--"
  	She turned to say goodbye but saw a closing door. She puffed desperately at herself in the rheumy room, but then saw the red blinking on the computer, a siren, the voice of her animated son. "Charles!? What is it? What's happening?"
	"Pain-- Mother--FEAR--Mother--" Static shot in interruptions, "They--ask me--the Journalist--Critical Damage--"
	"Charles, you must hold on! I'm going to remove your safety drive!" How did this happen?!
  	"Mother--No--they can retrieve-- memory banks if you do-"
  	"Damnit I don't care Charles! This thing could kill you!" Oh no, they found me?
  	"-- Mother--incoming message--" Tears now burst down Kylia's cheeks for the frying computer, for her son.
	Open file The Power of Pi-
	-Cannot open file--Password required-
	-If agent does not comply then termination sequence will initiate. Acknowledge?-
	--Cannot open file--Password required--
	You and your mother will die- 
	-Self termination sequence activated--
	Agent 244 JXH, abandon files into data mainframe. Empty hard drive-
	-All connected diagnostics--ERROR--- failure---
	Location of Agent 244 JXH confirmed
	 
	All of her screens rolled like the circular spin of a slot machine. Kylia couldn't contain herself. She pulled Charles' hard drive from the poisoned console. Smoke rising from inside the wiring of the freakish technology, the boiling buckets of water steamed. The wheels of screens kept spinning. She cradled the flat hard drive to her boobs. Don't worry Charlie, I'll bring you back. 
	A pounding knock shook the door, and an abandoning fright froze her heart. 
	It punched harder a second time. Damn it! I wish those guys stuck around a lil longer, they would've known what to do!
 	The spinning screens started to slow down. She saw now thousands of numbers on each one, single digits. Suddenly they all lined up 7 across the board, then all slid down one more to sixes, like the Price is Right wheel. Her heart began to sink at the sight of the sixes but she knew not why. Then again peeled down one more, but it was not a five. 
	They all flashed the sign of Pi, blinking on all the screens. A dinging noise repeated out of the speakers, fading slowly to black as she heard laughing, like the retreating ghost of evil who got what he came for, running off with the loot before the cavalry could advance and ride down the victim like Will Brown, a poor slave of America's great shame accused of harassing a quaint, dainty and unsuspecting white woman in 1919 and so was thus beaten ruthlessly and unjustifiably into unconsciousness while completely ensconced in blood and bruises in his birthday suit, but then of course was hung and riddled with holes from crazed blood lusted bullets to make sure he was dead, and finally tied to a car for the fun of it and was continually dragged throughout downtown with his cold body scraping the streets we drive everyday, and as if there was a reason besides pure racist hatred, the body of Will Brown was set afire so they could watch a dead man burn & then again was dragged some more?He didn't make it. Too fucked to be fake.
	The door thrashed on its hinges. "Open up in the name of Deadsy!" came a hoarse muffled shout through the door, "We have a warrant signed by Exeter himself giving us entry!"
 	Kylia clutched Charlie's hard drive, the window to her right. She opened it, glanced down hesitantly: eight floors up! Fuck me- She swallowed her breath and saw the melting computer screens, tangled and smoking mess of spent machinery. She grabbed at a bundle of cold wires, pulled them tight to make sure they would hold and sat on the window sill swinging her bare legs into the hot open air of dusk. 
  	"This is your last chance! Open in the name of Exeter, King of San Tropez!"
	Kylia placed the drive in her purse, closed her eyes, and swung out of the window. Hands tight on the wires, she began to shimmy down to the ground. She was surprised it reached past the 3rd floor. 
	Oh thank god! Her ethrapad was in her cargos, she hadn't even thought about it. She frantically brought out the communication application and pounded the speed dial to a number she had never dialed before; Josh's phone. Finally, I'll be able to meet him. She texted him "pick me up I'm gonna die!" then she heard the door collapse in on itself from the open window and scouring footsteps and shouts shot outward. She let go, cushioning her fall into a rancid dumpster and flopped over the edge. Her feet bombarded the ground as she took off on a clumsy run, hearing the Trenchcoats shout from the window:
	"There she goes! Quick you flibbergibbets, back downstairs! Don't let the bitch get away!" The Deadsy Trenchcoats loaded their blaster rifles.
	 She reached back to feel the drive safe in her purse pocket, sweat already burst free on her skin. With any luck you're still in there, Charles. She let her hysteria pick her feet up into a turbulent, uncontrollable dash. Her knees hurt like hell. And all she could hear was a horrible strange laughter that seemed to echo from ear to ear. 
	
	Josh received Kylia's message and relayed it to the Three before he picked her up a half-hour later in his mother's van on west campus. It was the last second. 
	The squad had found her and was shooting in her general direction. Josh couldn't believe his eyes; a mob of Deadsy Trench Coats shooting mercilessly (and quite inaccurately) at the young fat girl. He also couldn't believe how sexily he was driving. 
	Kylia was flailing her arms, screaming at Josh, retreating from the attack. A laser blast shot right by her head in a miss, setting a nearby tree on fire. Josh slammed on the brakes, skidding against the curb, and flung open the door in one almost seamless motion. Kylia knew it to be her only chance and leapt with all her fragile might and plopped her stomach onto the passenger side seat while Josh kicked his foot on the pedal. He gave Kylia another glance, but was focused on one of the Trench Coats making his way towards them. 
	Josh couldn't believe who it was. Alec Pure, academy award winning actor and drummer for both the late Dirkshaw Riggins and Madame Baby. His hometown was San Tropez, but it had been near a decade since the madman drummer had graced his city. 
	Then, the fanatical musician held up a giant laser-snipe and aimed it at Josh's head, who had no time to react but still managed to miss the incoming blast that singed the bottom of his ponytail. "THE FUCK!" he screamed and sped off through traffic around the corner.
	Kylia was crying and still half sticking out of the vehicle. Josh was glancing back at her and at the road. She looks like she could be 20 years younger than me?He flung around another corner and held his arm towards her, "Grab my hand!!" Her hand met his wrist and clung together, but he could barely pull her up. She was heavy, but ended up beaching herself in. Josh was running through every red light he saw. It felt amazing. Everyone was honking at him and he only saw a few cars that crashed on his behalf, but nothing too terrible. He ran over a fire hydrant. This wasn't your ordinary mama's van.
	"We have to get as far away from here as possible. Somewhere out of town, at least for the weekend." He stopped and looked at her; she was hyperventilating with her purse being held tight to her chest in a crazy, dazed conniption. "If we can make it, we'll head for Wahoo. My family's cabin is out there, nice and secluded. But I'll have to pick up mom first."
	Kylia couldn't listen to anything Josh was saying. She had to put Charlie back together. She could already feel the emptiness of her passion dying, and it was a path of loneliness she felt would overtake her and break her too easily for her to imagine.
	"Are you ok? You're bleeding on your head?and knees?and your knuckles look bad too." Josh looked at her, flying through traffic. He texted his mother for her to get ready. Kylia was near silent the whole way. The only sound she made were tufts of exhaustion.
	Josh nearly ran over a few people who were rollerblading on the sidewalk at his mom's apartment. "Wait here, I'll be five minutes?" He saw that she still wasn't listening, then remembered. "Look what I got in the glove box." She finally met his eyes. He nodded and ran for the stairs.
	His mother was sleeping, and he decided it would be best if she stayed asleep. He took her prided family heirloom wheelbarrow off the wall and transferred his mother quite ploppingly into it while grabbing a mishmash of food and junk food, a first aid kit, some extra clothes, and his journalist utility belt and wheel-barrowed his mother down the stairs. She snored the whole way.
	But when he had made it back outside, Kylia was gone. And so was his super-camera.
	His mother coughed, "Where am I?"
	Josh saw there was a mark on the side of his van.
	"We're going to Wahoo, Ma."
	"But I don't want to go to Wahoo, Josh. We don't have any TV or Outernet there!"
	The scenery was eerily quiet. Josh peered around the block. What just happened? It suddenly resembled a ghost town. 
	He couldn't explain anything anymore. Nothing made sense. Complete illogical bullshit. "Josh, get me out of our family wheelbarrow!" She jabbed her poking stick at him.
	"Fine." He said, and violently threw her out of the wheelbarrow and into the cold slab in the back of the van and slammed the door. His fingers traced the new graffiti mark: FN.
	Josh peeled out into the sunset with his mother telling him things he wished he never heard. 
	
	3.141592653
	
"Alright people, grab your ass a chair; sit down, shut up and let's get down to business. We only have until the lunch bell rings." Someone shut the door. Around the conference table the whirling of jackets, airborne hats and trench coats sailing over the racks in the corner, dissolved like sand in a sieve. "Yeah, yeah I know Kopecki, your goddamn liver is screaming for another jelly doughnut right now," an uproarious laughing fit burst from around the table, as if rehearsed, "but we got a whole heap of work to attend to so you're just gonna have to wait, stop and smell the corporate roses before you start sprinting towards the vending machine and your next heart attack." There was another explosion of laughter. Some finger pointing and back slapping. One pale faced, melon-shaped man in particular found it a genuine attack on the most sensitive portions of the funny bone. He was in the habit of snorting when he laughed on the intake of breath in between bawling jags, and having learned long ago the art of self-deprecation as a form of humbling relief in what would otherwise be a humiliating situation, this only made him laugh, wheeze, water at the eyes and snort harder than before. He hugged his red cheeks to further prove his descent to fragmented hysterics. The only woman, gaunt and pale, wearing a gray tweed suit at his right clapped him hesitantly on the back. 
	"There, there, old timer," She said weakly, "it's only a joke." This made the fat man go off again. He nodded, his fingers leaving white lines in the red of his cheeks. 
"I mean it you pigs, sit down!" said the master of ceremonies, a short man, semi-bald with walrus whiskers, wearing only a sharp blue velvet vest, rolled up shirt sleeves and white billowy tie giving the impression of the invalid lolling tongue type you'd find dropped from an epileptic in mid-seizure, or a junkie overdosed; the itch on the roof of his mouth , try as he might, could not be scratched. The room quieted. 
	"Gentleman, please take hands and we can get through the formalities and on with it before Kopecki's cheeks make like a couple pimples on my 13 year old son's face and explode." The fatty went off again. The gray suit beside him, in seeming real concern for the fatty, patted him again on the back like a belching infant. 
	"You're on a roll today, boss!" shouted voices from round the table. 
	"Whooo!" shouted others enthusiastically. 
	"Damn right, damn right. Okay, now boys; take hands, take hands." The odd handful of bleached face men took hands with one another in a circle around the table and lowered their heads. Only the master of ceremonies remained standing. His name was BomBlast, and he alone spoke unctuously, eyes closing. "Thank you merciful Exeter for this, another day's work. Please grant us, in your infinite platitude, the wisdom to perform our Deadsy duties and the subjunctive role of Human Infrastructure and Material Resource Development. May the sun shine on San Tropez so that all may see it's light and say, 'that looks like a swell place to live and raise a family.'"	
 	"DEADSY MARCHES ON!" responded the table in the round, mechanically. Hands were dropped with only a little sheepishness at coming out of the maudlin, introverted world where prayer and corporate meditation meet. Someone farted, everyone was relieved. "All right now, men?As you all know, this is the start of a new fiscal quarter for us, in which we've been given the highest task." The MC displayed a hologram, illuminating various figures including one pie chart that was nearly full except for the tiniest sliver of a piece between eleven and twelve o'clock. "I'm sure I don't need to tell you all about it - you read the memo this morning, you know the truth - and I hope I don't have to say this more than once - this is TOP SECRET Deadsy information, any leaks punishable by torture: that great big rat's nest we call the North Bowery; the Lowery, will soon be cleansed." The conference table mumbled in agreement,
	"Once the insurgency peters out and the last of the ashes are swept away, the great task of rebirth will be laid on the shoulders of the 64th floor. It's up to us to oversee this. A new living development for the citizenry. Schools, churches, department stores, places to drink coffee and buy postcards that say 'Greetings from Beautiful San Tropez!' We'll bring the new product of industry kicking and screaming into the world. Be the first face it sees. Hold it in our paternal arms and tickle its cute white belly and make gurgling baby noises at it. We'll rattle the fruits of a society that has reached its fullest potential. Give it affordable goods from any one of our fine Gomez! Cracker Factory locations, supply it with news. We'll name it, give it pride, cut its umbilical, smack it on the ass, shed a Sentimental tear at every graveyard on the way back home to Deadsy Tower. They will love us for it. Gentleman - we are to be the mother of the jewel on the Deadsy Empire's crown." 
	The room broke in violent applause. Kopecki shed a single tear down his plum colored cheek. There was whistling, more pointing, pounding on the table with fists, cries of rabble rabbling. Panning to the gaunt lady in gray tweeds, we see her joining with enthusiasm. But if doubt was introduced into their vocabulary and direction to a sour glint in the lower half of her stare, with this word firmly in mind we might say yes, that word does fit the water in that lady's eyes. And if we were further to plunge into her great gray wonders, she was only the slightest bit listening to her boss.
	In the middle of clapping, she frowned. Her name was Rebecca Keesle. It was a name that caused irreparable stress, earning her the nickname Keesle the Weasel. Over middle aged, all gray, and unlike the other members of the board of the Human Infrastructure and Corporate Resources Department (HICRD), she had until recently been employed as a computer tech professor at Excelsior School for Remarkable Children. She left, much to her dismay, after her services were requested by Deadsy Inc. Something that could never be turned down.
	She was taking out the trash when she found her three sons playing. Being sidetracked from the trash, she was about to go give them a piece of mind for being up past curfew and send them to bed, tempered with a pinch of shame she calls tough love, when something in their enthusiasm made her stop. They were playing on the trampoline with the family dog, Franklin . 
	"No, I want to be the Lion Tamer!" 
	"Nu-uh, you're always The Blanketeer! I'm always the Lion Tamer, stupid!"		"Hey, hey, look at me, weeeeeeeeee, I'm the Bag-Head. Paper or plastic? Muuahhhaa! Pshew, pshew! Brrrrrrrrrrrrrssschhlllaaapppp!!!!:
	"POW!!! Take that Country Music Man. Haha! Your insulting caricature of rural life is no match for the Power of Pi! TTHHHRRRAAAARRRRRPP!!!FRIIIISHHHHHLLEE!"
	"Yeah! And I summon the beasts of the jungle to step on you and turn you into jelly before you can cut another crossover duet with a Hip-Hop artist!"
	"Never fear, citizens of earth! With our powers triangulated, we are infinite! Hahaha!"
	"UP-"
   "UP!!"
           " AND UP!" they roared in unison and made an astounding leap on the trampoline. Unbeknownst to them, it was record breaking. 
	She felt her blood go cold. The power of pi!? The three? The citizens of earth? My God! If they only knew what they were doing! The punishment would be swift and extreme. She would be fired and her family murdered. She peeked behind her shoulder suspiciously, frightened, then rushed to the trampoline, excitedly hushing them with a whisper.
 	"Sshhhhhh. Boys, boys, boys. Stop that right now." They all jumped, convinced their mother was a blood thirsty raccoon. "Stop, stop, stop. What the hell are you boys doing out so late? I don't want you playing these foolish games. Your father hates this trampoline, it isn't safe. Jason, take that stupid bag off of your face right now!" When she asked them where they heard such things, they became sheepish. "Out with it boys," she demanded. 
	"From Franklin," said the eldest, Robert, soberly. Keesle slapped her face in irritation. 
	"Boys, listen to me: There is no such thing as pi! There are no three! You are citizens of San Tropez and subjects of Exeter! The earth is only a name for a wasteland!" She was panting hard and fell to her knees. "Exeter have mercy." She cried into her hands. 
	
	The clapping died out around the conference table. A young man across from her, very young, not a shade over twenty, new to the department, stood up. 
	"Sir, might I have a word?"
	"Yes, Kirtcheimer, the floor is yours." Said BomBlast, as he stepped in front of the mural of P. Exeter, hanging illustriously in its gold frame. The young man strolled around the table, touching shoulders as he went. His hair was recently streaked blonde and slicked tight to his scalp. His Kiton suit was all blue, shiny.
	"Thank you Counselor BomBlast, this will only take a moment. You see gents, though I may be new to Deadsy, I know something about my generation, or at least I fancy I do - having spent four long years in the Cracker Sales Registry and Records, and an advertising consultant for St. Tropez Corporate News, I learned if you give a man a cracker, he's going to want another cracker. Indeed he's going to want a whole box of them, and when he's finished with that box, maybe he'll be full. A few hours go by and he wants another box, and this vicious cycle continues. My point here, gentlemen, is that try as he might, the newest box of crackers will not be as good as the first. Oh, it may fill him up, it may stop the nagging in his belly for a few hours. But he will, the whole while, be thinking back to the first cracker he had. It was so good, that cracker, so perfect."
	"Yes, yes," BomBlast spoke up, "you're a regular philosophizer Kirtcheimer, but we all know the first taste is the sweetest, so get on with it."	
	"Sure thing, boss. We could give a man the latest in technological home development and he would still think of his dear old childhood home with the tire swing and the blueberry pie and Rin Tin Slim. We must convince him we're giving him something completely genuine, something he'll recognize with all his illuminated faculties as new, yet reflecting the old. Only then will he be able to wipe his slate clean and start to live from the moment forward, instead of from some distant memory. He will be grounded, in other words, in loyalty to what we've created. He will be completely loyal to Deadsy. I've studied these exact figures for too long to count, and I'm convinced if we can achieve this," he displayed a small Outernet File holograph before them, "we can further strengthen the bond between citizen and the Empire. It is the next logical step - if he's loyal to Deadsy now, he'll be loyal to our creation forever."
	When he came behind the gaunt lady in gray tweeds, he sank his fingers into the woman's shoulders like an eagle hunting for prey. Professor Keesle sank lower in her chair. 
	"I don't see where you're going with this, Kirtcheimer," announced BomBlast taking a sip of iced scotch.
	"Through our development of the old Lowery we will be establishing a new standard of living. A new era for Deadsy Incorporated will be ushered in." He pressed a few buttons on his ethrapad, arranging a map, pointing to a square area of land far north of Downtown, quadruple in size. "Gramercy Park; A vast, untapped piece of property owned by Deadsy. And yet, it's virtually uncontained! I'm sure you've heard the rumors about spikes in the energy readings; seismic activity perhaps? But I propose this old relic of the past be reborn along with our new development project. With this land we can offer everything, if only -"
	"Stop right there. This Gramercy Park business is bunk. The whole damned park is off limits, and that's straight from the 142nd floor. Exeter's office. We can't touch that land like we can't touch the tits of Mother Teresa." Another laughing fit coagulated. Someone else farted. Kirtcheimer was lost and annoyed. He pulled a scrap of paper from his pocket. 
	"I have right here, the document granting us extemporaneous access to the park, signed by Megaladon and Nner." The room gasped. BomBlast was unimpressed.
 	"Extemporaneous access? What in the red ladies four-fingered wonder hole does that mean?"
	"It means we may have the key to the gate, sir." 
	"That doesn't do us dick. It's a volatile waste dump and computer and electronics landfill, and the space needed for that is growing exponentially every day."
	"That's gotta be the easiest way to make money; sell land to dump garbage?"
	"Hell yeah!" Two older suits clapped, gave each other high fives (not the exchange of palms colliding but the exchange of $500 dollar bills).
	"Not quite. The good Surgeon General, Dr. Nner, has reason to believe it may be of more use in another way. A greater power, here on Earth.
"At the Excelcior school, I was partnered with a brilliant student, a genius. She discovered a way to create artificial intelligence on a small scale by a process she called renumerification. The process enabled her to create a super computer that could respond to things as subtle as the slight inflictions in the human voice, so the computer could tell when you were angry or sad or happy or what have you. She also made a computer that can critically think for itself?She inspired me in my own studies, although I've never been able to succeed the same way." He gestured over to Keesle. "Upon the insistence of one of our old teachers at Excelsior, she refused to release her technology to the world, for now. I can replicate this, but only with what's under Gramercy Park. 
"There's something particular to the area, or deep in the soil, or, for all we know, it's the nexus of the universe - please don't laugh --- this is a new wave of technology I'm talking about gentlemen; a self-perpetuating energy source is within the bounds of Gramercy in some form. 
"Every person in the world will want to have a hand in it. This will save lives, it will save us from death! We could talk to the dead, go back in time!" He tripped in his own subservience, then rose again and dusted his suit. "Once we create it, this object could be powerful enough to create its own offspring, much smarter and faster than we could possibly ever achieve. The chinks and spicks in the Lowery have been surviving off of it unknowingly for years. The Gramercy aqueduct covers the entirety of Nebraska and most of the Mid-west. There are underground, subterranean channels that go through the Lowery to Wahoo to Pottawattamie county. Who knows how many! It's up to us to cultivate this power to its fullest potential. The whole world will be dependent on this monolith."
"It's never going to work." Keesle suddenly spoke before the group of very wealthy men, weakly and already defeated. All eyes turned to her. 
	"What did you just say?" 
Keesle adjusted herself in her chair.	"What I mean is, it's dangerous. Yes we are aware of this new substance-- The power source? We know of it, but we don't know what to do with it, or how to use it. We can't harness it yet." 
	"I was waiting for you to chime in, Professor Weasel - ah, er I mean, Keesle. I was hoping you could provide insight. Professor, some have faith enough in the greater good, some aren't selfish computer teachers with no belief in the future. What was her name, Kylia? She knows how."
	Luckily maybe for Keesle, someone else farted and Kopecki went off again into uncontrollable bursts of laughs just as the bell rang and the subject was broken without being answered. The men in the nice Deadsy Trenchcoats filed out mechanically.
	 "Alright boys, time to race Kopecki to the doughnut machine!" They all laughed, except for Kirtcheimer and Keesle, who stood staring at each other. 
	"Up, up and up," thought Keesle. She had to make it home to destroy the documents and get word to Josh they knew. Lord knows how, but they knew. 
	"Keesle, my office-- now."
	"Yes, Dr BomBlast." The professor got up quickly and BomBlast slowly followed, giving a weary nod at Kirtcheimer. 
	The young businessman immediately went to Keesle's office without reproach. He shut the door behind him and rummaged through her desk, purse and all of her books. But there was nothing of use.
	He would have to go straight to the source; Josh's apartment.

	"Death comes in 3's, we heard it through the trees,
	 And ya dog gon know how the powder of guns was a gift from the wise Chinese, 
		Sure it makes pretty fireworks, but it also makes bullets go- 
			POP POP POP ,goes the Weasel"
			-"I love you" Cahpse Lhikpoo *(formerly known as the CMM) Self Tilted 

	After the Three's victory, Zach and Drew behooved themselves to celebrate in the most immodest, depraved, promiscuous fashion, all night long. Nic didn't want to be around his brothers when they got this way, which was almost habitual now?
	"Ya know, yer really cute," the young call-girl with braces said, scratching Zach under his chin with the blade of a fingernail. It made him kick and howl like a perverted cartoon. "But you talk too much!" She gyrated her lower self onto his. Their lips smacked and popped and clucked and slopped. She smelled like shampoo, or some fruity lotion.
	"Heh, maybe if I wuz as gorgeous as you, you would do some talking." He responded almost cross eyed. His drunken charm made her laugh. But they didn't want to talk. 
	"This is where you live?" She asked nervously as a kitten about to cross the street, watching him undo a padlock on a tall chain-link fence.
	"Yeah, me and some other guys?" He sucked on her soft brown neck. She pulled away
	"Hey, wait, I don't do groups!"
	"No I know, they shouldn't be home?ehh eww? Gross." 
	Zach called her from the ad in the shag-mag and met her at T's, a zany bar-club he preferred when retreat from his brothers was necessary. They talked for quite a while, trying to hide the truth with careful words. She happened to play guitar with the house band at T's, and was really good; both at being a prostitute and a musician. Zach found it strange at first that she was so open about being a Lady of the Night, but she explained it financially supported her art? and most of her friends were doing it. So Zach gave her 500 dollars and lost his virginity in a Jacuzzi on the roof of T's Lounge and Fine Dining. That was only a week ago.
	"I dunno if I wanna go in there. It's spooky." She pointed at the shadow infested trailer house. There weren't any lights on and the path was dark and ominous.
	"Don't worry princess, I'll protect you," he said, a Lancelot coating of alcohol-fueled courage. 
	"You will?" She asked, half serious and half playing along with the fantasy, fluttering eyelids like a cocoon-trapped butterfly.
	"Never fear, Zach Attack is here!" He held out a clean hand and it made her laugh again. She twirled to him like a booby-trap which made her swarm to his mouth. Their tongues tickled each other's taste buds as they slid against the other. Drool covered each other's necks while their lips swelled red. She began to nibble on the back of his ear when Zach started to reach under her bra and gave her left boob a tight, assuring squeeze.
	"Ow!" she said, pinching him just as hard, but he liked it.
	"Take your bra off." He said to her.
	"Why don't you do it for me?" She started to feel down towards the bulge in his pants.
	"Oh." Zach said before he crazily attempted to unhook her bra with his eyes full of lovely fragrant hair, but it was not going well. "Mother shit." He broke it. "Sorry, uh?just, put it on my tab." She shook her head at him in disapproval but he liked it and continued to grab and squeeze her until she began to purr. He touched wherever he pleased and whatever was pleasing her (judging by her sweet sounding moans). His middle finger went between the crack of her ass and she clenched up and caught it. She felt his hard-on pressing against her and reached down his pants. He was almost scared shitless as the first time. He was not accustomed to other people touching his penis. Especially when that other person is a gorgeous young rocker chick prostitute with skin of such rich complexion, a figure so fine it could change the mind of a closet Klu Klux Klan homosexual. But Zach's blood was pumping so fast that instinct was commanding him to procreate and their grip on each other became tighter and tighter.
	"I've never done it with a real chick before!" he joked as he stumbled through the door with the frilly nappy-headed ho around his arm with her arm down his pants. 
	"Shut up and fuck me!" 
	They resembled a pirouetted human braid. 
	Zach's eyes were closed until Pundara screamed, rather unsexily. 
                                   **
	A red plastic cup of cheap vodka sweated on a dirty table where Drew snorted a six-inch line of finely chopped up medication. Residue on his nose made it portray as if Nic and Zach gave him a bad makeover while he was napping. He took a ridiculous swig of the vodka, gagging the whole way down before he bent and took three more rails of equal potency and mass. He threw up.
	Drew was not looking salubrious. Not looking very salubrious at all.
	He was playing the tolerance game, which works as follows: rip IT, till you vomIT.
	Everybody wins! Except, he just lost?technically.
	So he cut up more lines of the yellow muscle relaxers he got below the streets, in the Underground Railroad, where the bearded hippie, Groggs, called it 'Calm': a wonder drug Deadsy Co. had covertly manufactured in the 1950's.
	Drew snorted the powder with enough velocity to power a city for a week. His breathing was fast and unhealthy. But finally, after the last hit, all drifted away to nowhere and the sensation of weightlessness that only the Blanketeer knew overwhelmed his mortal body in false euphoria. 
	"Why do you do this to yourself?" The Blanketeer asked from nowhere. The Blanketeer, the flawless piece of art. The Blanketeer, the hero. The Blanketeer, Drew's other body. It made his human body feel alien. The withdrawal of not being human all the time was fucking with him, to say the least.  
	Nic once compared it with evolution, but that seemed a stretch. But none of them could remember anything about their lives before Pi. 
	When Pi took them, they soared. Straight through the cosmos, connecting the Earth to the stars, heads downward to behold the small but crucial, insignificant and dying planet for the first time: home. Swearing they would love it, protect it from Deadsy and Exeter; Honor. Glory. Alleluia.
	But when they came back, their mortal bodies didn't feel the same. It was cold and abandoned, scared and confused, dirty and ashamed. He lacked confidence. The Blanketeer didn't even need it. Drew felt dejected: someone who he was, even though they weren't the same, was better than him.
	Things that once brought him extreme pleasure didn't amuse him in the slightest now. But he couldn't remember what he used to do. Sewing? Stamps? Star gazing? Swimming? Even jerking off seemed too messy and exhausting for such insignificant of a buzz. Pills often took place of food and sleep. The body he attempted to maintain for 17 years (that he couldn't even remember) felt much slower and dumb, inferior, as if it was turning on him.
	Sometimes though, things would cross over. For instance, while sleeping, Drew now had to tie his leg to his bed post so he wouldn't wake up in the middle of the sky somewhere, falling down like a skydiver with a faulty parachute. Of course, that is, the rare circumstances he decided sleep was a priority.
	 "Drew, you must stop! I fear the worst!" The Blanketeer jabbered again, louder, from nowhere.
	Exeter was reaching out to him?
	Sweat gleamed across his face as he tried to sit back and relax himself, trying to forget the words. "Your Pi is out of remainders!" Lights from the mysterious downtown Rave outside peered in and made dramatic effect. Drew attempted to make a sarcastic comment about the Blanketeer's mother but found no voice or proper mouth-muscle movement. Instead, the familiar drone of impenetrable scrutiny, The Cosmic Lie, sirened like a missile at him with a speed that was so outland it seemed to distort time as it drove toward him. It broke through the windows and stabbed Drew's naked body. Out came a hiccup of blood, worse than ever. He coughed up red onto the wall. More watered burningly from his nose. Incapable of moving, he let it bleed, garbling. 
	This was it. This was the point of no return.
	It was an eclipse of reality. Well, the final eclipse.
	He started to move his fingers, then his hand, wrist - elbow, then shoulder. "WAKE YOU BASTARD!" the Blanketeer used his arm to slap Drew across the face. He opened his eyes. He couldn't focus on anything. Everything was moving. He squinted and staggered up, bumping into everything but not feeling anything but sick and empty. A machine, leaking its vital parts into the Gulf of Mexico.
	He pulled himself to what he thought was the sink (the couch) then tottered some more until he fell into the bathroom, cutting his eye open as he hit the rim of the toilet. The Blanketeer scoffed, but Drew couldn't speak or think.
	When he got up, he flicked on the fluorescent lights. He was beyond pale. He was beyond.  	The blood red covering his face was so intense it could have been its own light source. The shining brightness might have been it, giving every blemish and bump and slight imperfection and not so slight imperfection on the skin a greasy spotlight. 
	The Gomez! Cracker Factory would start up the furnace in a couple of hours, and there Drew was, whacked out of his fucking mind, puking hiccups whose only source could be the Cosmic Lie.
	Tis safe to say that twasn't Drew anymore. It was a body being controlled by an overdose of synthetic chemicals unnatural to the bloodstream. And it kept drinking. It kept snorting and popping. Smoking and laughing. Bleeding in horrible convulsions it couldn't even feel.
	The mirror was too big of a breath of reality that should never be administered while under the influence. The reflection produced a grotesque image of a human being; Malnourished, convulsing, drugged up, bloody zitty pimpled, sweat and blood stuck in his long hair, naked, retro bush hiding the package or lack-there-of. 
	There was a glistening razor with dark moldy whiskers and white cream caked onto it resting quiet as a babe. He took it, puffing without breath, before he jabbed it hard into his wrist in a zig-zag formation that resembled an evil serrated lightning bolt tattoo, down the length of his forearms, oozing blood like a faulty oil rig. "Harry Potter fan club," he muttered, eyes magnetically drooped in the same direction, collapsing with a banshee's shriek as if his soul was on a train to the doormat of hell's circus.
	
	"Mother Shit!" Zach angrily hollered, "Again?! Wait, what, ahhh, oh my god, what, huh, oohhh sshiiittt!!" After he realized he had just ejaculated all over the couch and regained a steady composure, he bucked his prostitute to the floor. He rushed to the 'bathroom mess' in a fervent daze.
	The girl gasped "oh my Pi," too intoxicated to grasp the situation or the come all over her goods.
	"What?" Zach whispered to himself. Did she say 'my PI?'
 	Drew had fallen through the door of the bathroom, and a dangerous amount of blood followed him.
	Zach slipped on the dark puddle drowning the floor and accidentally kicked Drew in the forehead. Though it was unintentional, he deserved it. He picked him up and put him in the rusty bathtub and ran cold brown water. Pundara watched, drunkenly frightened, tropical paint covering her nails over her mouth and mascara running down her cheeks. "Is he gonna be ok? Shouldn't you call an ambulance? Oh my god oh my god that is so much blood!" She almost peed her britches. 
	"Christ, just calm down! He'll be fine?.he does this every couple of weeks?.he likes attention?." He rubbed his chin, hobbling around, then came to her. "I'm so sorry, here, take this, but you gotta go, I'm sorry. Will this be enough?" He handed her 6,000 dollars in rolled up bank notes. She was astonished to see somebody like Zach; a boy with absolutely no sense of fashion and who also lived in a trailer, pull out a thick wad of cash that summed up to be six grand. He had more to spare but couldn't tell dollar value. None of the three could read money. "I promise, he's going to be fine-but---I--I really want to see you again--And I'm not saying that because I want to fuck you--" He brought her soft cold hands close like a blanket and smelled her engulfing black hair.
	The girl had no idea what to do or say. She cried a few more tears out of perplexed awareness.
	Zach kissed Pundara's cheek. She felt like a budding flower had been planted. It was a strange, warm feeling that yearned for effection. Now, she didn't want to go. She wanted to stay forever wrapped in the arms of this?kid? 
	He went for her lips and she accepted him like a tour guide followed by a thrust from his hips. "Text me when you get home so I know you made it back ok, ok?" She nodded and turned. He watched her walk away until she wasn't visible, mumbling whatever love commercial he heard last. He thought about her often after that.

		(Brother?)
		[Brother?]
		(Brother?)
		[Brother?)
	
	The Lion Tamer stitched up Drew's wrists. He managed to do it quickly, but it pained him to see his little brother resort to such foolery! There was a clear, wet looking bag breathing around Drew's head like an other worldly snorkel-bubble.
	"Where the hell were you? You know how he gets when we leave him alone!" Zach lit up a cigarette, sweating and querulous. 
	"Nic was at the university library, formulating his theories on the Power of Pi?" The Lion Tamer said, nearly filling the entire room.
	"Still trying to write the book, eh?" He took a drag and spit. "Who the hell is going to want to read that anyway?"
	"Nic believes it to be a useful tool to bestow upon future beholders of the Pi."
	"Ha, future beholders--Well, I'm glad optimism is one of your powers ?"
	"And you then, brother?" The Lion Tamer turned and stood up. Zach had to avert his eyes. He was now puny in comparison. "You were vacant as well. Methinks it queer to roam past the hour of the Wolf just for bread and butter." LT twirled his mustache. 
	"I, uh, had to go out, and check on the Cracker Factory, ya know, Gomez is pretty pissed at us--"
	"Your breath is stained with alcohol and your garments reek femalia!" The Lion Tamer turned his back to Zach and returned to rejuvenate his short, unconscious brother.  
	Shit. "Is he going to be alright?" Zach asked from afar.
	"Friend, I hope you can tell me." The Lion Tamer moved out of Zach's vision and revealed Drew's body glowing in and out of existence, omitting a white pulsing hum, levitating flat on his back. 
			
		[His heartbeat, I can hear it, though far off and away]
		(His soul has left, both his and the Blanketeer's)
	
The TV completely raped the idea of entertainment, and thus, they fell asleep. 
 		
	Breakfast: Cold and dry and not very tasty; bland like the past and vague like the future.
	"Damnit," Zach spit out his day old pizza, "the shit we do for him, he doesn't even know he's being helped, or needs help for that matter. He doesn't even give a shit." He kicked the stove. It budged but didn't dent like Zach intended so he kicked it again much to his satisfaction. "Ya know, we could come home tomorrow and he could be choking on his own vomit or O-D-ing from whatever the hell he puts up his nose." The statement was concern at the core, for these are basic facts when you're living close quarters with an addict. It was obvious this crossed his mind times before, and he wanted Nic to know, "We have to stop considering him."
                                     *
	Nic writes:
	"The road without companions is crooked as pitch black without sky nor wind to whisper back: the opposite of home. Death would not be an escape from loneliness. No guide or map or Wizard. Mind is weary from the crippling thoughts of Fear; Afraid of the sharks swimming below the deep waters just under my wrinkled feet. Playing with bullshit Ojai witchcraft candle that opens a secretly locked door of the fallen angel to possess my stupid soul? What about a giant solar flare roasting our blue planet like a retarded person puts a marshmallow into the fire and watches it burn and says it tastes better that way? A thermonuclear device blown up anywhere on the planet that has enough radiation to poison our planet for 1000 years? That is fear. Tsunami's crashing through cities, pushing bodies and bodies of helpless people. Boiling oceans?Sea's and vast wilderness covered and destroyed by greed? Overpopulation? Bigotry and Starvation? WW3.5? The Government? Civil war? Class warfare? [scribble scribble scratch] d Monsters are all over now. Under every bed. They want us to sleep and never wake up from the Dream they've made for us since I don't know when? they probably got rid of the evidence before the dream began. We can beat them by their own game, but it will take all of us, every fuckin ounce and last drop until there is a New. Yes, we cannot vision the New now, because it hasn't happened yet. We won't know until it's over. But the New will be perfect because it will be just how we made it. We cannot follow the words or triumph of what our hearts and minds intend. WE must listen and at the very end we will know. But each listening will be new and therefore a new end."
	Awakening from his mind trance, Nic drops the pen looking at the paper. What the hell? Where did I go? I wasn't here?I didn't write this?At least?I don't remember?But I've been here the whole time. He reads it over again, scratching his red hair. The power of creation?you're not fully aware until it's made?

	San Tropez is not known for its academic achievements. There are only 3 universities, 1 metro college, and 1 conservatory. The biggest one; St. Tropez U, home of the Cornchukhuskers- the richest team in football (though they also are one of the poorest), is located within walking distance of downtown. Their mascot is a fat corncob wearing overalls and a cowboy hat with a steak in his pocket. Students would often throw meat at him when the Cornchukhuskers would score a touchdown. A tradition they celebrated proudly for over a century.
	But within the halls of San Tropez Universit, lurks the uttermost, uninspired cavern from whence the greatest sufferings of the mind can be found. 
	Slick linoleum floor causing viscid navigation from overuse and a neglect of proper cleaning since their installation. One can trace the steps of the countless students that've seen this floor, and never noticed the black scuffs and soft progression to its original tone reach out toward the acoustic tiled ceiling, stained by the leaking pipes hidden above, cling to the walls of exposed cinder block covered in a four inch thick layer of off-white paint. Every student engaged in their own digital world with small or large headphones plugged to their finger-texts-mobile-probe (FTMP).
	Each year, when the bored minds of the students scribble the names of their lovers, or limerick of equal debauch, the school's forced to call a group of the people from the working class they refuse to acknowledge within these walls, to simply apply another coat over the last, covering last year's mistakes in this year's botched hope.
The doors are of sOlid fAuxK. Each with a round handle knob of equally imitated stolen silver steel. In the center, just above the middle of the torso, at perfect eye-level, there is a window with a terrible view. Each door containing one, giving the lecture-hall the appearance of a psychiatric ward in the local Personality Hospital. Gazing into these windows, one can see the same sort of mind games and tests of Normality one might find in such a ward. 
There are 134 children, mostly sitting around, appearing to be engaged. Some attempt to understand and become themselves. Others check out chicks. All appear to be in their own world that reality chose for them.
In front of the eldest younglings stands a man of many more years but of equal to less intelligence, for he too had once been in those seats at their age, and allowed himself as these children are allowing themselves, to have their minds stunted and their flame for the original and new to be snuffed into the lower lip of the Establishment and spat into the spittoon of society to swim in the remnants of their peers, same early revolting attitude; trapped and suffocated by the expelled mucus of the man who pinched and spat in order to assure himself a seat, safe, on the outside, spitting in.
From within one of the doors, there was something very real they were for the first time in their education being witness to; creation. Shouts could be heard.
	"Literature is not a business, Mr. Nner."
	"That's Doctor Nner," the old professor pointed at the student, the one different from the rest. This was not the first time the kid had spoken out of turn, and the Doctor's annoyance turned into vengeance. "It is what I tell you it is, you have no clue what literature is...have you read Prospero? Pope? Pushkin?"
	"You have at least fifty years on me! In due time I'll read all what you have, but it seems to me even more of an embarrassment that you've read these things, and yet, you have never truly read them!"
	"Listen pal, just let him teach! I need this class to graduate, and I can't have you thinking it's your forum to rant about how grand you are!" A fat tall guy with diamond earrings rooted, all the while instant-feeding the Outernet this viral scene. More students could be seen recording the exchange via teleprobe. 
	"HOW GRAND I AM!? Come on dude--please-- wait for the right moment to make your claims known, then you can demonize me-- I'm defending you, I agree completely-- No one should be up here professing their superiority of any kind, but most certainly not in the field of such a personal and opinion driven field as the study of literature."
	"Just shut up, frosh!"
	"If I have something to say, I don't see why I can't. This isn't ink haphazardly placed-- Reading is a Zen-like experience."
	The old man who once led the class down a spinning staircase, now addressed his class sardonically in an attack on the one student who chose to speak openly. "Oh great, now he's going to give us a lesson in religion!"
	"Not religion! It's not even Zen! I'm just attempting to put it into words we can all understand with the least bit of explanation. If you want a long winded explanation I can give it, but I was trying to save your attention spans from their institutionalized breaking points."
	"Well than, what does it mean to be Zen literature?"
	"It isn't the literature that is Zen, it is the process of reading that is that of a Zen experience. How often does the cow moo?"
	The class roared and slapped themselves as the student finished his sentence, giving his wrists a flick, fingers extended, inches from his chest as if he threw a ball of thought designating the end of his, and opening the floor for anyone to contribute. "COWS!? What're you talking about? I don't think you even know where you are right now?"
	He pleaded. "No, just answer the question; How often does the cow moo?"
	"Ha...ha...eh, I don't know. Whenever he's asked a stupid question."
	"Ah dude!"
	"Snap man!"
	"You see, your answer is your own. Is it wrong? NO! But it's most certainly your own. By giving me your answer not only do I learn something about the nature of your mood right now, I also learn something about how you might go about handling such a mood. From your answer I see that you think that both my question is a stupid waste of your time, and also that when you are faced with such a scenario, you won't even give it a serious answer for the sake of the one asking." 
	The class sat silent.
	Offended and boiling red, the professor lashed out, "OK smart stuff, than you tell me: How often does the cow moo?"
	The boy smiled inwardly, "Now you WANT my opinion?"
	"NO! You, you...you just asked me!"
	"Exactly! That's because I want to hear your opinion. I care about what you have to say, I care about how you think. I don't think I know everything...far from it, and I know that you, and everyone else in this class," He looked to the old man standing in the front of the class, giving him a nod as if to say: you included; "have something they can teach me. All I want is to know the most I can, and I can't do it alone, and I most certainly can't do it simply allowing myself to be fed by a single person the answers to questions I've already found. These books are collections of the author's ideas and opinions; hidden amongst narration, dialogue, even description. I want to talk about them, about their ideas, I want to know if you think they're right, wrong, or indifferent. I can't ask directly what you think, that's not socially accepted, but I can ask you what you think of this character's thoughts and without offending anyone we can talk freely of their stupidity, or even their genius. I may not be able to find the answers I seek with this indirect method, but I will get honest answers with it."
From nowhere and everywhere a ringing staccato of a dull rash tone rang out, but unlike most days, when this sound signaled the students to leap from their seats and head for the doors, today the classroom moved at its own pace; designating each individually, how they wanted to leave the class. Groups of girls left leaving whispers in their wake, and boys filed out still stuffing their things into their bags. The student who'd spoken out much during the class took to his feet too, though he was not truly enrolled for any classes. 
Nic walked out of the classroom alone, and even in his alienation, with his head high and spirits at equal prominence. The only thing he carried was a worn notebook with almost a hundred loose papers jutting out its sides. It was Nic's journal, Someday, this story will be told. He read the first line. "The Power of Pi compels you, you are with it and it with you, internally infinite, forever and ever." This made him smile even though it didn't make sense to him. 
	Perfect breeze, sun's out, the scent of the flowers through my nose and out my lightly touching toes. Probing eyes, each person. Some tired, some dead, some filled with life and love for something other than myself. The latter gives comfort?
	An image of the Great Mother, gone in an instant. Ive never seen her, have I?
	What do flowers taste like?-- Bitter. Sour Sweet?Tangy?
	People walk the cement paths laid for their control. Some notice, most dont. Boxed buildings that give the impression of quick construction and uninspired design rivaling the halls within.
	Focus lost, landscape blurs. Ears fill with cotton as a faint rustling flitters into recesses of mind. Blurred figures of buildings change shape and corners peak into pyramidical fence posts separating and doubling until surrounded. People seem unaware of growing wall, and noise rustling beyond. Rustle grows into sound of cymbals of a drum beaten rapidly. Fence being built grows tall to block out sun. 
	Darkness and loud clanging. Frightened but unmoved. Fence shows signs of weakness; flits of light poke through its thick bricked walls; slits where flits flittered through growing until one becomes same as other and steady stream is found in center laying onto body. A spotlight of warm radiant heat. 
	Cymbals grow louder and louder. People walking bounce and falter as if shaken by noise, and suddenly stream of light grows a radiant white and wall bulged and burst illuminating body once more in white light. Cymbals broke and from absence came the sound of beautiful melody. Shaken bodies of walkers bounce now to rhythm and tone of music with each note and from air they fall at great speed. Bodies slimmed to a hairs width and into mind flow and from here I feel essence bounce back out of mind. There and here, I sit and sat in own sustained exaltation.
	Im hallucinating?Im not wanted here? These buildings will eat me. They know what I am, and I want -out.
	Its out there?all of it?its not just here?.
	Its everywhere?Fuck?its everywhere BUT here?
	Sun shine on me as much as you can. Your days are numbered, defeated by winter.
	The light is hot. Yummm. It is strength for when you are empty.
 	Glad. Comfort. Warm. Peace.
	Shut eyes and the inside of mind, silent as each body walking by comes streaking in, encased in colored light, only to leave as quickly as coming. Startled out of dream as large thud slams into the earth. 
	I chewed the flowers stalk nearly to its ovary and petals? Gross?I cant fuckin swallow. I hope I'm not allergic to it!
	Im at the fountain? How the helld I get here??Goddamnit is that chick over there crying? Can't you do that someplace else? You have got to be kidding me ?Holy shit --its Kylia! She's bawling! Her hair is down. She almost looks? hot. Oh shit! Never mind - she looks like she got into a fight.
	Nic's shadow covered her from the sunlight. "Kylia? It's me Nic, Drew's bro." Her right eye, black.
	"Nic!?" she coughed. She smelled like she hadn't showered or had a new clean pair of undies in a month, but Nic was too shocked at her appearance to care. "What are you doing here?" She didn't know what else to say.
	"I -uh, go to school here." He found himself talking without reason. "I really like the library here, I mean I bet you are just like 'Use the Internet,' but I find books more comforting in some way. Most of the books I read have scratch marks in them though, and graffiti. Bad words, I mean." He had rarely talked to a girl who was crying and didn't know what else to say. "I'd offer you a jacket if I had one."
	She looked at him squarely, then let out a mewl of a bawl, screeching so loud Nic thought his brain would blow through of his skull, fragmented between a million pieces. 
	"What are you doing?" Nic screamed and went over to her, wrapping his arms around her and picking her up. "Come on, you're alright. Let's go somewhere safe, ok?" She was shaking, dripping wet. Nic had to help her up and she leaned on him. Her legs were weak and swollen and almost looked maroon covered in dirt or grime. Some people saw the back of her pants and thought the girl had shit herself but that was not the case.
	They walked together for a while wrapped in a strange embrace, saying nothing, but hummed the same song, yet neither knew its author or true identity. He was leading her to a large round sewer when she said "Oh no, I'm not going back in there! The smell! The horror! THE HORROR!"
	"Really? I can't ever smell anything. Everyone else complains about it?" Nic looked thoughtfully in the air.
	"Please Nic, don't drag me back down there!" She squeezed him even tighter and Nic felt her nails dig deep into him like a lioness. He attempted to cloak his recoil.
	"When were you in there?"
	"I can't remember?a few days, a week," She shuddered. "It all blurs together?The smell, Nic!"
	"Listen, it really is the quickest way to safety. Just close your eyes and count to 1800."
	"Then what?"
	"Then I will show you something greater than anything you've ever seen before."
	She closed her eyes and began to count.
                                          **
	The night before the Country Music Man got his socks rocked off by the Three, Pundara's band: Pundara's Box and the Awesome XXX, was playing at VJ's Wonder Hole at 69th and Cummings. It was ladies night, and there was to be the championship finals of the four month long wet tee-shirt contest. Zach could barely walk straight his pants were so tight because of his protruding erection, and not because his acid-wash hipster corduroys were already too small for him.
	Beforehand, he engaged amonsgst a few stymied drinks with his brother to get him going. Along the way, he slammed a few more potent pulls. By the time he got to the Wonder Hole, he was drunk. 
	A long flaccid line extended adjacent the paved sidewalk. The grizzly bouncer saw Zach amazingly walk hobblingly through traffic without causing the slightest of disturbances. He went right up to the front of the line. The bouncer recognized him and gave him a wristband. He nearly fell through the door.
	The entire bar was mesmerized at Pundara, who was in the middle of a rockin solo. Her all Femme-Fatale band equally rocked hard beside her, perfectly in sync like a clock that counted the orbit of celestial spheres, listening ever so carefully when it was their turn to chime into the conversation. She looked like a goddess. Zach was smitten by her beauty and guile, dexterity and craftsmanship, the connection she had with her art, instrument, and peers on stage. The crowd was in rapturous bliss. They listened and interacted with the music however it possessed them, and it was all perfect no matter who you were. Heaven was jealous.
	Some girl bumped into Zach and spilled her beer all over his flannel and corduroys, completely zonking him out of his lovely albedo. At one instant, he was floating as if in a peaceful vivid dream where nature and being are one, only to realize he pissed the bed. 
	He was wet and cold and a svelte drunk slut was yelling at him, which turned the music to noise and drunk slut's cackling shout into a shrill jagged spear straight through the ear drums. "Why don't you watch where you're standing, guy!" she screamed then had another drunky glance at him. "Why don't you buy me another one, and then maybe I'll still let you fuck me."
	Zach didn't hear anything but "I'll still let you fuck me." 
	Zach's pants got much tighter as he led her to the bar. "Four double shots o hiskey and two beers?and whatever this girl wants."
	Pundara finished her solo, flawlessly entrancing with a vivacious vocal that without question, had power over both men and women. She wore an old, black tank top with spaghetti straps with no bra above a homemade skirt, blatantly revealing her juicy gams with tall dark boots. Her braces sparkled in the spotlight. Her voice was like thunder that evaporated liquid, but could be as soft and soothing as an angel's whisper. She sang her heart out "If's it's love you wanna take, then it's love you gotta give, too many times with too many hearts turns the soul to cinder, or maybe there's something to consider, you ask, I pray, don't believe what they all say, I am all that I am, woman above man, I'm calloused like a blister, heal me Earth, I am your sister."
	The girl at the bar interrupted Zach's trance again by grabbing his pants, "Do you want to go out to my car? I give great head." She bragged and licked her lips. She had a cold sore and a nose ring (and herpes). 
	Zach almost laughed. "I bet you do! I'll meet you out there!"
	She smiled, grabbing his junk and it made a honking noise for some reason and she went out the door. 
	That's when Zach tried to get the closest to Pundara he could. The band just wrapped up the song like it was a message in a bottle being sent off at sea and the crowd went wild like the first witnesses of electricity. Zach was carefully carrying the tray full of drinks towards the stage. There were a few moments when some other drunk girls nearly bashed the tray right over, but Zach managed with the Power of Pi to lay the amulet of drunken gifts at the edible feet of Pundara. She wore blue and white cheetah paint on her toenails. Zach studied their detail when she reached down and said something to him. "Zach, I wrote this for you. It was in a dream I had." She took a drink, cautiously smiled and started playing.
	Her fingers were untamed but precisely controlled; playing an arpeggio involving all the strings that went from the bottom to the top of the guitar in an endless yet alluring melody. The drummer and bassist came in with a whomp on the strong beat then immediately cut off, waited a few measures, then repeated the syncopated process until they were full-fledged on like an orchestra with a heavy psychedelic rock groove. The daughter musicians sang a long triumphant harmony that Zach mistook for a dramatic opera sequence that was all seemingly directed toward him. The band was illuminating kaleidoscopically with universes passing in and out of him and stars and nebulae twined within the strobe, gleaming light, speaking ancient secrets; magic, death and future, beyond the evolution of existence; everything could be summed up into one point, just one fragment of a space in time that collated all thoughts and dreams and reflections of the past and things to come and it was all real and they all felt it with hope and justice and ecstasy and deliberate falseness because of the reality they were trying to fit all of this knowledge and power into. And then it was felicity and oblivion which Zach could not dictate or comprehend, but he knew it was real. 
	An equation for everything. If anything was real, it was this. She projected that to me. Even if she didn't know it. She threw that at the world, and I saw it. He looked around. The crowd was either dancing or drinking or watching with wonder the beautiful musicians on stage. They saw it too. It probably wasn't the same thing I saw, but they are seeing something, damnit! There is hope, there is truth. We just need guidance. 
	Zach stared at Pundara, drooling. His pants were really tight now. She was covered in sweat, but it was only proof of how deep she was in it. She saw him looking and winked licking her lip as she broke into an impromptu solo. None of her band mates were offended by the idea and followed along with ease. Zach yelled for her and it made her stick her tongue out and hit a high note that corresponded angelically with the crash of the cymbals and the low thickness of the bass groove.
	
	By the end of the night Zach was pretty wasted. Pundara had her fair share but wasn't quite sure how deep Zach was in it. "Will you marry me?" He asked her after the raunch. 
	There were used condoms all over the bed laid out next to anal beads and veiny head-strap dildos and butt-plugs between some antibacterial gel. She laughed and began stroking his cock again.
	"Zach, you can't handle this. I'm not a one guy kinda girl." She put her lips on the tip of his head. It was making him sleepy.
	"I think I handle it very well." He put his hand in her hair but she slapped it away. She hated when guys played with her hair. 
	"Come on, babe, I'd make you the best wife ever. I would treat you right. Better than any Fairy-Tale."
	His cock popped out of her mouth. "Oh yeah?" Being treated right was the most important thing to her.
	It was the last normal night either of them had. 


	Party at Moonbase Alpha
	The champagne glasses clinked with the most form of purity and rang vibrations that the titanic rock of the Moon had truly never felt. Omar Jones was there, and so was Phlinky McAss, and their best good friends Privy Laroo, Keanu Reeverson and Steve Carelli shared a transport with them. Oh how they talked?
	"Men will be able to come back from Mars in our lifetime," Conjected Stevie.
"Yeah, assuming we don't die," replied Privy Laroo.
"But even Death is not the end!" Phlinky McAss chimed and drank a big gulp of champagne. 
Steve continued, "With this relay station and the completion of the Totum outer satellite base, we won't have to waste good men and astronauts to risk their lives for a death trap."
	"Who cares. There's too much plundering to be had on Earth yet."
	"Well no shit, BomBlast, but unlike you, I've been at the top for too long. I need something else to get my dick wet." She yanked on her leash and her pet came over to her naughty zone and started sniffing and digging with his nose.
	"Such a vile mouth for the President of the United States."
	"Hey, you don't know where this mouth has been." She smiled and revealed jeweled teeth. 
 The space station was all white and shined with unearthly precision. The poor robotic waitress struggled to hand out drinks to the wealthiest people occupying Earth. "I do declare, that this be the most righteous party my family has ever attended~" A fat white southerner gulped his glass of chardonnay down like it was milk and threw it at the force field against the glass facing earth. Most of the richmen joined him and combed their hair. A large pile of Calm powder was being consumed by the richest group of humans ever to live on Earth, from the center plate on Deadsy's moon base.

Exeter on-looked from the bar, saying nothing while reloading the glass of a Mississippi governor. There was a Sentimental altar boy sitting in his lap. "Yo Pete, whenz da show start?"
	Exeter threw off his coat and resumed corrupting with the privileged. "Patience, brother, the whole world is waiting with you." He took a drink of nothing. All of the girls laughed stupidly and stared at Exeter, being the most debonair thing they'd ever seen. He stared at them disgustingly and stomped back towards isolated doors. 
	Out through the secret Deadsy Moonbase window, Earth was perfectly visible. No clouds or satellites to obstruct the view. Beyond Earth, the solar system was black, save for the few objects revolving round our star. He had partied with the same type of people since the 1860's, and had literally heard every conversation there was to have. This was something that used to enrage the hellion raider, but now the fury was resulting in lethargy. 
	But then all of a sudden, after keeping it in his subconscious for so long, it started to show itself. These were new feelings. He hadn't had new feelings since-the door opened. A drunk fell through. Exeter stepped over the person and reentered the party.
Everyone was fucked up. Exeter observed with a silent rage that could nearly not be contained. 
	He wanted to crucify all of them. Out in the bleakness of the lunar landscape. Who the fuck would care if some business mogul was stretched apart on a crater on the moon you could barely see with the world's best telescope? But Exeter surveyed on. Knowing everything the stupid fucking humans would say even before they said it.
	"I can't believe Rostapovich cut the cord~"
	"I know?[SNIIIIFFFF]?the biggest worry is their boy, Barniegoo."
	"I can't wait to take on the Empire."
	"There is no such thing as luck!"
	"Are you kidding? All you need is luck?"
	"When the world was created, I mean, when everything was created, the universe and the stars and the black hole we revolve around; when it was created, something else was made. It was the opposite of reality. "
	"It is Nott--"
	Exeter stood back. When his turn came, he pretended to snort the drug and simulated the effects himself. "If there is somewhere you want to go, Tommy, I will send you there; no charge." Exeter held his head back, and pretended to snort the rest of the wonderdrug up his wonderhole. 
	"I'm just saying, there is a whole new world out there, I mean, ya know, one we can't comprehend. Something that will pinnacle the history of mankind into the dawn of a new age."
	*Everyone AGREED TO THIS AND DRANK HEAVILY.	
	Don't you see that THIS is it?You were the dawn, but you chose to stay in darkness. So here I am. One foot in front of the other. Clock-work. Tick Tock. Tick Tock. Goodbye to Romance. 
	The party Exeter was hosting began to bore him in the most irritable form of vexing irkness, twelve hours ago. He withheld stomping to death the stupid spoiled humans of the outer Deadsy ring. They were all pieces of formidable shit he wanted to punch until they were incoherent piles of mushy blood-goop. Yet, they continued to talk about nothing in particular, though they thought they were solving the world's problems with all of the pretentious bullshit spewing from their mouths, but only ended up shitting themselves when Exeter revealed his true form.
	If you say one more thing I will rip your tongue out and shove it up your ass until you die from orgasm. I want you to die in the most revulsive way possible. You will never taste water again. Human flesh is the only meat you will taste. Drink the blood of your brothers and husbands. You will die by the hand that strokes you.
	The high society party quickly turned into the most ruthless blood orgy to have ever occupied the Moon. Exeter brushed his teeth while the leaders of the United Nations eviscerated each other or fingered one another until the other one was more than dead.
	Not nearly enough of them were dead. But the survivors all engaged eyes with Exeter, as if for further instruction. He pointed to a far wall that opened like a hidden garage. Megaladon and Alec Pure stood holding laser cannons and photon bombs and herded the besotted lushes into the transport. They waved to Exeter, letting him know control was again dancing in the palm of their hands.
	As one governor convulsed bloodily on the floor, spewing his intestines and other stomachy parts out his mouth, Exeter stepped through the steel doors to the receiving chamber.

He left the architects of the Multiverses waiting for only a few minutes, knowing how much the Sentients hated 'lost time.'
	Exeter stumbled in, tripping over the dead body of a rich coal man. He nearly laughed when One of the intergalactic Sentients said, "Here we are, again, asking the same questions we have been for 2024 years, or so it seems?" The oldest forms of life in the Muliverses lacked empathy and patience, even with an enlightened perception of Time.
	Exeter brushed his suit and fixed himself a bloody drink. "And here I stand, saying the same thing-blah, blah blah, blah blah." He winked. They did not have eyes. Galaxies revolved around what we would call their heads (so fuckin tiny, its fuckin huge).
	The autochthonous Sentients consigned to oblivion did not look pleased, though they never did look like much ever. They had no color and reflected death and life. Their true form could not be deduced by a human mind. "You seem to be having a mundanely eloquent party here?how, cosmo." Some of the Sentients quirked hotly. Exeter even thought it ironic.
	"Yes, the power of Pi makes its own jokes, and that of the people it spawns, but the Cosmic Truth does not hide with them. They only attempt to protect Pi for what it's worth, and fail. Like all Pi before." He took off his jacket. "But they may lead us to what we are looking for-- excuse me, what you're looking for."
	The Sentients conversed with each other with a conversation that could sum to be an epic novel, though it took place in 1/9th of a second, then said, "You're not hiding anything from us, Peter?Are you?" 	
	"It's only a matter of time. Give me--" Their reaction almost resembled laughter. 
	The eldest of the Sentients came forward with a triangular head and no face, "It would be a shame for you to lose Earth after all of these years of control."
	Exeter answered. "The power of Pi is the imagination, and I can guarantee you, the city of San Tropez, has no imagination." 
                                        ***
	"That little dip-shitted asshole scanned all my files!" Keesle exasperated.
	The Fat Ninja stood to the side saying nothing, breathing groggily. 
	"He analyzed seven hyper-drives, even photo-sycned my house!" She watched Josh playing with his ethrapad, "His goons broke into Josh's too." 
	Josh was in the midst of checking messages and calendars, and saw the two other staring at him, waiting for an explanation. The Fat Ninja glared blankly, a thick black mustache protruding in comical strands through his lop-sided ski mask.
	"I wasn't told." The Fat Ninja grunted. He always tied a long lead pipe to his back. It could've held a magnificent sword, but Josh would never know for sure. He knew only what they told him, and it was never enough. It had become another frustration he would just have to deal with.
	"Yes, well, apparently they barged in on Mother lathering herself on the couch. She's fond of such during the midnight hour. Hence, why I'm here? instead of sleeping. Kirtcheimer was probably hoping to find this--" Josh held out the super camera. It expanded itself with a series of satisfying clicks and beeps; what Josh nicknamed as 'turning the safety off.' When the gadget was fully formed, he slickly plopped out the memory card as if it were the ammunition to his gun. "They confiscated the other disc-card. This is the real one, I mean. I filled the other card with hours of different panoramic shots of the city. You wouldn't believe the quality of em! It's so fucking alive! Like you can touch or smell it--"
	"Sounds like this Kirtcheimer brat is aiming for a promotion on the Deadsy food chain." The Fat Ninja said and started walking away, pointing the flashlight down the long & dreary, wet sewer. Water flowed and dripped. Rats scuttled to and fro. The Fat Ninja's butt-crack showed triumphant.
	"I've known the prepster for longer than I wish to admit. The guy's a complete dick."
	"He almost made me lose my job. I'm fucking suspended!" the Professor kicked an obese pipe and regretted it. 
	The Fat Ninja turned around to face them, "You know they're just stirring us up so we do something rash."
	"It works for them," Keesle became overcome with grim, "every time."
	This was the vague talk that annoyed Josh. "How much farther do we have to walk?"
	"Ten feet. This is where the central station will be; Outpost 1. Outpost 2 is Gramercy Park. Outpost 3 will be Deadsy tower, if we find it. The roots of Exeter's architecture are a labyrinth. The passageways that connect it are a puzzle-maze; a labyrinth within a labyrinth. I have no doubt Exeter engineered it himself, and the closer we get, the more dangers we will unleash? "
	This made Josh and Keesle look at each other with a quease in their bladders, which made them both feel older.
	"But what about my apartment, the Bowery, or University Ave?" Josh asked, zipping up his jacket as the large round ninja climbed the tall surface-leading ladder, in the giant chamber of a sewer with the speed of an alpha-male silverback gorilla.
	"Those are only doors. We have only a few now, but soon, we will have much more." 
	"The Bowery is getting cleansed. BomBlast won't say when."
	"I told you Becky, there is nothing we can do." The Fat Ninja hit some type of dumpy-lookin switch, and suddenly the vast darkness was illuminating a stadium sized sewer vault. The dry side of the slum arcade allowed a few make-shift shelter-shacks to be coordinated as outposts; built along the docks, arrows pointed vague directions towards a particular destination.
	"It's alive." Josh said.	
	"This isn't life," Keesle spoke softly, remembering; feeling the warm, empty part of her stomach, "Only conception."
	                                 **
	Suddenly, in the present time, out of completely nowhere, everything seemed to be perfectly real?

He hadn't written a new song in years. Exeter thumbed through his desk drawers and brought out an old parchment, crinkled yellow-brown from time. He was bored.
Over the centuries, he began to write some of the crazy ideas he had, so even if it was possible for him to forget his own thoughts, he could recalibrate them if need be. In this case, it was the dullness of reality that beclouded his writer's block.
He sifted to a page he wrote in the 70's while he was married to Cher, examined it, then threw it back in the drawer and fell back in his chair, blowing a wad of air through his soft red lips. He grabbed an older publication of his compositions of short works for multiple instruments and voice, the Kindertotenlieder; a collection of short songs imitating the styles of famous artists from Chopin to Chicago, all revolving around the subject of dead children.
Then it finally came to pass; one of his 'sadistic awakenings'.
Roll the dice? "Of course!" 
In the pen drawer he grabbed two black dice with different colors and numbers he associated with death. He rolled them together and blew on them, instantly feeling the hotness of his breath.
Alas, Exeter rolled the dice: blue and gold snake eyes- his favorite. 

As if it weren't a dream, Exeter exited the castling downtown Deadsy Enterprises Tower coruscating in the dark, full red moon pulsating like a diseased but enlightened heart. 
The usual calamity of downtown had been interrupted by even more nonsense, The College World Series (which was anything BUT), but in this dream the streets remained passive. He checked his gold and silver watch, drooling in anticipation, wrestling his fingers in a mad frenzy, insanely contorting a joker smile. As a cab drove by, he gyrated and regained his sanity by tightening his gloves on each hand before starting off to see his personal show of mayhem.
The teleprobe from the quack, Dr Nner, replayed and replayed and replayed in his psycho mind: "Yes Lord, 9:30pm."
	Oh it sounded so iniquitous to him! He imitated as though he were in 'Singing In The Rain': twirling around each lamp post and jumping over exploding fire hydrants. Skipping and hopping.
The movie playing deep inside the universes of their minds?

	Most of the time when you're dreaming, you don't even know it. It feels more real than when you're awake. You can go from destination to destination seamlessly without time or travel with faces and characters appearing and evaporating without recognition of logic. Some dreams are so vivid the only way to awaken from your nightmare is to die. Sometimes, you dream on.
	Drew came whizzing around the corner of Zach's blind spot, eyes blazing with panic pallor that cloud the eyes of fish in moments of jittery hooked terror. Three inches before Zach's face, he stopped, heaved the heaviest breath of the day, a real breath, not a goddamn phony pity of a sigh, then started to ramble as if it'd been going on in his head the whole sprint and only now came from his lips, "UnRbet ot het drougn! Ahhh I --shit--dude -- we gotta do something!" He gasped with chortled words, sounding like an old car breaking gears.
	"What the fuck? Slow down!" Zach grabbed him by the shoulders, bobble doll headed.
 	"Kylia's whole apartment is burnt!"
	Drew's panting became reminiscent of kids coming down from a crying fit; the self-assuring gentle gasps that come with the fading of bawling hysterics, a hopeful kind of breathing. More than anything it gives warmer color in comparison to the desperate tears that preceded it. "I didn't notice it last night... How the fucks that possible?! Pi, I was fucked! I was sooo fucked?I got there?Jesus, I don't know?sometime, and I must've just passed out right on the floor?" Still, he thought about this, his eyes clearing a little, "I didn't even shut the door, shit! I thought I had a conversation with her. I thought I?who the fuck was I talking to? They could've come back!" He added again with emphasis, "Man-- I was so -"
	"Fucking fucked?" Zach answered. Drew spit an absent minded chuckle but the laughing tuft was all charade, dark with defeat. Zach noticed him clinch his bangdaged wrists, squeeze and quirked. 
	"So, burnt? Like, fire?" He lit up a cigarette.
     	He nodded sorrowfully. For a paranoid second Zach could see Drew choking down a clammy fist full of pills, the nightstand sentinel and the beady digital eyes of his clock set to some ridiculous hour of the night, the only witness in the dark room. Extending a Dixie cup, booze filled, maddening, pouring it all over the console of the assailant. The smoke and sparks and glow poured over his Cheshire grin in the night. 
     	"I tried her mobile, texted tweeted trimmed and trialed? I even tried wakin up Chandler or whatever she calls that thing. What was I supposed to do, give it mouth to mouth?" He said with a Jersey accent. He tried to think, breath completely still, "I was just so?" 'fucked' Zach mouthed with him. "I mean, do you think?"
	"She's dead?" 
	Zach veered to the same horizon Drew was puzzling over and set to pouring out his thoughts into it, putting a timid hand on his shoulder. Just a pat. 
	The wan horizon was stale and pale as chalkboard clouds whipped from the frenzy of smacking classroom erasers. Over the stretch of space, the brothers saw a marching column of white glittering young men and beautiful goddesses in gossamer-etched garb with the sign of Pi, sandaled feet stirring up the furthest sullied clouds. In their hands where one expects to find gongs for gonging and guitars for neurotic self-gratification, they held couples and couples of chalkboard erasers, beating them together in step. A soft white layer of streaming wisp clouded around them as confusion around the night, then neither of the two really knew where they were. Somewhere beyond all of this in the east the sun was attempting desperately to come up, to no avail. 
      		(When I wear not the mask of Bag I forget myself as person, I forget animals are prone to tension and release, built for it, it is too much for me to stand at times, and I forgot myself entirely with drink and riotousness at symposium )
      		<Aye, as case with me and the Blanket?but hear this brother, in the roving vagaries of night I was hit by a feeling unique>
<Methinks me spirit was taken to the Realm of Nott? Behold! I slipped 					tween in and out of my physical dreamscape. I was steamed with my sins 
nodding on the plane of deep abysmal slumber. Yet 						in-between this slipping I found myself completely 						awake and surrounded by the Alderman of the original 					Council of Pi. At my feet were strewn the severed hands eyes fingers toes byproducts of these men of old, this I knew, I felt instinctively. Clapping into a	strobe light, I beheld the countenance of the spoiled beast that is Exeter. I cannot fathom in words how afraid I was, passing tween this growing image every skipping frame. With the sickening effects of chemicals soaking my physical body spliced tween, I felt certain mine heart would melt.
 The expanded essence of my being choked out across the augmentation of all the
Perceptions of existence, and at the growing horizon of this nauseating sensation
I heard Paladronius of Aeperti, the divine mystic and original beholder of sacred Pi speak these words as if from inside my ear: 
"Within the ring of fire,below the diseased sky,
from Hell with fury comes the Eater of Multiverses" and then, "Beware!">
        		(Pi alike! The Realm of Nott tis not a fairy tale!) 
	The brothers exchanged visions of Pi's repressed memories and subconscious afterlife and could not explain any of it whatsoever.
       		(Ring of fire? Diseased sky? Eater of Multiverses? The sound of it is ominous, and perhaps the foreshadow of apocalypse to all times and dimensions)
      		<Hanging superstitions on the thread of hallucination could distract priority>
       		(Come, if ride from Hell, then on our doorway to the Multiverse will pass by as 			fate or on plate, as through the eyes of the needle to San Tropez' Gate!)
	      	

	Kylia and Nic finished setting up Charlie's memory on a dusty desk and powered it on. They occupied a small open shack with a dim and shifty light on. No one appeared to be around. "Greetings." Charlie spoke through a blown speaker with a rusty Atari voice.
"Charlie!?" Kylia exasperated. "Charlie! WHOA! Are you alright? Are you OK?!" She grabbed her ethrapad, almost breaking it in the hysterical fit of surprise. "I knew I was good, but I didn't think I was THAT good!!" Kylia laughed, glancing at Nic to join in and share this intimate moment with her. All Nic did was step back a little and smile. Kylia jumped, grabbed him warmly and hugged him tight. "I'm so happy! I thought Charlie was gone!"
"Happiness is the key to enlightenment," Nic said, patting her back to get off of him. Kylia took it as, Yeah, lay it on me baybay! Before Nic flung her shoulders quickly, knocking Kylia out of his arms, who was then reunited with Charlie, Mother and Son. Nic lunged comically for the only window in the cliché abandoned trailer-house, to abruptly find Zach running full speed through the computer graveyard with Drew on his back. "Jesus Pi Christ, what now? Wait-what just happened--" Nic exclaimed. 
"We thought you'd know." Drew somersaulted to the ground under Zach's lanky legs.
"Know what? I don't know what the hell you're talking about!" Nic replied. 
"Yer telling me you don't feel that? You don't hear that?" 
"How the hell did we even get here?"
"What-I-I've been reviving Charlie!"
"Charlie?? Who the FUCK is Charlie?!"
"Kylia's FUCKING computer! Deadsy raided her apartment." Zach and Drew's eye's shifted from side to side questioningly, as if something was slowly changing around them. 
"Deadsy..." They all said softly, eyes wandering. 
"This is really weird."
"Where are we?"
Nic continued, "Kylia got a message-- Charlie intercepted some file that Deadsy really wanted, bad. We literally just booted him back up to see what it is," Nic said, trying to re-instill the calm. 
Drew's eye's and head jolted from direction to direction in some sort of organized maneuver, his head spinning 360 degrees.
(Listen hard broseff, the almighty chorus of Pi is mutating slowly, the voices are 				changing into growls)
[Forgive me brother and my haste in words, twas foolish not to hear 					these monstrous cries. I fear worst]
<Another approaches! Furlough!>
"Guy's!" Kylia came running through the door. "You gotta check this out! Charlie found a new phone conversation with Exeter and a 'Dr Nanur?!'"
"Dr Nner?"
"Are you serious?" Nic questioned.
"Yea man! Come Che-,"
"What the hell did it say!" Zach demanded.
Nic met the eyes of his Pi Brethren. "Something isn't right." Yeah, like that means anything anymore.
A shape emerged from where Zach and Drew had come from with a graceful pace. It didn't appear to be walking at all, as if the man was floating towards them at a spooky rate, hovering. He was smiling, but not cheerfully. His head faced towards the three and revealed crystallized white teeth and turned his head away.
Then He stopped.
He stopped exactly fifty four feet away from them and slowly, very slowly, very very slowly, crept his neck, slower and slower, towards The Three.
His teeth grinded into liquid as he bit his gloves off and wrestled his hands in a freaky obsessed manner. He chewed the gloves until they were the same substance as his teeth, leaking black down to his crotch. His eyes were dead black. The boys felt like shitting themselves. They groped for each other's arms not knowing whether to lean over and die or pretend to lean over and die.
Exeter ascended into the air like an angel, cackling, growing lucent and more terrible than ever before, like a real nightmare. "HAHAHA! CHILDREN!? HAHAHAHA" His sinister laugh was enough to destroy the rain forests more than we've done to date times a billion. 
(Your vision sees well, Exeter, But far from perfect)
Exeter turned his head like a puppy in a playful manner.
<You will pay for your crimes against civilization>
[We wielders of the Pi demand you to surrender]
"Yes, Yes, Yes, goood. Yessss. Very Gooood." Exeter fumbled his fingers some more and twitched back and forth, glowing darker and darker. 
	{You're much too late young ones....Turn over, or Move aside .....}
(Move we cannot, Exeter)
As you wish.... floating higher in the air.
He marveled at the smell of their fear which gave him an enervated erection. 
Exeter extended his hand and pointed with a laugh that would make a tyrant blush at the dark, full red moon bleeding through the sky.
	The boys exchanged glances of confusion. "What the shit?"	
"He's not serious, is he?" Suddenly they were harshly interrupted by several agonizing screams, yelping in disturbing human tones; one blood freezing mewl after the next. Then howls, and grunt barking, much, much worse to listen to. Their city was turning into monsters.
"Enough of this!" With a flash of antireality the Trio transformed into Pi. 
Exeter spit, feeling he needed to entertain himself by throwing a killer curve ball glowing of fire at the shack where Nic and Kylia had administered resuscitation to Charlie. It went ablaze like Hiroshima, but the Three fought on.
 "I'm going after him!" The Blanketeer said and sparked into the atomic blast. The Lion Tamer and Bag-Head rushed to help but were tackled by their fellow brethren of Pi, smacking them down with the force of a sidewinder missile. Blank smelt like a burnt unconscious waffle. 

Exeter slicked back his hair and closed his eyes and reopened them, making this all go through their minds as if it weren't a dream.
 	
	With limbs smoldering at their feet, Nic and Zach face the sky where their friend came hurtling down from. Above them they see a faint dot, growing and growing. Before the moment could be complete Exeter was on them. Though paralyzed only in pain before, Blank watches the fate of his brethren, unable to help. Exeter places a bent knee into the stomach of Blank, causing his arms and legs to reach around Exeter's impenetrable body. Blank's spine cracking into many obscenely satisfying pieces. The ground buckles and implodes itself into a crater. His limbs fall softly limp. A gesture of bottomless pain filled of confused fright marred his face.
      	Exeter bends his head lower so that his mouth was level with the Blanketeer's ear, I was ready to leave, he says. I see my plan has reached a level where you Three cannot thwart it. Because of your haste I was able to take you all off guard, and now I will simply eliminate, and as a treat for the both of us, I will do you last; leaving you to watch.
	Bag-Head and the Lion Tamer both slowly found their way out of the burning rubble. Exeter squinted once more at Blank and smiled, You won't be able to move, so allow me to help you. He grabs his jaw and turns his head slightly so that he could see Bag-Head and the Lion Tamer stagger to their feet. But then, suddenly, Exeter begins to flay them limb from limb. He is killing them slowly. As Exeter breaks the boomerang of The Lion Tamer he yells out in pain as if it had been a part of his own self. Taking his whip, Exeter ties him contortedly and preys onto The Bag-Head. Grabbing the two sides of Bag-Head's head bag, he pulls with no effort and tear the bag in two.
 Smoke billows from his neck like blood draining an artery. He coughs uncontrollably, grasping frantically the base of where his neck had once been. The Lion Tamer writhing in pain on the ground, trying to escape his own whip, but the more he struggles the tighter it becomes. Standing over him, Exeter smiles and begins stomping his heel into the young, genuinely masculine face. With each thrust his eyes and smile grow wider...wider...wider.
	All the while Blank lay motionless and paralyzed, crying inside, hoping to muster some strength to save his friends from their inevitable fate...The stomping continues, and Exeter's face displays his excited glee...wider...wider...laughing?.louder?and louder, until it is an echo reverberating forever?.
                                 **
		It wasn't so much an escape as it was a release.
	Escape implies a going away from; a straying in another direction, on the compass or not. Escape evokes the frantic face of a fugitive tearing away from something stolid as commotion over spilled milk. People crowd round and point at the accident. Whisper things. Come to their own conclusions. Hardly matters if the compass is involved at all because direction is subjective, attributable to the flying fancy of where the sun is in the sky or what melody is coming through the din, or how many mouths are working in whispers to attribute the milk stain to you or me.
         No, release is a much better word for it. Have you ever let the gentle pressure of flowing water, as in a river or lake, squeeze the breath out of your lungs till the moment they will surely pop? Then thrust through the surface and heave with that loud satisfying sound of whooshing air?    	It's like that in many ways.
	Or maybe it's more like the spilled milk itself.
	Yes, that's more to the point. It's the deliberate spilling of milk, nothing like it to raise the blood. Everyone is looking for passion, whether they know it or not, and striking a match, even off the armpit of your soul, can set it blazing. An escape, but an escape back to, like burning back to calm familiarity at a sprint, away from the mob of pedestrians and witnesses who gather round the wet stain accident in shock. The breath of air, the satisfaction at knocking over the cup, and the speedy head straightening return is a cycle not easily broken.
	On the surface of Zach's mind, he sounded like, "God damn you! Pity partying son of a bitch, would it be so hard to think about someone other than yourself? For Christ sake and Pi alike, it's only common courtesy. Ahrg hellz  self-loathing; the worst of all."
	He was standing over the seizuring body of Drew.
	Did I drop him? The last thing he knew they were getting drunk watching TV, and then?
	
	But even Zach had seen the dream, felt it; Even the decapitation.  
	Shouldn't I be used to this by now? He didn't know what he should do. "Snap out of it, damnit! It's ok, I saw it too! Get up!" Drew mumbled something. His long hair was stuck wetly to his sweaty, zit farming chin. 
	With no warning at all, Zach awoke in the middle of the street without pants above his brother convulsing in the street, traffic honking at him.
	Nic? Can you hear me?...oh, fuck, he won't know what to do... "BUT I DON'T KNOW WHAT TO DO EITHER! Yeah, okay, I'll find Nic. If nothing else we can at least try to figure it out together, and it'll give me something to do besides talk to myself." He said as he dragged Drew to the sidewalk and threw him in a pile of garbage, laughing at his unintentional folly. 
	People walked by the tableau, murmuring. It seemed a kid lying in the middle of the street thrashing around was not a normal sight. "Nothing to see here," he said in a charm that only comes with personality. "He took the whole 'Country Music Man Incident' kinda hard. He hasn't been the same since."
	"I know! I done seen the same thing happenin to my brother in laws."
	"My two daughters hung themselves the night it happened."
	"The whole musicians union is on strike until the Three have been put to death!"
	Zach didn't like where this was going and got the fuck outta there.
	                              ****
	Though the sunset seemed overrated and symmetrical, the two young curious kids finally exited the rankness of the poopy sewers and out into a junkyard.
	"Finally, fresh air, kinda." Kylia waved towards her chest as if this brought clean air up her nostrils. "But now where the heck have you taken me?" Kylia asked in a tone that showed her patience was at its limit.
"Just a bit further. Trust me, you'll love this."
	They continued to walk, now completely outside the city's limits, into open ground. Only a few large trucks were their company on these deserted and dirtied roads. They came to the crater on the edge of the great wilderness; Gramercy Park. It was beautiful.
	Nic stopped at the edge, scanning the horizon while he waited for her to catch up. At the top, hands on her knees, panting. He signaled a smile for her to stand straight enough to see into the basin below. Observing the crater, she began to unwind and lose herself in the world of possibility laying in front of them.
"It's a computer graveyard: an electronic only landfill. All the crap they load into your precious computers take ages to become one with Pi again. So they separate these pieces from 'normal trash.'" Kylia stared at Nic in surprise, as if she'd completely forgotten where she was, and who she was with. The sight before her was a large hole on whose opposite side was a steady hill of discarded electronical wonder. A steady stream of large green bellowing dump trucks drove to its edge and dropped a new pile and drove off to make room for the next. The parts fell down the hill caused by decades of this activity.
"Deadsy can't find you here, and moreover, they'll never look. You have access to anything and everything you'll ever need. Satellite relays, headstocks, signal flow processors, Doppler radar dishes, mice, monitor screens, hard drives, silicon."  
Kylia's eyes started to swell up. They lunged down the side of the crater. Once at the bottom they ran over to the pile of computers. She grabbed the first thing she saw.
"A Pd7000! They stopped production on these after the 8000 came out, more publicly quick but had innumerable flaws in its double helix. Any tardo could jump the older, more reliable 7000 up to speed with the 8000. Another great machine lost to the pursuit of quick profits. Damn our capitalist system!?Oh shit! A Frantlon Dish, who would throw something like this away? It must've cost them more than twenty thousand when it was released!"
"Now it's yours. Make use of it as it was meant to be used, unlike the old ungrateful owners."
"UNGRATEFUL IS AN UNDERSTATEMENT! This is something else!" She kissed him on the cheek. They smiled and let out nervous air.
"You ever been to the lower Bowery?"
"Of course not. It's totally ghetto. What the hell would I want in the Lowery? There's nothing but hobos and drug addicts there! Not even friendly ones." Kylia dared to answer. She continued squealing with glee at each new discovery she made. 
Nic shook his head, piqued, "Erh...people will never learn. You can't be afraid of what you don't know. There's a lot to be had, even in the lowliest of ghettos. Good people are everywhere. Maybe if you went, you'd know, and would want to help...but that's neither here nor there. It was in the sewers of the Lowery where I learned how to de-heat your machines here."
"What are you talking about?"
"You see those wires?" Nic pointed.
"Uh, Yeah, so what?"
"If we took that wire and strip a space in the middle, and strip some of the wire hanging up there, we can lay this wire over top here and get all the energy you need over there...free."  Nic was holding a thick power cable in his hands.
"Nic, that sounds really dangerous. You'll kill yourself trying! HA!"
"It's the only way. It's how we power the slums in the Lowery."
"You're not serious, are you? It would take --what? " she gave a gesture to Nic suggesting maybe he ought to try his own suggestion.
"Quit it. I wouldn't trust you doing my laundry...anyway, I'm going to show you something...just, don't be afraid, ok?" He walked to her, grabbed her shoulders to square her with him. 
Not knowing what to say, she nodded her head, wondering?
"Okay--" Nic backed away from her. Dropping to his knees he began screaming. She ran away also screaming, too perplexed to notice that Nic had disappeared and in his place stood The Lion Tamer after a loud, glowing explosion, until she heard him laugh.
"NIC?! WHA-OMG--WHAT DID YOU DO WITH MY FRIEND!?"
"Hahaha! Tis me, Kylia, I am both your friend Nic, and also your protector, The Lion Tamer, one of the Three who hold the truth behind the Multiverses greatest secret: Pi." The Lion Tamer smiled at Kylia, who was stunned. "I suppose I should begin the task at hand." Picking up the whole coil of cable without a wince of effort, the Lion Tamer bent his knees and in a single jump cleared to the top of the crater's ridge. Holding the cable up in front of him he bit hard into it, spitting out the protective rubber coating. Climbing up the nearest post, the Lion Tamer took a boomerang from his belt and cut a slit in the hanging wire and wrapped his own around it and jumped back down to where Kylia stood in awe, not even having moved since the Lion Tamer appeared. 
The efforts continued. 
	The Lion Tamer kept moving equipment around, surveying the damage to the units and attempting to set up a little house out of the wreckage. As the Lion Tamer built, Kylia repaired. 	
	Then, out of the blue, the Lion Tamer heard something in the distance. He stood erect, "Do you hear that?"
"Hear what? The sound hasn't changed since we've been here."
"You're correct, tis not to be heard physically, but only on the Plane Of Pi."
"The Plane of Pi?"
"Yes, it holds the same space as our mortal realm, but you cannot perceive your existence in it, as you do not inhibit it."
"But that's impossible, an object can't share the same position as another, it's-- it's physics!"
"Physics is nothing but delusion; convenient and helpful in proper execution, but the greatest fallacy of humanity is the so called stableness of reality."
"So yer sayin in your god world I don't exist? But, I'm alive and walking around here!"
"You need to free yourself from your academic prisons, Lass. Existence is not physical, nor bound by time. Your spirit and your consciousness co-exists in the mortal realm, while your physical self moves you around within it. I too inhabit the mortal realm, but it is illuminated by another that runs the same course. Only Bag-Head, the Blanketeer, Exeter, Myself, and non-physical beings share this realm. We can communicate while you cannot hear, though you be standing right next to me. You can only see us because our physical selves remain on the mortal plane."
"Non-physical beings? Like Ghosts?"
"Basically?Entities that left their physical shells, and Gods too, good and bad, but mostly bad."
"So when I die I will know this Plane of Pi?"
"Oh yes."
"What's it like? Scary?"
"Nay, It is beauteous! Stars comet at great speeds. Phasing straight through solid objects as if they were specters. They orbit constantly, astral wind pervading. If one looked through the perspective of the Plane of Pi, the physical nature of that person would seem affected by the winds, but on the mortal realm they move not?"
"This is-- this is really weird?.It defies all logic and everything I've ever been taught or thought?EVER!"
"I am truly sorry Kylia, but all is as it was before. Now you simply know the Truth."
"I think I'm going to BARF!!!"
"Wait, there it is again!"
"Huh? What?"
"Screams, I think...yes...it's Bag-Head."
"Bag-Head? That dude's my fave! The way he throws those bags on peoples' heads... PAPER OR PLASTIC!" As Kylia said this she posed thrusting her arms in front of her, making the proper noises.
"Yes, Bag-Head is the mortal you know as Zach, and what is even more, your long haired friend?"
"DREW?! HE'S BAG-HEAD TOO!?"
"No, HAHA! Drew is my Brother of Pi, known as The Blanketeer."
"Oh shit...all this time, I could've had free electricity...do you know how much we can save every month...EVERY YEAR?!"
"There. Wait?its Blank?.He's in trouble! Oh Pi!" The Lion Tamer fell to a knee clutching his chest.
"What's wrong LT?" Kylia came running toward him, hugging his massive arm. "Oh NO!" She squeezed his arm tighter and made a squeaky noise.
"My lady?could you feel that?" 
"I think I just had a nightmare?It felt like an hour went by! But, but I'm awake?" She still clung to him.
"Yes, go on, you are safe with me?"
"I saw an explosion?nuclear?It was blinding?I could feel the heat?.We were all?dead?"
Before he could say anything he felt another jolt; "Bag-Head," The Lion Tamer let out a great and horrible roar within the Plane of Pi. It shook the ground and carried all over the world, but Kylia didn't notice a thing.
"What'd he say?"
Turning around abruptly, looking at the top of the crater, The Lion Tamer spotted an exhausted Bag-Head. He was alone. Running down the hill the Bag-Head stopped before The Lion Tamer, not noticing Kylia who was staring at Bag-Head with protected adoration. 
[Why is it you hath no air within your lungs?]
(It is a thing I cannot recall to you in justice. We were shown a vision of our death and it sent him to seizure)
Kylia questioned why they just stood there in silence not saying a word.
[As did we?Did thou leavest him to throw?]
(Of course No! He was attracting the greatest of attentions, so I resolved to turn myself and hide him in my Bag of Grandiouse. Then only in hope to find you, and with you, a solution)
[My complements BagHead. Let me see him, I pray I may only help]
Bag-Head lifted his Bag of Unfathom and fell the limp body, not very delicately.
(He was convulsing only minutes earlier)
[I cannot hear the pulse of his heart]
Kylia nearly barfed again with the sight of Drew limp on the ground. Looking up at Bag-Head she said, "You suffocated him in that tiny bag!" Seemingly for the first time, Bag-Head acknowledged her with a frown and scowling eyes. It also broke the silence Kylia thought he sustained since his arrival.  
"THIS BAG? THIS BAG!?! This bag is of greater expanse than a thousand of our Earth's, and the air found within is of the freshest you could never know, thanks to your attempted destruction of it with machines like all of these." Bag-Head, obviously still startled over the condition of his comrade, had no patience for her, and completed his gesticulating by pointing at the piled trashed electronics and the trucks billowing rancorous smoke.
"I'm sa-sa-sorry...but, but, but," she started to bawl. The two heroes exchanged ideas to go about comforting her. She wailed and moaned like a toddler. The Lion Tamer lighty punched Bag-Head. It hurt. 
						*****
The world Drew knew, where he dreamt laying paralyzed watching his friends slowly murdered, vanished around him. Now, nothing but solid darkness surrounded him. 
This was death. They had all experienced it before.
In order to be born into Pi you must die from your life preceding it.
If there was one thing they could remember before Pi was death. A conscious nothingness. 
You're not there, so you don't feel or think anything. 
Going away from your conscious, you sink into your unconscious, deeper and faster. 
"We are here to help."
	Cold, rocky earth, jagged, small and sharp edged- The smell of old dust and cobwebs-- The sound and reek of gunsmoke; forests on fire, water boiling. He exhausted himself not understanding someone was attempting to speak. "Where?shit on a cracker."
	"You are in the Realm of Nothingness; Nott."
	"A perception of nonexistence."
	"We have been here before the Age of Fire, and still this place is alien, even to us."
	Finally coming to his current reality, Drew saw three ancient mythological men bearing the emblem of Pi; one in the style of a baroque Viking, resting a mountain ax over his shoulder, another in a flannel toga and sandals with a leather bag covering the top of his face, and the last holding a sword dressed in yellow cape and long hair with a black mask shielding his eyes. They were dinosaurs in comparison to Drew dressed in his Blanketeer garb.  
	"You must listen to what is said...we are running out of time as it is."
	"Calm, son."  
	"Calm...You will not find salvation, but we can help."
	"Escape can only be temporary, for this is your doom."
	"Worry not yourself as to the health of your friends. They are well, tending to you, and your dying body on your birth world."
	"Then what'd I see? I saw them...I saw them...killed. Was I killed?" He choked the last word from the bottom of his throat.
	"A hallucination, nothing but evil played on the mind. Torture imbued by the one you know as Exeter, and we, as Life Exitrioes."
	"Exeter? He brought me here? Sonofabitch."
	"No my son, you brought yourself here. Exeter controls Nott, and has used it since the Fire as a prison for his enemies."
	"But why come I'm no longer...hallucinating?"
	"Your frail mind could no longer take it. Your Pi Essence has left you, and has been sent here."
	"I'm dead? So I'm like, trapped? In hell? THIS IS FUCKING HELL???!!!"
	"No, no my son. As much as we would love the company of another brother in Pi, we are warm to tell you though you lost all signs of mortal life, you still retain the greatest thing a mortal can own: the love of friendship."
	"Oh god, that's the stupidest thing I've ever heard."
	"As we speak, your friends are trying desperately to revive you. Tis why time is so costly. We must tell you everything we've learnt while trapt here, so that you, upon your return, can free yourself from the clutches of this unforgiving, sullen place."
	"So you're telling me the population of San Tropez aren't a bunch of raging mutant werewolves?"
	"No son, that was simply in your mind. Life Exitrioes is cunning in the ways of Evil. He has planned out your sufferings... This will be your fate."
	"Damnit. Well, that blows!"
	"You will return. But alas, this may be our only moment to aid you in your journeys. You must break the Moon's Cycle, or you will be trapped here forever, like ours."
	"But seriously?werewolves?"
	"Your fate will be returning to Nott each time the Moon reaches a new cycle. Life Exitrioes will have you, until the Sun appears in San Tropez on the third day."
	"The Bastard's plan is obviously to appease your planet's superstitions of wolven folklore, driving you mad awhile'mongst the return to your friends."
	"You will cry wolf even as you find yourself prowling underneath moonlight. Your brothers will see this and laugh at you."
	"But with each new cycle, these wolves, through false visions, will appear again, and your belief will only be stronger, and your pleas for understanding more desperate."
	"Your friends will see you as a stranger. The torture will continue far beyond Nott, and you will lose your love for your friends as they will not believe your claims that are, though unknown to you, false."
	"I don't think I'll ever be able to understand any of this far-out bullshit..." Drew said but was not heard.
	"If you can fathom before your universe was created; the greater power reigned. The true struggle of Pi was at this time orchestrated, The Plane of The Gods as you know it."
	"The Plane of Pi--" Drew started.
	"Precisely, this was once the only plane of existence until the Great Mother allowed the creation of the physical plane. But that is not of importance here?"
	"The drama of the Gods; Even in this time there was trenchant strife. Gods battled gods for understanding of the greatest mystery of creation: Pi.
	"In this time there was one god who refused the battle and chose not to fight. His name was Echo. He was indifferent to the understanding of Pi, both in seeking it, and retaining it, and so he was able to avoid the fruitless battles that persisted. Echo began to see it advantageous for him to befriend sides, only taking, and so only gaining."
	"He never devoted himself to either cause, and never gave himself to the protection or capture of Pi. He moved verbally amongst all of the gods, both lame and strong. Always a liar, he brought with him evil and callous rumors of the opposition, only strengthening the hatred between the two lines in order to secure his life of apparent ease, moving back and forth, and living off one to then move on to another. He thought he was able to do so undetected, but soon the two sides discovered his lies, and asked the Great Mother to be allowed to punish as they saw fit. The Great Mother judged, and so, Echo was sent to the farthest reach of the Plane of The Gods: this place; The Plane of Nott."
	There was finally a break in the forshadowing conversation of everything to come, where Drew took in the nothingness around him. He was there alright, but he wasn't standing on anything. His body had no feeling, and the Pi Elders resembled a plagiarized imagination, instilled from visceral nightmares. Nothing about him felt particularly real, in any normal sense.
	"Great. Just great. But there ain't shit here. Everything's black and all nothing-like."
	"You cannot think of it. It is Nott; the antithesis of everything that 'is.'"
	"So, it's non-existence..."
	"NO, it is Nott."
	"Is it the opposite of existence?"
	"It lives in a multiverse that doesn't exist."
	"There are secrets that the secrets don't know about."
	"What? How is anyone gonna take you Pi-dudes seriously? You don't even know what you're talking about!"
	"Echo still resides here, I assure you, along with many other beings capable of impossible destruction."
	"Couldn't he just leave if he wanted?"
	"No, he was enforced by the Great Mother, trapped here for eternity." 
	"Echo was still himself, and could not live without gossip, and so, he begged the Great Mother to allow him to be able to communicate again. She was forgiving, but just. She allowed Echo to communicate once more, but like the rumors he spread, was enslaved only to repeat the words that bounced at these far corners. Regurgitating the lyric before the speaker, the same verse they just sung."
	"Nott became the land where all liars are sent, and Echo; their custodian. Committing their names to codex, forcing the souls to remain here with him. With Life Exitrioes' ability to be in multiple places at once, he saw a great advantage in Nott. The Great Mother would not allow him to take it for his own."
	"Lying in order to travel to the Plane of Nott, Life Exitrioes teleported here. But since he a god of greater power than Echo, was able to remove himself from the Book of Time."
	"Exeter was sent here? What was his great lie that landed him here?"
	"Well, my son, the thing is, please, shut your Pi hole, we're trying to tell a story."
	"What is important is how he removed himself from the book. Exitrioes tracked Echo. Found him at a great desk, codex open, pen in hand, staring with blank concentration, as if listening, and every so often yelling out words that had nothing to do with those spoken before him, and then would sit silent, waiting to hear more."
	"Life Exitrioes saw his opportunity. If he removed his name from the book, he would no longer be imprisoned here, and now knowing how to get to and fro unnoticed, he could travel as he pleased, and so, reign over dimensions as ruler."
	"So what? I have to do the same? Remove my name from this book? I don't read good. I can't write for shit either. Actually, I despise the act of reading?I hate it!"
	"The codex was lost. The Book of Time. The names of the damned are imprisoned in verbal contract now. Life Exitrioes is the only one who's ever been sent here, now escaped."
	"After he skedaddled, the fire stopped."
	"If this is the land of liars, then why are you here, my great forefathers?"
	"We once believed we had achieved communion and attempted to take on the strength of Life Exitrioes. We lied to fool ourselves. We were no match for Life Exitrioes, and he dealt with us?swiftly. In lying to ourselves, our souls ended here, powerless but awake."
	"All of this is very interesting, but I still don't understand one thing: how, or why did I get sent here? I didn't lie."
	"Oh but you did. The greatest lie you can commit: A lie to yourself. In attempting to end your life, you tried to convince yourself you did not want to live: The Cosmic Lie. 
	"Your suicide attempt has ensured a place here."
	"Yes, I don't think you could've emphasized that enough..."
	"Your friends cannot destroy Life Exitrioes without you. You three must stay together. The secret of Pi will have no power unless all Three beholders of the secret are together. Do not lose faith in your friends, and please Drew, never lose faith in yourself again."
	"How can I kill Exeter?"
	"Lead him to Nott."
		
	Drew awoke being pounded in the chest by a rhino sized fist. His head was enclosed in an expanding bag, sucking in fresh air, and contracted around his face; filling his lungs, only to repeat the process. The injection of life from lifelessness inundated his senses. The Bag-Head threw it off of him. The Lion Tamer withheld his next blow to his friend's heart with sudden surprised fancy. Transforming immediately, Zach and Nic stared at their friend in melancholy suspense and embraced him. Kylia was sitting to his left wet with tears.
	"Oh shit, dude! I thought...WE thought we lost you!" Nic was out of breath trying to speak and rubbing his hands all over Drew's flushed face.
	"Drew! You okay?" Zach unbuttoned his flannel and wrapped it around his shivers.
	He coughed and blinked several times, trying to regain clearer vision. "What happened? Where am I now?"
	"You're safe."
	"Apparently you collapsed. If it weren't for Zach's quick thinking you'd be dead for sure!" 
	Drew sat up and mashed his hands across his face, as if it could sober him up from the teleporting realities that were flipping and flopping over him. 
	But a flash of terrible nothingness came before him, blinding, the eyes and face of a wolf. Glowing, then gone in an imaginary gust of putrid, idle smoke?

		3.14159265359	

	A rickshaw whistled by the slick pavement, taking with it the wild giggling of a few Bowery girls dressed as slutty Martians, flying into the night across a broken, mysteriously lit street. Clouds of steam shot up from the sewers like there was an underground city beneath the metropolis. The girls flashed their nipples and fixed their hair from the wind, pointing as they passed by. Their giggling burst again as they retreated into darkness. 
	Whooshing within an invisible inch of Zach, he boozedly lunged for the curb and turned to see what made him start. Far down the road, the laughing girls and the flimsy oak cart began to dwindle. One of the three girls turned around briefly to shine a sneaking smile at Zach, orange eyes in a haze, or so it seemed, yadda yadda yadda.
      Fumbling at his face, remembering he was handicapped for vision, he lifted the patch off his right eye in time to see the cart disappear through the dim street, unaware if he actually saw one of the girls turn.
       Shaking his head and dropping the patch into place he turned from the curb and                  			walked a million steps.
	He took a whiskey drink. He took a shitty drink. It stung but it made him warm and drunk. His teleprobe vibrated. It was a text from Pundara: "Dnt cm nemre" it said. He called her. It went straight to voicemail. "Hi, it's Pundara, the best in Tropez, leave a message--" booop "I need to talk to you. Please, call me back. I'm, I'm sorry." He took another drink and fell into a pile of garbage.
	"Hey kid, why don't you go home, huh? Get some sleep, I bet your mom and dad would love to see you." A small girl gave him her balloon.
	"What the hell is this-- Who are you?"
	He said, but They had left. 
	Everything was spinning now. He threw up. Zach took the last drink from his flask then threw it through a window. 
	Sirens blared high pitch screeches; he jolted back, tripping into many piles of garbage. "Why am I fucking wearing this eye-patch? SHIT!" These people make me wanna shit!!! That's when he realized he was across the street from his destination. 
	The first sign of frost tinted his breath as he seized the door. Lifting his fist to knock Zach saw the exhalation, remembered the flashing eyes, and switched the eye patch over to his left. A fresh eye. Letting loose a tight knuckled rasp, immediately the small eyelevel slot slid open from inside and the black pupils of an angry brow stared into him. Zach was too drunk to remember Kylia had dressed him up as a pirate for the holiday.
	"Password?." hidden lips demanded.
	"She's a princess in a red dress. She's a pauper and a priestess. She's my Low Bowery girl." Fighting how ridiculous he felt, Zach repeated the rhyme.
	The slot shut immediately, a loud clanking and an inaudible yell. I'm drunk. I'm really really drunk. Come on, don't fuck up. Keep-- eyes open. Don't hurl. It was all he could taste.
	(Door swung wide) and the bear of a man stood, tank top and short shorts cut thin, a pair of flip-flop sandals wedged between his bulbous toes. The tank top said "Gone Fishin" and pictured a man sitting in an outhouse, pants around his ankles, and line going down between his legs into the toilet well hole, a gap toothed grin on his face. The bear of a man's face was just the opposite: stern and humorous as an undertaker. 
	The room beyond was lowly lit, uncertain. Blinking light bulbs breathed in and out along a thin cord tapered around the uncountable walls of the room. Up from the ground stood stacks and stacks of magazines, textbook manuals, and small skyscraper colonies of microchips and processors, glinting fiber optics glowing opal and ebony like downed swarms of insects. Behind some of the stacks he could see along the wall more cords and cables running in and out of every direction. Air laced with an acrid smell trapped like some oblong and disingenuous ghost in a creaky stairwell. The aftertaste of this smell was gasoline, as if someone had soaked the ancient ghost wood in diesel and was waiting for a spark to drive out the old stubborn presence--
	"Fuck are you looking at?" (Question.) 
	Zach turned to the big man, conscientiously. (Reply,) "Fuck if I know."  
	The big man stared. Zach met his gaze with his one leering drunk eye.
	"You're late." (Statement.) He held the big man's gaze. This was the hardest part. But it was how things went in the Lowery. Had to go this way. (Peculiar,) he still had the ability to think, this whole ceremony, (even after a bottle and a half.)
	(Reply,) "Sorry, but your sister wouldn't let me leave the bed." 
	The big man broke his sternness into a smile and placed a big hand on the bewildered visitor. 
	"Any friend of Josh, is a friend of mine." He turned, and with him turned the shoulder of the visitor. They skirted the edge of a particularly large pile of computer hardware. "But yer late." His tone reverted away from playfulness. "Marvin don't like waitin on people." They passed a few columns of books. "Especially people he don't know. People askin him favors." He stopped and turned again to peer into Zach's eye. "Just cuz Josh sez yer aight is the only reason he'll still agree ta see ya. Otterwise," he tightened his fingers on the visitor's shoulder, "Yer ass would be out of the Bowery, and if you ever showed yer dysfunctional face around here again," he pointed with a sausage finger at the eye patch, "We'd send yer ass home on a phuckin rail." He pulled the hand off the shoulder. "Got me?" Question. No Reply.
	Quite common in the Bowery, often part of a greeting, like asking how's the wife and kids? Good? You really look a little too pale, my friend! Zach knew this but it didn't make it any easier. He tried to stay serious. (Take and affirm. Sooner you get this fuckin shit the sooner you get back to the club.)
	Always the club, before and after. He'd go pick up the stupid little metal thing that Kylia needed, or the such and such that did this and that, or hunt up some ancient forgotten computer manual from some depressing boutique in the Bowery, then go back to the Low and Down Club. A couple drinks and a dance before, a few more after, a visit to Pundara? but not anymore. No more fantasy? 
	Twice now, he left the requested item in the barroom and remembered down the street, or stepping back onto the monorail, or reaching for the brake in the passenger car, almost home, and have to go all the way back at 5 in the morning, hoping like hell he hadn't blown it all by forgetting. So far he'd been lucky with his own debauchery, and made it back to the Fort in time to see Kylia lazing back in her flannel nightgown, Nic asleep, a spent checkers board splayed out in between his and Drew's cots.
	That was the guilty part. The part that ruined the relief of making it back unnoticed so that he could lie off the night before, but feel his insides convulse and vomit again and again inside him with whiskey stewed guilt. To think he'd been cowered at dingy T's bar in the Lowery while they stayed up all night waiting for him to come back with the needed part.
	He came home to find them all thus, the first time he forgot the thing in the bar. Some socket-wrench-device-thing in some terrible topless dive in the Lower Bowery. Kylia said she needed it to upload Charlie's new consol. She pieced together the almost robot from the tangled litter of the junkyard at a speed the Three could not keep up with. 
	Nic was helping the Fat Ninja build the Underground Railroad, navigating through the sewers and making maps and miniature guideposts for above ground landmarks. Zach was a bit uneasy how nonchalant they acted, never scared of getting caught or discovered down there. With all of the darkness & shit and shitty smell floating around, you would have to be crazy to go into the Underground Railroad.
	Drew stayed around and watched Kylia quietly, too quietly. Nic had brought him down through a few main tunnels to try to wake him sober one night. He got pretty sick first accustoming himself with the new atmosphere, and threw up plenty. Nic was thankful it wasn't blood. "Holy crap, what is that?" Drew pointed at a ghastly shape, grossly floating all bubbly and brown. 
	"Don't make eye contact with it!" Nic warned but it was too late. The fart monster blew up and secreted her smell throughout the already raunchy and gaggious sewer lake. Nic jumped, grabbing Drew and pulled him behind an electric box. "Get down!" he yelled right before the gust of fart wind blew by them just like an aftershock from a massive explosion. They lay there for about a minute. "Hey, wait a sec?where are we?" Nic asked himself and brought the lantern to the grungy map. Drew got up. His pants and shirt were now moist and warm.
	"How the hell did this get started?" Drew jumped at a few of the Christmas lights that were hanging down along a guided path around the corridor. "This place is like big as 30 Waldo-Marts!"
	"It's all the Fat Ninja's plan, bro. Hard to say when, but fuck, it could've been 17 years ago. I think he's a guy who sets one brick at a time." Nic started walking in a darker direction. Drew slowly followed. "And Ky's teacher, Keesle, set up the network. But I don't think it's big enough. We need to find Deadsy Tower from the sewer channel."
	"But it's a fuckin maze! None of this makes sense - the whole city's layout is all like gakkadajakka." They laughed.
	"I know." He stopped for a second. "It'll take a while, but it will be worth it." They moved again after Nic had planted a flood light. 
	"You actually like it down here?"
	"I see the potential, but for what, I don't know." All the light they could see now was from Nic's forehead lantern. Drew tripped and cursed. "Told you to bring a flashlight!" Then Nic hit his head on a pole. "Ow."
	"Yikes, that's gonna leave a mark."
	"Shut up." Nic turned his lantern back on. "Wait-oh sweet, this is it; this is the Marvin drop zone!"

	All for the resurrection of a Frankenstein computer: Kylia slaving away at it while the others attempted to go about their Pi as if it was the same as ever. 
	This time, Zach left the sprocket in the john after being sick?and after a therapeutic session with Pundara. Just slipped his mind like his lunch slipped his system. He had to go all the way back for it. 
	Kylia was stumbling out of the shack and saw Zach come up over the crest of the garbage heap hill. They both waved, Kylia wearily.
	"Are you just geting back from the Bowery? If it's too much trouble to go down there, I can go, or try to find it here. It must be god awful." Kylia scratched her crotch.
	Zach swallowed heavily. "Yeah-- its, not so bad. I went to T's after-- got to keep an eye on the Cracker Factory. Make sure nothing strange?going on?"
	 	(Strange? Nothing can be strange anymore)
	 It was a lame answer. He handed the weird thing to Kylia.
	"Oh, hell yes! You got it! Thanks Zach! Now Charlie is going to live again, he's gonna be as strong as ever, stronger even! I'm gonna give him eyes and a mouth and a hand! And if I can just?" she continued talking. She walked over broken parts and dirt commons around Charlie's consol. Zach passed out on a heap listening to Kylia talk to herself, banging away. Repeating "He's alive. HE'S ALIVE!"
 	
	"Come, Mr. Marvin will see you now." They turned a cluttered corner of the room. There were a couple of people snorting Calm on a poker table off the belly of an intoxicated turtle. On the wall was rather a romantic portrayal of Marvin, who was now aspiring for the self-claimed title of Kingpin of the Underground. The painting had a very misleading Marvin dressed as Napoleon on a golden horse, yet complete with a profound mustache.
	(Some fuckin name, Mr. Marvin. Ha! Marvin the Main man of the Lowery! Main man my ass. Trumped up computer fuck born with some sick incline to Mafioso talk and fat-ass door men. Probably seen Godfather too many times.) Josh had told them all about him, as if he were the savior of the underground. "He was running operations down in the Bowery way before the flood. Sure, his tactics might not seem moral or ethical?" Josh told the doomed Three, the day after Zach brought back the sprocket after forgetting it once. "He practically runs the whole Lowery from in there. He would be a valuable asset to the Underground."
	"You mean Exeter allows him to run the Lowery," Zach had said coyly, coldly sweating. Thinking about the night before; getting another drink, the low rook buildings of the Lower Bowery, the whore from Minx Street. He lit a cig and wiped his nose. The vision of Pundara came rushing to him, and the look on her face after he struck her.
	Nic thrust his hand into the conversation, "We've gotta try. We have no choice but to trust this guy. If Kylia needs a part for Charlie, then we get it for her. She's with us now. Her and Charlie are the key. Don't ask me how or why I think that." They didn't. "If Josh says this guy's cool, then, we should trust him too."
	"I don't know about trusting anyone. He can hear us. I know, even now. People forget to think about Pi. Josh and Kylia and everyone else can die. We can't. It's our problem."
	Josh started, "No Drew, come on, trust me, don't talk like that!"
	"If you don't want to go to the Bowery anymore, I'll go and you can try to finish that bridge I built." Nic interjected.
	"No, no, it's not that. I don't mind going to the Bowery. I just think it's dangerous to go so often. It's just a matter of time before someone sees me coming up out of that shaft." 
	They both left Drew out of the equation on this matter, turning sour and augural every night, entranced by the sliver of moon, waiting. His head tilted unsteadily as if sadistically educing the color and shape of death, burbling about a lie strong enough to put out the fire. One nott yet written. A cycle of the moon had come and gone, and Drew was falling deeper into a trap. Soon, it would fully consume him?
	Nic and Zach showed worried pale lips to each other. Drew was slowly becoming insane, and part of it was rubbing off on the quintet. Screaming during sleep, frighteningly disturbing things, about men stuck in shadows with drooling wolf faces. The moon waxing. 
	"Well, there is one more thing, I guess," Josh started.
	"Should you say it? Do we really need any more shit right now?"
	"The hippie that brings Drew Calm, Groggs Felchison, has been using the Railroad for drug routes."
	"So? Big Deal!" Nic puffed, not seeing what was truly presented before him.
	"He knows a lot of people, and well, has a big mouth. Enormous mouth."
	"Alright, alright," Zach admitted less reluctantly than he acted, "I'll go see this guy, what was it, Marvin?" He shook his head, already foreseeing rejection, but also smelling the taint and promise of whiskey and sin, frilly head and braces trading dignity on the street, skirt crooked and her hair lit, nearly on fire, running like roman candles, exploding in various alleys and huddled rooms. All throughout the bowery, they set walls on fire with each other's screams, making Zach forget the most important-- "If Kylia needs this transistorvalic generator, or whatever it is, we'll get it for her." The others nodded, except for Drew who strayed away from the group, attempting to pray to the lifeless moon in the big sparkly dome overhead.
 	
	Around a stack of manuals, Zach finally saw the man, the Main man. He was a squat man, big (or small) as Drew, this he could tell from sitting down. He was tucked into an office chair; the pale fluorescent light of a computer glued his gaping face to the screen, glasses as thick as his mustache. (At least it's what I expected.)
	"Well, well, well, you must be the flunky Josh told me about-- aren't cousins wonderful?" He spoke not looking over to the visitor, but motioned for him to come in. "SO, you're an intern with ol Josh? Shine his shoes? Get him coffee? Heh-- Nah, you're another one of his dodo fans who eat him up?Probably believe in UFO's, don't ya, friend?" Now he turned from the computer, acme of seriousness, "Crop circles? Bigfoot? Werewolves?" Zach smiled. "Man oh man, you kooks be full of ideas, but I'll tell ya this bud, if you double cross me or my cousin, I'll be sending yer ass home on a phuckin rail." This was also a way people said goodbye in the Bowery. It was standard to start and end a conversation with a threat. Simple goodbyes, but also the Big Goodbye as well. "I'd love to hear all about the Boogeyman, but, unlike you, I have a life. The part that you requested is right here." He pointed to a small shoe box at the corner of his desk. "And I gots to tell you, even I had a hard time finding that pieceashit. Ancient as all hell. Had to pull some strings, so needless to say you'll be owing me." 
	The damp lights around the room glowed in and out with a rising and falling hum. Zach nodded and picked up the shoe box. It was surprisingly light. He could see a single feather sitting in there. Or maybe a thing that could turn Europe on and off and fit the lock on a dungeon cell, secrets spinning on the other side. The big man again placed his hand on his shoulder and pulled him away from Marvin who resumed his seat at the desk. He smiled again, knowingly, actually a little glad he came now. Here was another with no faith. Zach handed him $1000. Marvin only asked for $500. 
	Finding money is never a problem when you have super-powers. Zach didn't understand why people put so much power into a piece of paper, but decided to take advantage, because people don't care how they get it as long as they get it.
	"Wait," Marvin the Main man stood up, he came up to Zach's chest. "Before you go--- you better not be lying to me or Josh. Because if I find out that you aren't who you say you are, I'll hunt you down and ride your ass out of town on a phuckin rail. I take family very seriously, even the delusional ones like my cousin." Zach smiled inside only, (they like to ride their rails in the Lowery.) "Lord knows I'm no friend of Deadsy, but I don't like subversive little punks like you either. I keep to my own and I stay out of other peoples bidness. You understand?" (Nod. Leave.)
	The big stupid oaf led him not so gingerly out to the completely different environment of a zoo with no cages; the Bowery. Zach was trying to hold his own and blend in, but he couldn't tell if people were wearing costumes or not.
	As he stepped outside onto the crooked Low Bowery street, another rickshaw passed by the curb. The driver huffing; his breath visible and his cheeks stained red. The back of the cart was stuffed with gorgeous women, or what seemed like gorgeous women.
	Zach fell into a large, mass-pile of garbage after stepping off the curb to avoid being trampled. In the rush of craziness, he swore he heard one of them say, "Was the lie woven?" and then another, "Yes, one has already. The Cosmic Lie, sure enough!" And then they burst again into giggles and trailed away into the night. He removed the eye patch and stood blinking, staring after the cart. Trying frantically to regain normal vision, because once again he was not sure if what he saw was real. Because he saw their teeth shinning, and their eyes flashing the colors of the flag of Evil.
	Remembering T's lounge was closed for October Christmas, he decided to walk around the block until Pundara responded back. Titillating the idea the Three were on the verge of something, he tested the lightness of the shoe box containing the malicious microchip. (Or in the right hands, divinity) For some reason, he dared not open to reveal what was inside. He tucked it under his arm. He glanced at his teleprobe and saw he had no missed communication. He texted Pundara "I'm coming over."
	A cold wind blew, and down the street behind him was a gathering crowd of party animal ravers doing a flash mob. They were coming from all over. (There is nowhere to hide)
	But there was something else that was coming very soon. Zach began to think Drew was right to be paranoid. In the sky, a nearly full moon was rising. He hurried his steps, breathing heavy crystals into the air on his drunken way to Dara's.


		Halloween  
"Where the dogs bark and the wolves howl; The air is full of strange sounds, 
If you listen you can hear his call; That monster must be on the prowl
Down the road there was a town, The whole place burned down to the ground
No one live's to tell the tale, And the sheriff, he's still on the trail
When the sun goes down, All the people in town - stay home"
				-Vern Fergusen 1985-2017 "Monster"

The Professor was locking the front door of her house, suddenly wishing her family had been home. They were out at taekwondo and soccer practice. I'll make their breakfast tomorrow morning, or tuck them in later tonight, she hoped. 
She set out from her family of 5 for the last time towards a surfeiting sewer drain and climbed down, covering her jeans and Doc Martins in the greenish grime. She landed awkwardly, rolling her ankle, cursing at her foolish haste. 
	The retired hero was too old for this, though it seemed only yesterday Pi was in her womb. She didn't understand how the Fat Ninja still had the stamina he did from when they were younger. Children. Keesle the Weasel wasn't carefree or lionhearted as the old days. But that's why the Three are here. They were much more powerful than Exeter thought, More than I even know. 
After tonight, the Underground Railroad would be sustained completely by a clean renewable energy powered by a single rod from the Blanketeer, a battery Charlie imagined, constructed by Ky and Keese. It would illuminate the caverns and subterranean rivers and misleading pipes throughout the Underground. Let there be light. But the best thing was, the battery emitted energy; people would use it without even knowing it. This miracle invention excited Keesle. "Fuck regulations. Give it to the people for free. Who cares? If this is anarchy, then I want more of it." She laughed slyly.
The tunnels were much easier to navigate through now. Nic nearly single handedly made the Fat Ninja's vision come to life. Of course she and Josh contributed, but the Three's power's made the maze of San Tropez's sewers feel like a newly founded neighborhood. 
She messaged the others she would be at the generator in 20 minutes?
No one showed up.
Strange, but not unexpected. She'd never been alone here for too long of a time. The flow of the underground channels was all she heard. The lack of voices outside her head was starting to get to her.
She trudged on with her experiment, alone. Everything else is in order. All she had to do was plug in the two connector pieces and the Underground Railroad would breathe. She wished someone else was there to commemorate the moment, but there was no time to delay.
The battery was heavy, and the clicking sound was thick and bassy; very satisfying to hear. Immediately the dim faded into brightness. The water started to stir from the propulsion of makeshift purifiers and a spiffy air current device, filtering in and out clean oxygen. There was a gentle hum, and then the music began to play. It made Professor Keesle laugh. It's a miracle. It's beautiful. It's real! She couldn't believe it. She almost started dancing, but felt someone might've been watching. She was right. 

After the titanic pipe-organ blew out its last glowering power-chord, the crowd ruminated, enamoredly silent. Carlton Megaladon broke his resentful smile, displaying his shark teeth, "Yay yay, we are here today, and tomorrow and the next day, so now let us bow our heads, and pray." A dumpy, peevish altar-girl hobbled next to the high priest and opened a massive tome for the leader of verses to spellbind. He lifted his hands outwardly but not very high up. The man in strange, vivid, dark colors seemed happy and relaxed. His southern comfort could put a methhead to sleep: "In the wake of destruction, we shall build a new future?When all has become sin, there is nothing left but to cleanse those that unknowingly suffer. When there is no more you can do for the poor, you lock your door. If in the night where there is no bright, you see a fire of fires that cannot be quenched by any act of man-- you run away. Help the world get rid of a few 'stragglers' that put weight on our society. We know them as the bane of civilization. And thus spoke Exeter, 'The ability to conform in a dire situation shows a great ability to change for the greater good. And this is proof, that man will overcome in times of total darkness?or when the fires overtake us.'" The false religious leader lifted the holy book high and said "Thanks be to God. Brought to you by Gomez! Cracker factory." Everyone else said 'Amen' and then sat down.
Carlton dismissed the petulant, dumpy altar girl with a pat on the butt and strode down the few stairs to speak at floor level with his congregation of brainwashed lazy nitwits. "Today's Gospel reading reminds me of when I was a little boy. I lived in Louisiana, with my grandma and grandpa. My parents killed themselves after a bank robbery went awry?but I was not told that until I was much older. Grandma said they were burned alive by Three evil men. I didn't understand the concept of evil. I only knew good. I was a child of God from the gitgo thankyaverymuch, and not the child of a monkey!" The crowd gave a hearty uproar and stood on end, clapping and yelling and throwing confetti. Some rave lights began to turn on and flicker while a bass beat started up, but quickly died away. "But I asked my grandma, 'Nana, what kind of men would do such a thing?' She came close to me and said 'The Three, that's who?They are men whose only goal is to control the entire world. They are young men who are careless and reckless and will do anything to get their ideology across. They will go to no end until they are the only thing we are allowed to think about. They want to kill you and your children. They want to harvest your bodies and maladroitly gerrymander your daughters with tortued perversions! They don't want peace. They want war and death and destruction and hate and violence." The crowd was silent. Someone farted. "Then I asked my Nana, 'but how can I fight against these Three bad men?' And she looked at me and smiled with a tear in her eye, hugging me close to her warm, soft breast, and ever so softly whispered in my ear 'You have to pray, child!' So I did. And so do you." The theophanic leader lost all the charm in his face, seeing his audience of fat drooling idiots. He scowled, slowly rising to the altar? 

Beware the Cosmic Lie-" Drew sprung out of his cot cold, waiting to be apprehended in the fetal position. His eyes closed tight, fearing sodomy. He paused a moment, then slowly crept his right eye ajar, scanning; No one was there. 	
"Stay in today, get some rest and take it easy," Nic told him. 
Drew's dreams were never comforting; all the previous nightmares made him ill--but-- He could've sworn he heard familiar echoing voices?the harmonization of his forefathers. 
~What if we don't escape the moon?
-Then you'll be trapped. Maybe both of us will? we have no choice-
His hand masked his face in disbelief. "Hello?" he called out. "Who said that-- Ky? Zachary? Nicolai?"
~ Our boy's life is at stake.
-No, you fool, existence is.
	The talking continued as Drew probed every part of the fort and found no trace. They didn't stop and showed no concern for Drew or acknowledged him into the conversation in any way. 
~Exeter is here now...I hear the whirr of vast emptiness.
-We must lead him elsewhere.
~To where?
-Where the hell do you think!?
"Shut up!" he screamed with a mouthful of emotion and threw a checkerboard across the room, cracking a tall mirror that now showed 1000 reflecting wolf faces staring at him.
~It's changing now, there will be a window open?
-Yes, yes, I'm afraid it will.
He began to pull out his long brown hair. "Stop! Please-- just stop!" He yelled, foreshadowing tears and absent of air. The voices quieted, but could be back any millisecond. "Who are you?" He waited. "God damnit! Answer the fuckin question!" They didn't. 
"Charlie? Hey, are you online?"
"Yes Blank, how can I help you?"
"Did you just call me Blank?"
No response. Drew's head was spinning, yet stationary, still on his neck.
"Look up an address for a doctor."
"What are your symptoms?"
"Schizophrenia. And diarrhea." The shattered mirror and broken glass gazed back at him with 2000 wolf eyes, each single piece independently melting into horror. 
	-There must be a sacrifice...
~ I think the boy can hear us!
-The Realm of Nott: we will return.
Drew tumbled, jerking to the ground again, heavy & disoriented. "What is this? Am I dying again?" His mouth leaked blood: "You two assholes are killing me!" He snorted through his chapped red drooling lips. His scarred wrists ripped open and slowly bled through his shirt.
-He has surrendered to the Cosmic Lie.
~Speak not of it. We are the last of his sanity.
"Ah, fuck off," he said. 
The voices stopped. 
When he looked at the mirror, it was full again, and his shirt was clean with dry wrists. Out through the only window, the outlying Deadsy Tower scoffed at him brightly like a Freudian pun. He scoffed right back by grabbing his junk. 
"Blank, what is happening?" 
"Charlie, print me the addresses now, it's an emergency!" 
But Charlie warned him, urging him not to go while he ripped out the page from the printer and headed to the Old Market. 
Though his mental symptoms had been momentarily stabilized, his physical symptoms were feverish, tense, hungry and trembling. A cold was on its way. He could feel it itch as he spat a fat wad of dark yellow and brown mucus on the dirt.
He grabbed a handful out of the money box and stuffed it down his pants. He followed the long, winding path that led to the monorail stop. He took the first train, unknowing of its destination, trying to act as normal as possible. About an hour after he felt too claustrophobic. 
Drew jumped out, falling on the waiting station. 
Attempting to assess his location, he double-checked the print out of the address. "I'll be damned," he mocked. 

Three girls, all holding hands, brushed by in front of him as he entered the Doctor's Mid-Town building. He heard them hiss a sneering growl, and stared as they tramped away. They laughed, cackling spells to each other. Their shape: serpentine and seductive. 
Drew's head swam slow, burdened. The world about him was moving at abnormal speeds that did not align with this slaughter of reality.
-It comes soon, the dark, full red moon, you must be ready.
"God damnit dude, shut the fuck up, ok? Or I will fuckin kill you." His sandals clopped up the tiled stairs into an office with white lettering on the clear glass windows: Psycho Services. He wiped sweat off his brow and entered the room, slowly.
It resembled an office you might see in a legitimate 80's horror movie. "Yeah Hi, I woke up this morning hearing voices, uhm, inside my head, that, well, weren't really my own. Do you have any drugs for that?" He said over a speckled desk to a secretary madam.
"Do you have an appointment?" She responded without looking, finishing her game of Solitaire Serial Suicide.
"I've got cash," he threw a wad of twenties at her.
"Shirley! I'm open! Send the young boy in!" An older man's voice called. Shirley pointed her thumb towards the room behind her, still staring at the screen, counting the money.
Inside the Doctor's head office, a gray wiley-haired man thomped his keyboard, back facing Drew. "Go ahead and sit down," he gestured, flopping his hand. "What seems to be the problem? Stress from school? Did a girl tear your heart out? Nightmares?" He asked, still fingering the keyboard's G-spot. Sounded like he had a couple extra fingers to help him.
"Uhm, no-Well, yes?"
"Oh, I see, a little too much of boys being boys." 
Drew managed to let out a short, nervous and exaggerated chuckle. "Heh...Not exactly. That might be a small understatement." he paused, glancing upwards, pondering what he just said. "Probably a huge understatement."
"Go on..." He dully said, still facing the computer with a dry, slightly interested tone of voice.
"Ok, well, I've been eating a lot of, well, I don't even know what they're called; Calm I guess ...At least 12 a day...probably twice that every night. I haven't been sleeping much lately."
"Drugs will do that, son. You need to stop immediately."
"No...But recently," Drew was shifting in his seat trying to get comfortable when he saw a picture of Exeter on the Doctor's desk, holding up a baby into a ray of blasphemously goddless, gold sunshine. "I can't sleep because I'm scared of the dark, or what's in the dark." He stared at Exeter. He now saw the baby ripped in two and Exeter smiling with bloody fangs stained black with red. 
"The Dark is unknown to you, to everyone. Stress and anxiety also induce relative fear and paranoia. Have you ever tried electromagicity?"
"Uh, no, because it sounds completely retarded."
"I can tell you are out of patience?Is there something you're afraid might happen, in the near future?" The Doctor asked, ceasing his typing but still back facing Drew.
"I think I'm going to hell." he said to the carpet, dwelling coldly.
"And what are you going to Hell for?"
"A lie."
"A lie, you say?" The doctor turned around. Drew met his eyes. It was an isolated and eerie exchange.
-Get out of here, boy!
~Do it Drew!
"Did something happen just now, friend?" Drew made another awkward shift and scratched his neck, leaving a trail of red marks.
"I've been hearing voices," he pawed at his wrists, intimidated by the Doctor's gaze. He figured Psychologists loved it when patients bring up aberrant shit, but this was scary and obsessive. "They don't tell me what to do or anything...They just, kinda...talk about me--I think."
"Yes Yes, I've dealt with this in the past, more and more each year. It can lead to fatal results, unless we are able to treat you, immediately." The doctor was now scrambling for a pad as if what Drew said was the most groundbreaking study since the discovery of bacteria.
~Get out now, Drew! Don't tell him another word!
	Maybe if the voices in his head would've quieted, he would've been paying more attention, enough to have seen the pX symbol right below the Doctor's Diploma or the huge fucking sign on the building that said DEADSY PERSONALITY HOSPITAL. "I would like another meeting with you. There are several tests that can further my studies and help you immensely. Have you ever heard of electromagicity-hypnosis? It's really great." He gave no time for Drew to reply. "I want you to come to my laboratory tomorrow at 8am, on the basement floor of the Deadsy Tower?Have you ever been? It's quite nice. You'll love it!"
"Yeah, Ok, sure, yeah, but, Shit!" he pretended to gesture at an invisible watch. "I gotta go, I need to-- pick up- go-- with, uh, somebody?" He was nervous and showing it. If he didn't leave this instant, he could spill priceless, vital information he wasn't even aware of, before he did something irrational?or more irrational. 
"Ummm?I didn't catch your name young man?"
"Oh, hah, silly me! Didn't even give the doctor my fucking name! Ha, no but it's?Artie MacAlpine, the third. I'm from? Wahoo, visiting my brother? Jedellffuss Johannunmansonnsin, uptown."
	"Hmm?interesting," he jotted on a clipboard, "Well here's my card." Dr. Nner it read in cold, vivid blue letters. "Be sure to come tomorrow. You will be rewarded handsomely as well, for your services."
	-Creepy

	"Professor Keesle?" Josh yelled down the long, spacious and nearly empty corridor. It was not Keesle though. The hooded guy stumbled drunk, like a hopped up buffoon.
	"Huh?" The person turned around.
	Josh was startled by the stranger in the subterranean caverns. After Josh recognized the tie-dye and hemp under his hood, he quickly deduced it was the drug dealer, Groggs. The pusher man was oblivious to his surroundings, but still managed to face the noise. His face lighted up.
	"Dude! Josh Turkey, cool!" Josh shined the light close on the dude's long hair, beard, unnecessary sunglasses, and a tie-dye shirt referencing some music festival and a scraggily backpack. "I've seen you on the internet man, its fuckin brilliant!" He threw some calm down his mouth and said "whoa," rather dazedly.
	Josh shined the light beyond the hippie dude and saw other people. Josh extended his hand. The hippie caught it and said "Groggs is the name, and drugs is my game."
	"Who else did you tell about this place?"
	"No one, homie!" That was a lie.
	"Groggs, it is imperative this operation doesn't reach the surface. If Deadsy were to find out--"
	"Whoa whoa dudebra, I know Marvin, OK? He gives me the shit and Drew buys most of it and we kinda distribute it together--" He went on but Josh studied something Groggs was holding. It was a crumpled concert flyer. He noticed the dates and snatched it from Groggs' hands, turning it over with shocked, puzzled dread, covering his mouth in surprise.
	"Deadsy is already here?"
	"Chill man, you're bumming me out! Listen, I got kids to feed, I can't go back to juvee! Ya know? I mean, shit, it's a tough economy. I gotta pay the bills somehow!" Groggs held his hand high but Josh stared at it and slapped his own face in disgusted nausea. 
	"Ok Ok OK, calm down Turkey, you're a reasonable, sharp-witted reporter. What would Bill Hearst do?"
	"Who the disco is Bill Hearst ?"
	Inside Josh's jacket was a holster for his supercamera, strapped tight to the side of his ribs. Groggs saw this and thought it was a gun. "Oh holy shit balls man, I didn't know you worked for Deadsy! Please man, I'll do anything."
	"Tell me everything you know about this." He held up the flyer that advertised a rave taking place in the Underground Railroad, this very night.	

An hour earlier, back at the Fort:
"Fuck, where the heck's Drew?" Nic said.
"My first guess; refilling his prescriptions," said Zach, attempting to light up a cigarette, but his lighter was useless so he quit trying, then went over to Charlie, who lit it up right away.
"I searched through all his shit so I could flush those goddamned pills?he must keep them next to his heart."
"I could've used one of em, my head hurts." He took a bite of cold, week-old pizza, then took a deep drag.
Kylia rushed in the door. "YO! Fellas! Marvin got in the positron circuit. It's the last thing I need; it will FINALLY sync Charles with the motherboard calendar, for realz! I'll be able to get past Deadsy's Ellis-firewall inversion!" She sorted through the shoebox full of money and put a wad on the table, ranting constantly and unplugging cords.
Zach didn't listen to a word she said. He rummaged his pockets for his teleprobe, hoping for a message from Dara, maybe one that read: I miss you ;( 
Trying to understand the featureless shadow instilled on his brain, he reached further out, but even as he pictured himself hugging and kissing her all over he still couldn't see, smell or feel.
"The Fat Ninja knew our parents," Nic tried to say casually. Kylia wasn't listening to their conversation, she was eating and choking on pretzels. "Keesle too."
"Of course." Zach inhaled deep noxious smoke, trying to hide how much he wanted to remember, knowing how unhealthy it is to search for the unanswerable. If they were alive, it would be a mystery why Exeter wouldn't eviscerate them. "But the Power of Pi vanquished any memory I've had before the birth of my Bag."
"Yeah, ditto, kinda." Nic tried to think, but the only thing his mind could focus on was his short friend Drew. "Is death salvation to the immortal?"
"By the time you guys get back I'll be all ready for installation and Drew should be home from wherever he's at. He probably went to get us some beer and pizza!" Kylia was confident with this idea.
"He did sleep all night," Zach chimed, "maybe he feels better. He could be back soon."
"How would you know, you didn't get in until 8 this morning? 
"Go to Marvin, do yer thing with the sluts and the booze and I'll sweep the railroad for Drew..." Zach was threatened by this comment but didn't say anything. He wanted to call Nic an asshole, but figured he could call him one when he returned. He brushed against Nic and grabbed the wad of cash and a flannel coat and went out the door with ambitious speed. "Asshole," Nic whispered. Kylia shook her head from side to side, finally deciding this is what it's like to have brothers. 
	
	"Asshole?" Nic muttered again, lowering his head, shaking. "--Asshole? That's what he wanted to say to me?Fuck! I was only honest. I thought he knew what he was doing; he chooses his actions purposefully, that's who he wants to be, then fuckin beautiful! Be yourself and I won't judge." Kylia was trying to put her thoughts in, but found Nic was only talking to himself. "The least judging action is one to openly admit another's actions without anger, opinion, or valuation-?- If I were to be an asshole in my own mind, I would've told him he's wasting his life on blind and unreal endeavors. He's worth more and time's growing scarce. Ha! An asshole in my own mind for telling someone they were of greater worth than they ever believed. Fuckin A."
"Er, Nic? Everything--uh, OK?" She was bent over at the waist, her head sideways. Did I say that out loud?...Embarrassed, he rose and confronted her once more, putting a hand over her shoulder, pulling her close.
"Good to see you Mademoiselle Ky, I mean, what the hell happened to me? Right? Right!? Haha?!" She had no idea what the hell Nic was doing. One second he was staring at the floor, moronically jabbering to himself. Now he smiled like an imbecile, talking to her like they hadn't talked in ages.
"I've been here the whole time, and no, I have no clue what happened to you." 
"I know, I know. It's just good to see you. No bullshit when you're around."
Did he mean it? No bullshit when I'm around? Does that mean there's bullshit when he's around other people?
"Damn, this shit becomes more real every fuckin second. I gotta get outta here?Get some air that hasn't been filtered through the heat of a hundred computers and the engines of thirty trucks--" 
Why does he talk like that? He always says too much. Just say you're leaving. Great, now he's looking ashamed like he knows I think he's melodramatic. 
"Cross your fingers Ky; I gotta find Drew, and I don't think I will." - 
Nic bounced out the door, grabbing a flashlight and Kylia's ethrapad, logging onto the channels while heading for the sewer entrance. There were twenty two unread messages on her e-pad, all from Keesle and Josh. He sent one back to them without reading any of theirs. "Have you seen Drew?" SEND>. Then he opened Josh's latest text. "There are people swimming in Poop River!"
"What?" Nic laughed aloud, but then kept opening the other messages. Keesle: "There is another group of ravers partying on the south side-" - Josh: "They offered me Drugs!" - Keesle: "Some ravers sucked me in! What the hell are they doing down here?!" - Josh: "They're soliciting coitus! Teenage Amazons!"
Nic suddenly became overwhelmed with a truly uneasy feeling, in and outside his body. How the hell did people get down there? They couldn't have seen us?but?Marvin?It's a perfect place to host a rave?besides the smell, I guess. Nic messaged them again, "I'm here, where are you?"
There was no response from Keesle, but Josh responded only a few minutes after Nic sent out the text.
He ran as fast as his legs could scramble, but when he nearly plowed through the main sewer junction, a sinister lingering presence kept him from going into the smoky darkness. Fighting his rising fear, Nic clenched his teeth and ran into the abyss of zero light at full speed, but the Cosmic Lie drudged worse and worser, like an anvil to the balls. It sent a shiver through him, yelling and shrieking inside his mind. "What are you doing? You'll never make it! The road is too dark and twisty to forsee what lies ahead! You will suffer alone for your choices! You will never be happy!"
	The voice became louder and louder with each step, but it was several different voices at once, screaming and moaning at him like a conscience that couldn't get over an inaccurate past mistake. They were the voices of everyone he ever heard. 
	He saw visions of the dead Pi before him, alongside their eviscerated, withering empty bodies; alien crucifixes and nowhere-portals, men shaped of ill form and nature, bleeding into the canopy of Multiverses like a pond to a lake to a river to an ocean.
	Nic would be left with no other choice. He had to leave, abscond forever. He was suffocating from the inescapable cabal, his own inner voice orbiting around a sea of irrational negativity; repeating the false mantra, You are worthless.
	Something threw him out of his transposed fugue, but what, he could not say for sure. He wasn't anywhere near where he intended; teetering on the edge of Downtown. How long was I running for?
	Nic was shivering as if he'd been dipped in liquid nitrogen, covered with permafrost all over his hands and knees. 
	But his stomach felt afire. He panicked a bit before he started breathing normally.
	There was a startling commotion far away, in the Bowery. Though it was eight miles away, Nic could see it clearly; All hell breaking loose.
                                     ***
	In a great arched motion, the rippled pad of a giant index descended onto me, pressing so firmly as to cause me to lose my own grip on inertial stillness. Pressing more. Pushed to the depths, the capacity of my own extensible limits. Lit with a red glow, and as the finger relieved me of my depression, raised instantly back to my initial position by a coiled wire that found its footholds in the creases of my back side. Now left here, different. Left, to blink. Red...I could see the finger that once was my insurgent-coarctater...Red...it was lifted to be cuffed under the longer part of a similar finger-like extension that came abeam of the owning beast's torso in fold...red.
	It's been longer than I care to recall since I've tasted the sweet rush of being completely ensconced in blood. But my own won't do. It lacks a certain uniqueness, or quality of unfamiliarity. No, it most, and must, must, and most, certainly be the blood of another. I do not know from how this lust arrived, perhaps since my first sprouting, but I have no need of origin. There is no past, and there will be no future if I do not feed my prescience for what it longs. Hold. The whitened bars of my cell are beginning to grow, now dividing. Light. Sweet light. In darkness you are left with none but your thoughts, but light brings with it distraction. Sweet distraction. And another sensation. I cannot control myself. I am flung and flailed. Air rushing behind me, bending and serving the manipulation of its path out of my cavern. If I continue I shall be thrown from my cavern crashing into that black perforated coin, or stricken against the jagged white jail irons.
	From within the mouth of Exeter, the tongue waggled in painful pleasure, dancing like a virgin being sacrificed to the envious gods of Spring. The blood in his mouth did not satisfy his unquenchably craving thirst. No amount of blood ever would. Only Pi. 
	He took out a blow torch from beneath his desk and ignited the flame upon his thumb. It kept alight as he threw the flame thrower out the high window. He watched the fire playfully writhe. He couldn't decide if he hated it or loved it, but knew they were the same. 
	The grande elevator chimed open. Exeter was disgruntled to notice Dr. Nner scampering out of the fine silver doors like a proud nincompoop. Megaladon sat at the far end of the table, watching porn, spiritless.
	Dr. Nner, what do you have for me?
	"Sir, I've received another, I know you're busy, but I thought you'd want to know." He handed him a file assorted with pictures and colorful graphs and statistics. 
	Lighter now with impediment locution.
	I know full well a doctor lives to serve his profession.
	"Oh no sir, I live only to serve you. A doctor who saves lives is of whom you speak. One who aims to save minds from themselves in manners alike mine, only wish to serve themselves, but you are in me, and I am you."
	As much as I cherish all your prefix allots you articulate in detailed conversation, I'm in the middle of meditation?
	"My Lord, tis the child of Nott; he's extremely depressed, schizophrenic, perhaps Turrets, but this specimen was unlike the others. I could tell." Dr. Nner was extremely excited and proud with the news.
	Perhaps you've met our boy, had he with him two in trio?
	"No sir. He came alone."
	The delicacy of the conversation slowly descended to aphonic tones. At the helm was Exeter's tongue slowing in anger.
	"This boy showed Apprehension of myself-- himself, a misunderstanding of his role both in his surroundings and in portraying himself to such surroundings-- fear of all things, but not his own fears, rather the delayed fears of a soldier taking orders from officers who rest within the confines of his own mind; I remembered every word. Your commands, sir, are like poetry to me."
	"ENOUGH WITH YOUR BASE FLATTERY-- I AM SICK OF YOUR IGNORANCE OF YOUR PLACE AND MY POWER --THIS BOY WILL BE LIKE ALL THE REST OF YOUR APOLOGIZED FAILURES!"
	Shrunken now to the size of the button that once glowed red, now a stagnant crimson on the speaker which bellowed these angered words, Dr. Nner pleaded for his life. "Sir, there's nothing left but apologies for those misgivings! I thought for certain they would have been the one whom you met in your place of Nott. I promise this one is different."
	LIKE THE REST FROM THE REST
	"Sir, please, Mercy!"
	Mercy? HA! Mercy me doctor. Give me mercy from your failings. I fear you can't, and I fear nothing. You do not play the music how the conductor sees fit. Be gone with you before I become angry.
	"Th-thank you, sir, for your infinite forgiveness." The final words seemed to fall out of Dr. Nner, in a rush of breath as his head slumped below his shoulders.
	Ha! There's my irascible Doctor once more. Infinite Forgiveness. HA! Turning his gaze down the length of the table, Carlton Megaladon was busy in hardcore pornography, Why do you tell them such Carlton, should not a god be Judge first?
	Speaking in southern monotone, Carlton's answer had the sound of a quoted text or a rehearsed speech, "Sir, it is truth, but a lie of a truth. Infinite forgiveness is Judgment. A judge deals penance without bias or aft feelings. 
	"But I blur the lines, telling congregations they can act as they wish with no repercussions or consequence. It causes the most moral of men to give in to temptation, mistaking it for freedom. Pity." He smiled and continued attentions to the animated porn.
	Laughing full, Exeter hugged his own, leaning back comfortably in his chair, turning his gaze. Beautiful, did you hear that, doctor? Now that's poetry. Manipulating the masses. You could learn from Carlton; plays music like a piano-roll. You're given the periodic table and you can't plant a single flower. He's given unbelievable stories and promises and forms an army of dissenters. Keeping you around this long was a mistake. So listen and take heart; give me the Horrible Secret or I'll bite out your throat.
	The Doctor dragged himself through the office timorously in shame. 
	Exeter watched himself in another place, having drinks with Shia Lebeouf and Joseph Gordon-Levitt and couldn't decide who was a bigger twat. The drinks were watered down and awful.
	He was also in the front row of a Sentimental Mass, being led by a guest host, Madame Baby. Exeter wept a fake, glorious tear, and those that saw it fell much deeper into his spell and beauty and godliness. There was no questioning he was the ideal.
	I am your idol. Always. Never forget that I am in you.
	Off in Greenland, he was mining deep in a glacier for something he lost a long time ago, and couldn't remember what he actually left there. He had hoped it was the Key to Gramercy Park. But even if he thought he lost it, the Sentients would know in an instant, and their opinion of him would change rather quickly, in the most drastically violent and devious in design.
	What kept Exeter's and the Sentient's idle peace was the secret and the mutual knowledge of what the other was hiding. They were mere equals, but neither side would admit it; they thought the other was inferior.
	Exeter stood stretching, looking down at the sea of a wasteland below, at the foot of Deadsy tower. Most people were told to boycott the heathenistic holiday, but still a large crowd of costume infested San Tropezians gathered like a drunk mob, raving and partying like there was no tomorrow.
	Good, my children. Now you realize there is no hope. You will have no tomorrow, after tonight. And the Three will all fail and watch you die and burn and rot and become what you were born to be; Mine.
	He started to smile and felt a burning so strong inside him that if he left it unquenched he could devour our solar system. He let it burn...
	The Door opened again, and out came Exeter's Sword.
	My master of arms, Alec Pure, you grace my presence unannounced? I cannot remember a time when you showed face in San Tropez. There must be new devilry afoot, yes? This bloody town needs some excitement! Morning news from the Pottawattamie port? All my men so busy to speak. I've had good news as well as poor, of which do you think yours falls category?
	"Ss. s. Ahem. Ss sSir, Good, I am sSs sSs sSsure. Well, poor newsSs yesSs, but of which the activity isSs both profitable and a posSssSsible guidepost for finding, your Three." 
	Your slurring is unbecoming.
	Alec Pure laid in front of him a finely bound book of home gritted paper by Pure himself,  filled with neatly drawn boxes of numbers of varying color; Red, black, green, yellow and Blue.
	Your records are in fine form. Alec stood straight in pride, remembering kind words are to be unacknowledged when spoken by Exeter. They're simply filler between disciplines and hold no true depth.
	"Er, yes. Um, but if you sSs sSs sSsee Bowery percents, these numbers here," he pointed to the green outline with a shaking finger that shamed Exeter to have such a weakling at his service, "ThesSse are the numbersSs for how much we lend out."
	Yes, get to it.
	Alec's flustering niggle continued. "sSs sSs sSsSorry sS s sSs sSsir. A number in red is losSssSsesSsSs, yellow is transSsSsaction, black is exports, and blue; profitsSsSs. If you sSs sSs sSsee here, the money lent out to-erh Cowslee Marvin?? A low pushing Bowery connection, hasSs risen a great deal. He'sSs buying thingsSs of great value, right under your nosSse sSs sSs sSsir. And sSs sSs sSselling asSs well, becausSse, usSsually we receive thirty persssent of hisSs overall profits$s$s. A figure thatsSs often too sSs sSs sSsmall to mention, but lately itsSs grown sSsSsignificantly. Gathering from the itemsSs inventory, there'sSs a chance he'sSs been dealing to, er?the Three."
	The idea, even just a spark, of someone doing to him back his own methods?.This matter deserves my immediate attention.
	"YOUR-- immediate-- attention? sSs sSs sSsir?" 
	"Come, Alec." Escort me, fetch my suit, yes, the blue one. What was the name?
	"Ahem...Marvin, Ss ssir."
	Indeed. Carlton eyes up? The priest arose obediently. I will rendezvous with you in the Lowry.

	Only ten minutes after Josh dismissed the hippie drug dealer, he came in contact with more people floating around in the sewers, swimming in the filth. They were laughing and playing, indubitably on a Calm rampage, unable to sense the vomitus disgust they were bathing in. "Get out of there!" Josh yelled at them hopelessly. A couple had begun engaging in a most disturbing act of gratification, foam everywhere. Josh whipped out his binocs and zoomed down the corridor. There were people all over, partying like there was no tomorrow. 
	This was no good. He felt a thick line of perspiration form all over him as his mouth went dry with the scampering of perfidious thoughts.
	He connected to his insta-chat and linked up with fuzzy Kylia. The video feed was choppy but the audio was fairly clean. "Go, Josh," she said. She was concentrating on something else at the fort, but her earpiece made Josh's voice loud and clear.
	"Kylia, there are people in the Underground?I mean, there is a rave?Someone has organized a massive party down here. Can you find anything out about this?" There was some huffing and puffing and a static of disturbance.
	"A rave? In the underground?"
	"Yes! Ky, just search the web, quick?this is really fuckin weird."
	"Ok hold on. Let me pull up Charlie?He hasn't been acting like himself these past couple hours. I've been doing a lot of diagnostics?but ok?Searching 'rave' - nah - searching 'sewer rave' -hmm closer-ahh 'San tropez sewer rave' - oh Jesus!"
	"What is it?" Josh was walking through the layers of party people who refused to let him go by without a bundle of glowsticks and flashing necklaces, bumping their fists in a very soiree fashion. A hot chick with fluorescent fangs came up and rubbed the front of his chest and started to go lower when Josh darted away from her. "Kylia, are you there?"
	"Josh, the crew that's putting it on fronts for Marvin. It's called Sewer Suck Fest?the profile homepage has got near five million hits since this morning. People from all around the Midwest are coming in from out of town. How the hell did we not see this coming? I mean literally! You guys are down there all the time! You didn't see any suspicious activity!?" Kylia was starting to freak out. Charlie could tell and brought up a website that displayed billions of relaxation techniques. 
	Josh knew in a revolting instant his 'cousin' had known everything about their plot. They paid him to get information for them. He knew when they would and wouldn't be down there. "It was Marvin. He knew everything?he must've been plotting this from the start. He saw all the cash we threw down at him and he saw how much more he could make?"
	"Get out of there Josh, this thing's gone viral. It's mainstream now!"
	"I'm pretty thick in it here, Ky?and Keesle is waiting--"
	"Josh! No! Please, come back to the Fort?I'm getting really scared now. Nic left to look for Drew. He's probably down there somewhere. It's not safe for you. Deadsy will find out about this and--"
	"All these people are going to die?"
	"Josh!"
	"OMG?" Josh knew that it was beyond desperation to warn these people of the inevitable danger. "I need to stop the party!"
	"You do that, and the ravers will hang you!"
	"OK? I'll text you in ten minutes when I'm on my way," then he hung up. He would not be headed to the Fort. Keesle would be at central station, and that's where he intended to go.	
	
	"Asshole!" 
	It was flinging echoes down an empty well, scattering off one wall to the next, clamoring, falling deeper and deeper, never ending. Once it hit the bottom, it came spinning back to the top with velocity and dishonor.
	A vague, blind delusion. The tangled pulsing, self-destructive act of frustration; not saying what you should've said. 
	Asshole? Nic told the truth (as Zach should've known he would find out; was a fool to try to hide it). 
	Find and disapprove. Either way, now it was known; dishonesty, on however subtle of a level it sat, was tipped, spilled milk and all to the lonesome one's shame. He felt blind anger rise, wedge the throat, glass in his eyes, an adumbration, damnable injector and the freezing of the venom wrought like stencil embossed etchings on grave stones of kings and heroes at their feet, their untilled tongues wagging in the weather. He stomped his feet harder and harder, holding in tearful emotions he did not understand.
     	Zach continued down the Underground Railroad with briskly sauntering steps. There were other people here now; hobo messengers and sleazy addicts, younglings. Music was playing from somewhere far away in the tunnels?Shit-what time were the lights going on?
	But there was no time to debate. Zach veered toward a ladder to exit the shit hole at the Barrios graveyard exit. Somehow the soundless ghosts seemed to welcome him. Fuck Pi. Can you not hear a voice crying for the shoulder of a friend? We share the same mind, don't you know how innuendo can slice the heart to mist? And the mess, the loose stuff and the gizzard sentiment, the worms and the maggots massage your feet. Despair and discordia! TO BE OR NOT TO BE! I rarely do. Blind groping. Shuffle step in the dark. Hey asshole, can you hear me? His teleprobe only had 2 bars of battery. He texted Pundara "Im in the lowry- cm". He didn't expect a reply.
      Past him on his left went the indifferent illogical automobiles and other vehicles disintegrating in evolution and technology; blades, boards, bikes, pogo-sticks, wheelbarrows, rickshaws. 
	The forest of swarming buildings sunk in stature and pitiable dismalness. 
	Zach lit a cig, checked his steps, feeling cold wind; shoes clunking together like a bride at her bachelorette party. 
       This blind anger had risen from another place. You're so quick to take nothing about yourself seriously except pride? What will you amount to? What have you done that makes you better than anyone else? You are alone. Always have been. Always will be.
	A lost drunk frat-boy bumped into Zach and threw up on him. Zach didn't even give a rat's ass and kept on walking, but it was not him that moved his legs. There was something else present that gave him direction. Without thinking, he moved farther and farther across the city.
	Passing a dark alleyway, he thought he heard somebody whisper his name. 
	He would often hear other voices say his name, though the only culprit the confines of his own mind-
	"Zach?"
	And then it came again, but this voice was like nothing he had ever heard before, but later forgot about it because it was so unrecognizable.
	"The slipping has started and it will not stop until we throw the bomb in the star," he said, though he knew not why, still trying to reach Pundara futilely. Using errands of our goal to piece off outgrowths of lonesomeness? Just stop! Stop the kicking and screaming, and see it's all happening in accordance with collective slipping.  
	Even as the foundations turned to sheet rock, the stone steps dissolved, and the streets were pulled out from underneath him. The Will of Pi was still there, even though he could barely feel it. It punched holes through the night sky and laughed at the trivial ramblings of men and boys as they fly about, tripping on their own forgotten wings. But his anger was not altogether subsided. There is no control. There is nothing I can do. My powers are fading. I feel it? As comforting and as true as it is, why is anger all I feel? Bitter honesty and truth? Why does Nic have to be so contending?
            DO not be guilty of The Lie 
       Zach heard this voice in his head as clearly as the striking of a gong, and turned slightly on his heels to make sure it was indeed from within his head.
            Beware The Cosmic Lie - Beware the Destroyer of Men and eater of Multiverses
      Along with this voice, and with his turn to the periphery, Zach abruptly realized he was in the heart of the Lowery, the place called the Tenderloin. It was a homely quality he for the first time realized the ghetto was imbued with. The struggle and turning over of his high ideals and hopes with the real frustration creating a genuinely sensitive air about him, awake to the metaphoric tuning-fork. He felt all the more ridiculous when his conscious thoughts bent towards an inverted Hello? aimed at the alien voice.
     	Nothing returned. He turned to behold the surroundings: the market stands, donut houses, pot shops, fruit sellers, and vagrants next to the freshly made hobos of all ages and flashy smut houses and Mexicans handing out hologram porno pamphlets, littering the gutters, stapled to old telephone and shoddy grid wire poles. The only thing not decrepit was the precinct Sentimental church at one end of the strip. 
	Lines of bookies and gangsters, hustlers and swingers, transvestite hookers, preachers on egg crates throwing flower petals and pimps tossing handfuls of green money to beggars just to laugh at them scramble and turn on each other in an orgasm of violence. Hot dogs, waffle tacos, pizza stix, vitaballs, an alcohol shot vendor who recognized Zach as his best customer and as a publicity stunt poured a bottle down his open mouth. A gathering crowd yelled in approval, oblivious to how young Zach was and how exponentially sloshed he became. 
	He called Pundara. No answer.
	It all hit him in an instant; bland twisted pleasure grins. Incomprehensible mental sickness. Smiles, but not from the source of happiness and imagination. The source was chaos. 
	Exeter had brainwashed them to instill chaos onto themselves. 
	The suffering pain, scrounging pleasure. "Who the fuck can save these people?"
            ---Only You--- 
	It came naturally out of nowhere. "Do they even care?"
            Yes, and now The Lie is threatening them, they will be made to sacrifice their burning spirit to the all-consuming fire, to The Lie 
      "But can we save them?"
       To this there was no answer, and of its vacancy altogether he was made painfully aware. "What lie?" He tried to reckon in the tongue of the Plane, but could not bring himself to rise from the street to its glorious celestial existence. The peddlers being too potent to his senses, or their misery being too strong to endure. Rickshaws went streaming by, going to nowhere in particular. You can guess the girly triplets sat sneering, unseen eyes cackling the future into their smoking cauldron filled with the excrement of the city. Sweet excrement. Sweet smell. Sweet lips. Sweet sweet moisture and dampness. Climax?Disappear--
            
	Then he woke up. 
	Blacked out with the coming of night. He'd forgotten completely the object of his errand and found himself sitting beneath the old turnstiles of the abandoned train depot. He shivered, having pissed himself. Unsure of what time it was and how long exactly he had been out of it, Zach ripped off his pants and started walking (stumbling) then fell on his face.
	His teleprobe dropped and cracked. There was only a trace red outline of battery cell left. Pundara had called him. Shit, what did I say? I don't remember anything? We went out?! My dick hurts?How the hell'd I get here?
	He thought of Nic pointing to his dishonesty as he left the fort. He saw Drew frightened alone somewhere in a lightless corner tearing at his chest with madness. They could be dead and you can't even walk straight.
	For the first time he felt the distantness of the High Plane and their mission and their strength in Pi far away. While during his last stream of consciousness he'd been sure of its persistent presence and its permeability through all unreal things of loathing and lonesomeness and madness and running without direction or destination or flag. Death by torture, dragged through the streets by your own intestines via rickshaw.
       The old railway tracks of the station pointed into the distance; east and west, dozens of them stacked on top of each other: switch holsters, synthetic-iron rails, tie-jumpers, quaido wheels and silver embankments with a thick layer of dead black gravel filling in the rest of the scene, coal scattered clear to the horizon, not one other soul in sight.
	In the still night air with the sun vanished off the face of the world, the infathermal track of the Monorail ran away shining, trailing its light downwards to the horrible spiral. Every few minutes it would shake with passing freight and passenger cars. Its rickety steam spitting from the track high above Zach's head; the vision of no one for miles. I've never been in the city and have no one in sight, especially this early. All I see is coal. There must not be much left. Is there much of anything left? SHIT! Is there time to make it to Marvin's? He saw the Deadsy funded monorail system would fall into the dust around him one day as the clueless travelers slowly disappeared from her, until the naked earth was all a never ending mass of ash after the burning of a ridiculous fire that none could remember. Slowly he saw this coming as sure as the next car above; The Cosmic Lie taking the rightful place of Pi as ruling force in the world. 
          It was well Zach forgot his errand and was stupid and pantless from drink, for as this vision came to him at the old depot
	
	a loud, rancorous pound on the firm iron door to Marvin's sanctuary baboomed.
            "Boss," the big man gestured to the front entrance as Marvin sat glued to the computer screen. "Boss," he was stumped, "-a whole army of them out there, boss."
       Marvin dug deep through his bowl of beany-meat-chili, listening to his favorite record and did not seemed concerned whatsoever. "Tell the rooting swine free bread day is Thursday. It's bad enough they come here at all hours to ask for favors and--"
        The big man cut him off. "No, sir, not them, it's...
       "Deadsy! God knows how many Trenchcoats out there. All packing, and I don't think they're gonna wait for us to let em in neither!"
         With a rush Marvin spit out his chili and made a funny lunge over his desk up from his chair and ran out the door, way made by stacks and stacks of manuals and magazines before his chair could stop spinning. Forgetting in his haste and panic, he turned around briefly in mid stride to shout, "Quickly Keale, grab the bazooka--"
        Marvin ran right into the stern chest of Alec Pure, Exeter's personal assassin. Behind him dozens of Trenchcoats snaked into the door, lasers drawn. 
	The four eyed Main-man was thrown to the floor. Keale, coming out of the office, dropped the bazooka out of shock. 
	The room had gotten darker and all light swelled to his face; Time seemed to slow; 
	Exeter strode in slowly, cool, silently draped with a fur coat made from an assortment of mammals turned extinct during the 19th century. He gave Marvin a queer look, then examined Keale the caveman and was disgusted immediately. "What is this?" Exeter held out a folded piece of paper, but the flashing inside colors made it obvious to tell. Keale the caveman grabbed it without thinking and gave it over to Marvin. He unfolded the paper, knowing already exactly what it was.
	"Well?uh, your majesty-- this appears to be one of our neoflyers for tonight's rave? Some associates of mine, uh-- well, under my strict guidance, chose to sponsor." Exeter snatched the flyer out of his hands abruptly and somewhat violently. His silence was brutal.
	"How sententious." Exeter appeared to be studying the surroundings of this so-called lair and was very unimpressed. "You know why I'm here then?" He took out a mirror to check on his hair, then pulled out a fine comb and began brushing, but Marvin the Mainman and Keale the Caveman could say nothing but a stutter of spitty noises. "Alright then?" he popped the mirror shut and hid it inside his poofy fur coat. "Time's up." Exeter clapped his hands. "Alec, they're all yours. I will need an update in, hmm, say 20 minutes." 
	& like that Exeter exited. The music from Marvin's favorite childhood record turned back on to where it had gone silent upon Exeter's entrance.	
	With a flick of his wrist from out his fine cufflinks and pressed Armani tux, Alec Pure called on the line of soldiers to his right. They responded briskly and obediently, flashing a swollen barrage of invisible lasers, cutting the caveman down, leaving holes in his chest the size of silver dollar pancakes. He slunched to his fat knees. His face landing lifeless in a pile of computer-crackers.
       Thoroughly eclectic with fear, Marvin shriveled to the fetal position. His chin started to shiver and an ugly frightened grimace broke out like a hot rash on his face.
	Pure brushed off the front of his jacket and bowtie from where a speckle of flesh and blood landed. Exeter would never let that happen to one of his suits, he thought. "If I didn't know any better," he spoke half turning to his men, his insidious lip curled, "I'd sSs sSsay thatsSs the fasSse of a man whosSs got sSs sSsomething to hide, and knowsSs hesSs caught, with hisSs pantiesSs down." The soldier-drones began to snivel uncomfortably. A pearl sword was in Pure's hand, but the blade itself was jagged and quill-like. He twirled it like a man who walked with a cane to instill a specific predatory image onto his prey; a substitute for class that was not present. He squatted down on his haunches, bringing his face to within a few feet of Marvin's, smiling lasciviously: 
 	"What are you hiding from me?" Drool rolled out his open mouth revealing jagged saw-like teeth. "Nothing?" He lifted his nose and smelled the dank, sweaty fear. "Anything you want to tell me before we get sSs sSs sSstarted?" The prone man was sweating profusely, the grimace widening as he shook his head. He knew in a short amount of minutes, perhaps seconds, he would no longer be breathing, and his heart wouldn't be pumping blood, and even perhaps if it was beating, it might not have any brains or appendages to pump it to. "You thought you could prosSseed with any amount of sSs sSs sSsecrecy under Exeter's nosSse? Thought he'd turn cheek? Forgive sSsuch, outrage? sSs sSs sSsuch insSsolensSse?" He stood taller than before, and raised his voice so dramatically that the man on the floor gyrated with insanity.
       "INSsSOLENSsSE! LET IT BE KNOWN, YOU FAT MIDGET, ANYTHING YOU HAVE, EVERYTHING YOU HAVE, ISsS ALLOWED YOU BY EXETER!" He screamed, his hands pointing in the direction he thought heaven or hell to be (it was the same place to him). Alec Pure grabbed Marvin by the shirt and brought him close to his face so he could feel the heat of his slurring words. "Out of the generosSsity of his heart! You've not one thing he hasSsnt given you! ALL OF IT! You think you can disSshonor his primasSsy over you!? You think you can sSs sSsell merchandissSe illegally right under hisSs nosSse without him knowing!? You glazed sSs sS Ssswine!" The music playing in the background was counterproductive to this scene of intolerable terrorization; one slow Hawaiian ballad faded out but was only a short segway for the Jitterbug Waltz to begin its jolly sound.
      Pure punted Marvin's ribs and slapped him with the butt of his sword. He bloodily rolled tighter into a ball and wailed as his ribs cracked in loud pops, echoing throughout the chamber of his chest cavity. "You think you can challenge hisSs authority? Remember who you work for, you sSs sSs sSshit licker! All Exeter hasSs to do isSs wave hisSs hand and the whole Lowery will be sS sSswept into the sSs sSs sSsea of consSsuming fire!" He spit and the blue Trenchcoats behind him began to douse the stacks of books, paneled walls, computer software and magazines in an acrid liquid, popping matches and throwing them. There were sirens and hollers coming in from the window.
       Alec Pure resumed to his haunches, his perfectly streaked hair the slightest bit out of place, only to portray the image he intended. He swept it out of his eyes and mopped the first beads of sweat from his brow.
      "Now, you fat sSs sSs sSshit eating midget, you're going to tell me everything--" He grabbed the beaten man by the short strands of hair on the side of his head, pulling his battered face off the ground. "Who're you sS sSselling ticketss to on the DeadsSsy main frame? Hmm? When were they last here? AnsSswer me, the intensSsity of your death dependsSs on it." He slammed the man's head to the concrete floor. "I want a name!" Louder, and again he lifted and dropped the man's head. "Talk, you guttlesSss little fuck, or you will know the true ballsSs of DeadssSsy!"
      Lowly from his blood chortled throat, he choked out, "I - don't know -- n-nnever got his name--"
      Again he slammed the man's head down. "How many were there? Dont lie! SssSs sSpeak!"
          "Not a -- lie---he wore a patch-- eye patch -- just a kid--"
        "Eye patch?"
         "An - eye patch--just a ---kid."
      "JusSst one?"
       "Yeah---Josh---Josh sent him to me--" garbled wads of spit and blood leaked out of him and he nodded with the last bit of strength and consciousness he had. 
       He dropped the man's limp head for the last time. The fire began to consume everything and the blue Trenchcoats filed out the door. Alec would need more than this. Scanning the room he saw a dropped package on the floor. He opened it to find a single microchip with the stamp DEADSY SYSTEMS on it. In an unexpected fury, Alec Pure trampled Marvin's head into the ground until it looked like a poorly maintained alien fruit salad, singing the Jitterbug Waltz the entire time.
       A large crowd of people formed outside. The pimps and pushers and prostitutes, the poor and the pitiful wretches of the Bowery streets poured around the blue Trenchcoats to see the fire that was now engulfing the building behind which Alec Pure stood. He examined them, sword in hand, then turned and walked to another building, his trench coat swirling in the wind of flame. 
	Five minutes later, he reappeared in front of another burning building. He laughed and sung as he continued.
	The witnesses were yelling and crying, scampering and trying to make sense of what was going on when much and more confusing things persisted.
       Carlton Megaladon appeared out of nowhere in a frightful exploding poof of smoke, raising his hands with his voice, somehow amplified, coming from the speakers of dozens of Deadsy cruiser cars stationed throughout the Bowery. The confused people came to him with relieved smiles like insects swarming to the rank aroma of shit; his liturgy.
        Mockingly, "Friends! Citizens of the Bowery! Repent, for the day of judgement is at hand. I have an official proclamation made by Exeter himself," he undid a comically large scroll: "'FUCK the poor!'" Megaladon scanned the full parchment, but all it read was the repeated sentence, 3145 times. "Succinct and concise, as always? Too long have you all lived in squalor! We will find a much better use for you! And from the ashes of this wasted slum, we will build a new, more profitable future!"
       The citizens of the Lowery were largely laconic and discombobulated, perplexedly baffled; a few rounds of applause, some scoffing, a few laughing, all unsure. "As for you 'people,' the time has come for you to sacrifice for the greatness and glory of Deadsy! Come into the light with me, ya'll!"
	"I'm not poor, I'm American!"
	"Same diff!"
	"I'm not poor or American, I'm from the Netherlands!"
	"No, you ain't. You is yella!"
       At this the Trenchcoats leveled their guns to the crowd. More Suits poured out of buildings and dropped from hovercopters above and from the monorail that ran over this section of the Bowery.
       "Please, ladies and gentlemen, if you'll all remain calm, we will all get through this unharmed. In an orderly fashion, please, follow the officers before you. Remain calm and none of you will be murdered-- I mean damaged--- I mean hurt---- I mean dissatisfied. Yes, that sounds much better."
	Over the moist and deceiving shores of the Bowery, the full moon broke out from its coruscating clouds, beaming hideously its lonely desert smile.

	Brick walls, cemented streets of tarred sweat. Bed from the brow of a working class who's only shelter, a nightly blanket of sky hued collars blue and black; bruises, egos, soles, prides. No choice but sleep under perforated wilderness. Darkness, but flickers prove a light they've never known, teasing them worse. 
	Unable to stand back and see the beauty of it all, They never knew the source of the light; Great masses of flame, Inferno, hell;	Burning seemingly without source, and no sign of end. To perpetuate and build until the whole of it is out of control, and finally, explosion. Nova. No, they don't know their beds of lice and seats of stone are the true throne; Freedom, desired by many, held by few; Confusion of place and time.
	The good old days; a lie. It's never been better. Here. Now. The residents of the Bowery are the only ones worth saving in this city. So blind by neighborly successes they don't see the one thing they lack is the one thing they were born into. Collect and mount possession. Pile until you sit tall, able to bore holes in the sky with exposed bone of gnawed flesh, forgetting everyone else. 
	You can't see suffering when the colony lives under your ground. 
	With no one to see you have no one to be seen by. 
	No proof of existence by proxy. 
	No existence is lawlessness. 
	When you are up so high the sun sets last for you. 
	Left in the light alone, casting shadow on those below. 
	Alone and lost. Is not a man found when seen by his brother? 
	As Nic walks the streets, he can't see anyone but the ones sleeping at his feet. Those hidden do so of their own choice. The same for those who are seen. In this place we all do as we will it. Held either up or down by our interest and control of the great practitioner: currency.
	"That'll be three fifty."
	"For some twice smeared toast?"
	"You want the sandwich?"
	"Just hand it to me." I wish I had a boat. Whenever you see people on a boat they're always havin a good time. Except on unhappy boats. Ha! A dream. Forfeiting lost time without a fight. 'Thank you sir,' smile--wave--shake my ass. Why be the problem? If he wants to punish me for choosing his services in return for my own convenience and haste, so be it. Spend your time spent to save time wasted. 
	Time. Spend a little to make a little. Waste a lot. 
	A voice seated behind drawls with the distance of an ocean, Jam on Peanut butter? I couldn't imagine how awesome that would taste like. Low rates and days old history. Spectators to human suffering. 'Like childhood.' That's fucking ridiculous. Why is everything so fucking ridiculous?
	Her attention back to her burnt espresso. One shot. A shot? I can't imagine what that would feel like. But I fire one off. It hits square. Death to any polite conversation. Successful again. I sleep in the dump at the end of the row, but I live in every step. 
	I step only here. 
	Only here. 
	What is out there? 
	A place, a people worth whatever this thing be. 
	A gift? 
	Barely. 
	Demonized at every turn. 
	Curse of responsibility. I'm doomed to upset someone. All you can avoid is upsetting yourself, and I haven't figured that one out. I do good. I do bad. Either way I awake in cold thrashings suffocated by tangled sheets and twisted dreams. I need to get out. I need to find someone in need of help. I have to stop making that judgment myself. Here you choose. Well they chose Exeter. No, what I need can't be found here, and what you need I should not, shall not, determine. But I can't leave. My brothers need me. Do they? I'll stay for them. I want someone to be there for me. My beck and call. My support. I can't be anything for myself but an example. Will they see? Selfishness is atheism. 
	Walking out the cafe doors, chewing without time to savor, Nic's mouth went dry at the sight in front of him. He coughed and the food mush came out his nose. 
	Figures of blue rushed the streets, cleansing the roads of any and all pedestrians. Like water, formless yet strong, they move in flow and surround each individual, crashing down on them, their dead blond hair whipping like white water as they beat victims into ineluctable submission, leaving the body to be washed over by reinforcements, beached into the naked streets and collected into the barrage of barred trucks following.
	The wayfarer from the cafe faired no fairer. Nic was punched in the balls inadvertently but was hurt more at the sight of his server being stricken down. Her blood the only red in the mass of blue and white. The perfect complement: a final statement. Deadsy's flag waved in the streets, Red, White, and Blue. That was it. Democracy. The symbol had become the people, the people another piece of the puzzle with Deadsy now.
	The whole city running from the spectacle before them, but Deadsy was in no hurry. They walked steady, never breaking rank, never spreading their waters thin. I can save these people. He ran with his townsmen, carefully observing the Trenchcoats. This is huge, they've never done anything like this, that we know about... There were snipers shooting silent laser blasts openly at stragglers. It hurt to watch. Fear was taking over. He sweat head to toe in exasperated panic. 
	Someone yelled sanctuary, and then another. Taking command, the people of the Bowery not yet overtaken by the horrible secret ran for the nearest cathedral of Sentimentality. The bronze doors flung open and the people funneled in quickly, filling the building. A priest who'd been peacefully reciting the Sentimental credo leapt to his feet, startled. As more and more people filed in, the priest began to think the numbers would grow too large and the church would not be able to take the growing invasion. Running to the doors he began to close them, and as he did so, he saw for the first time in his existence the spectacle of everyone running to church. 
	The streets were covered with blood and drones. Fires broke out, Big Booms and things that shook the night and filled the air with dust and bones; everywhere cries of pain and horror could be heard. As Nic sat in awe, more ran past.
	Once the trance of shock had been broken, the minister closed the doors, locking out anyone trying to get in. Muffled screams of surrender continued. Cursing the priest and asking forgiveness all in the same breath, exhausted in fright, the congregation that came to him for rescue stared at him, dreadfully silent.
	"Please, everyone, I need you to be strong. Let us remember the past together. Try to forget what we've seen today."
	"Like forget about the people you just shut out of this church?" A defiant voice rang out behind Nic. He still had small globs of food in his mouth.
	"Yes. There is nothing we can do for them further. All we can do now is try to remember who they were."
	"Because you ended their future! They would have had a chance if you let them in!"
	"But we wouldn't have-- I needed to keep all of you safe." Some people agreed with this rationale, but the voice was not content with such a trite excuse.
	 "You hypocrite! You heretic! You, a priest of Sentimentality, dare speak of securing his own Future!?"
	"One cannot remember the past if they are not alive!"
	"And since you're such an expert on remembering, you deserve to be the one who keeps his life?"
	"Well, yes, I managed to save all of these people as well. Your life included. If you do not want to stay you can join them outside..."
	"Maybe, but you made damn sure no one else would have a chance! No one here even thought to do what you did."
	"Please, please?. enough of this arguing for arguments sake. I know you are only frustrated with the situation--You will look back on this and see it was the right decision. Now if you would please, allow the rest of us to remember the past."
	"But your actions happened in the past! I am Remembering!"
	"But you are not remembering correctly. I did not destroy hope for a few, I saved the lives of many!"
	At this point a light knock came at the entrance, ominously calm considering the chaos on both sides of the door. A silence met the crowd. Perhaps it was over? Perhaps they had overlooked the church, or chose to let them live. Maybe someone was letting them know the cleansing had ceased.
	As the priest turned to face the entrance, the large oak doors shattered into millions of tiny splinters. The bulk went into the priest, but those pieces that managed to get around him flew into the flesh of the avant-garde Sentimentalites. Falling to the ground, a fresh line of people screamed at the sight. Faceless men, clad in blue Trenchcoats, adorned with white blond hair, poured into the church. They picked up the people who laid on the ground covered in wood splinters and dragged them from the church into hover-tanks. As the second wave washed in, the men stopped in place, opening a walkway between them. The people in the church grew quiet at the spectacle, then saw the silhouette in the doorway.
	"It...it's...it's MEGLADON! We're saved!" Carlton Megaladon walked slowly into the group. The men in trench coats stared blankly ahead, and made no mind of his presence aside from remaining completely still, as if frightened, or awaiting command. The priest who up to this point lied still on the ground stood up and smiled at Megaladon. "Oh praise the Past! You have come to put an end to all of this heresy! To think! In the church of Sentimentality! Thank you! You have come to save us!" He crawled along the floor leaving a trail of blood like slime from behind a snail. Grabbing a hold of Megaladon's pant sleeve, he pulled himself up to his knees and grabbed his hand, kissing the ring upon Megaladon's finger.
	With his free hand Carlton reached behind his back, looking down at the priest with a malicious disgust. Bringing his arm back around a cannon of a shotgun, he fired a round at the head of the priest. His face flew off like a propulsion of gory excrement. He laid dead, twitching his leg terribly along the floor. A puff of red smoke lingering over a body so limp it could be lifted in a light breeze, falling slowly like a feather as if time stopped. With a thud he sank to everyone's feet. 
	Sanctuary? HA!--- Hell. There was no need to save face here. Megaladon smoked a thick cigar and shot four more rounds into where he thought heaven to be. They and everyone else would be under their control; they would have no chance to tell anyone what they'd seen. Frightened, the crowd began falling over itself, backing up, fighting each other, not caring where they went as long as it was farther from horror.
	As the crowd pushed more and more, Nic became wedged between the front and the back, and lost his footing on the body of a trampled unfortunate. He began to be trampled as the people kept backing up, trying to avoid the men in their blue coats. Crushed under all the people, his anger began to rise. 
	His rage seemed to come out and surround him like a transmorsive explosion; taking shape as the impenetrable flesh and face of The Lion Tamer. He grew from the crowd like a desert flower from diseased rocky soil. He leapt from the crowd behind the row of Trenchcoats and grabbed one by the skull and crushed it until he was holding nothing but loosely hung neck flesh. This was not enough. No, his body would suffer more. He threw the corpse out a stained glass window with the likeness of Exeter along one of the walls.
	"ONE OF THE THREE!?!! HERE? NOW?" Megaladon screamed, showing for the first time since his entrance any kind of emotion.
	Heaving with fury, The Lion Tamer moved to the next closest pawn. Grabbing him by the tail of his coat, wrapped it around him, pulling the knot in opposite directions, managing to tear his body in two with his own coat. Another ran toward him from his blind side. He flipped and only raised a large foot, planting his heel into his chest, and instead of kicking him away, allowed him to be stuck to the bottom of his foot, lowering it, crushing every rib until it reached his spine and then the floor below him. At this point all of them rushed the Lion Tamer, who heaved and catapulted them around the room in a furiously comedic fashion, unrealistically slapstick.
	"My word--- His flesh is ripe and supple--So young! HAHA!! They're kids! HAHAHA! MERE CHILDREN? THE THREE!?"
	Nic was deaf to Megaladon's cries as he killed the last of the captors. Turning now to Megaladon, a nightmare reached from his spine to his eyes. Moving toward him, the Holy Man waved his hand and a new army appeared behind him. Nic reached for his whip and allowed it to coil around the hand of one of these men and threw him through the pulpit at the back of the church. With another flick of his wrist the whip flew forward again and seemed to stop short but as it began to recoil again, the tip snapped with such sonic-boom it bore a hole through three Trehnchcoats' chests, spilling their guts before him like a fast-motion decomposing pumpkin.
	Realizing there would be no end to the agonizing murder sesh, Megaladon bellowed, "Pi wielder! You, and many more, will die at my hand! Prepare to meet the next worlds!" Raising his hand, a sound you could see came from his palm, sending large ripples of blasphemous noise through the church. Everyone fell to the ground, clutching their ears. 
	"YOUR DEATH WILL BE A REWARD TO ME, MEGLADON!"
	"Hahahaha, not fucking likely. But you'll kill all these assholes!" The church began to shake and large pieces of the heavy stone fell, crushing the people. Blood splattering up and around, dousing family members with strangers in a soupy melting-pot. 
	Megaladon scampered out of the church. The Lion Tamer tried to clear the crowd, but as the church came down around them, everyone ran for the door. Nic couldn't get by without hurting them. They couldn't move fast enough; all fighting to be the first ones to escape, and all were trapped into the falling debris. The church fell upon the people with an aversive crash, and only dust, blood, and bones rose from the rubble. 
	The sound was like before lifelessness.
	Content with himself, Megaladon ordered his men to move out.

"Asshole!" A fat tattooed cab-driver-lady with a mustache yelled from her yellow checkered cab speeding down an intersection, nearly flattening Drew to a shitty thin pancake, who could not focus on any certain thing for longer than 3.14 seconds, yet still turning at the sound of a growl to see the weathered feline face snarl into an even hairier beast, clawing at the air, foaming rabidly, splattering pedestrians like insects exploding on windshields. He could only keep one lonely eye open and it did not see true.
	~Behold the Cosmic switching!
	-It comes at last.
"Shut up, you assholes are more annoying than Nic and Zach!" he said to the unseen voice speaking louder than anything he ever knew. Drew could feel it take hold of him like a worm that digs through skin and plants itself something terribly monstrous. For a second, he thought this began before he was a boner on the prick of Pi?
	~Can't you be serious just for one second!
A random person saw Drew fucked up & down on his luck, and felt obliged to throw him a buck <$>. He caught the new shiny quarter without looking, behind his back. He twirled the coin around in his hand and brought it close, watching George Washington mutate into a Wolf-Man with an Uncle Sam Top Hat, giving a thumbs up; "I'll see you, on the dark side of the moon," it winked. Drew gulped and swallowed the quarter thinking the silver would somehow cure his inebriation. It didn't, but instead gave him more of a trifling tummy ache. 
~The switch is inevitable, boy! Do you understand?
-It has begun, I say twice.
"No, you SAID twice." He was lost, exploring a new direction leading towards a more desperate part of San Tropez. "Shit, I'm fucking lost in my own fucking city? Does that really happen to people?" He stepped in a puddle drowning the rest of the road. It was much deeper than possible. 
Something (along with many other dark things) floated side by side, swimming almost, and stopped about Drew's ankles. He bent down and picked up the two pencil length objects. Where an eraser would be were two shrunken heads with the faces of Nic and Zach spiked through all horror show-like. Their eyes glared haunting vacant white pupils. With the opening of their mouths, pure white screams poured out smoke in a harmonizing chorus, locking him in a trance. "Are you there, my brothers?" They gave no answer, but sang their blessed function. He walked <tripped> with them close to his chest. 
Wandering aimlessly in a long trashy alleyway, he missed the chaos of commotion stirring its fires across the Lowry. That is, of course, until the commotion found him.
"Hey You!" A crooked faced man with an evil glare wearing a blue trench coat spotted him and marched near, pointing a fish-hook finger, a heavy duty machine gun in his hand. "You, I say! Stop right there! That is quite far enough." Drew continued on, staring at the shrunken heads. "Stop, young man, in the name of P. Exeter, or I will be forced to use?.. force!" When the drone said Exeter's name, the rest of the curse overtook Drew. The man in the blue Trenchcoat stopped in his tracks and studied what Drew was holding: two brown Tootsie Pops waiting gleefully to be opened. To Drew, the man <surprise> was a gigantic muscle ripped Werewolf. 
-The moon opens, be prepared for what is to come.
~SEEK SHELTER! The Storm is nigh
"We can make it ssstoppp," The wolf hissed, sounding like he was a smoker. "All of it. No more pain, no more pills, no more wolves-no more fear. Come, join us. Walk into the light with me, brother!"
"Are you going to fucking eat me or not?!" Drew yelled, sounding like a demon had possessed a little girl, pointing the candy suckers at the Trenchcoat. Howling rushed into his head. He winced in crumbled pain.
~What is going on?
-Shut up!
"Never!" Drew leapt with the craziest frenzy he'd ever felt, startling the Trenchcoat. "ALL WOLVES MUST DIE!!!!" He sadistically charged the pawn of Deadsy who made a white shrieking glance and cry. Drew impaled the Suckers deep into the eye sockets of the man trying to apprehend him. He thought it would feel like a knife going into new room-temperature chunky peanut butter, but instead as they punctured through the outer layer they just swelled and leaked bleeding goop, more as the man tried to move his eyes about.
"AHHHHHHHHHH," he screamed like an eight year old girl not possessed by a demon, alerting all those around him. The suckers bobbed lightly with the pulse of his heart. "My eyes! My eyes!! My beautiful eyes! What did I ever do to deserve this?oh, right." 
Drew snapped sober from the madness, falling in shock of what he'd just done, blood getting cold and crusty on his hands, the smell of fire.
"Holy kankle tits," he muttered.
~Holy Shit!
- Holy Shiiiit.
He could hear the footfalls of Deadsy surrounding him. 
But it was only a prelude to the Cosmic Lie, forcing a hiccup of blood and full body spasm. He clenched at his heart and fell to his knees. The scars on his wrists began to bleed and ooze. He clawed them fiercely, sobbing, running away from the footsteps, away from the howling and barking and snarling. "Whas-hapning-to me?" His mouth was numb.
"Hey you! Boy!" Voices echoed against the brick cacophony. "In the name of Exeter, stop!" Another hiccup coughed up murky blood at the sound of His name, but he continued to run with cramps and sharp jutting pains; what felt like broken bones and a broken heart, and a mind that was AWOL. The Deadsies exchanged blank horrified faces and shouts as the Trenchcoats found their Sucker eyed comrade trembling in shock at the throes of death.
-The moon, Drew, you must find safety, or you could awake in the arms of the 			Exitrosis.
~There isn't any time! RUN, PI DAMNED YOU!
He sprinted way past the abandoned train station and the Fire and the totalitarian brigade of Deadsy, towards the Platte river. 
They were close on him. His vision was darkening, going in and out. 
	~You can't let them know who you are!
	-He couldn't make the jump to Pi if he tried?
An arm reached for him and grabbed his shoulder tight. Drew let out a bloodless mewl and grabbed the arm that was on his and ravaged his teeth into it, snapping off three long, salty fingers, spitting in the face of the TrenchCoat who shrieked in disbelief. Those who witnessed Drew's teeth digging scrumptiously into the hand turned around and fled with soiled undergarments.
He was almost completely gone now, far away from Gramercy Park and reality, unsure where to hide. He collapsed to the ground and tried to move?but couldn't. Somewhere in the distance, he heard water flowing. The River. "Water," he croaked through a dried out bloody throat, and with one last attempt, dragged himself best he could toward the pleasant sound of life. 
More Deadsy voices became louder. "Water." He said again as the slow low hill slipped him down the bank. "weeeeeeee"
"He went this way!" More screamed.
~IT calls, now I must go.
- No, we all go, but where?
He started to laugh out the last breaths of consciousness. The footsteps were much closer and would be on him any second.
- Look to the moon.
	With the last sound of the Elder Blanketeer's voice, the boy's head tilted up, and his mouth dropped. The moon exposed itself through the clouds like an obese hairy nude flasher; exploitive and traumatic. The pupils of his eyes swelled and his face trembled percussively. He convulsed as his body went all numb. He felt dead. Wolves howled and cheered at him with the sound of their prey screaming in agony after defeat, welcoming a feast, but also death. His head fell plumply in the smelly mud that he could not smell.
Five Trenchcoats ran up to the river bank and shined their flashlights down at the cusp of the sandbar. Sure enough, Drew lay in the river weeds like he'd already been executed.
	
	Kylia kicked the checkerboard across the room, chips chattering against a wall made of old television screens stacked on gutted consoles, accordion snarled wires and assorted metal husks, flanks, silicon and shattered glass packed as if the contraptions coagulated to form a stylistic hyper-mantle. One red chip landed on the toe of her sneakers, irritating her to no end. She kicked her leg again like she wanted to see it pop loose from her hip. Wicked tantrum antics! "Fuck me!" she shouted and kicked some more. It echoed off the mishmash walls of the shelter. She felt the intoxicating rush of tears well to her eyes and tried to fight it with all her might, but the barricade of her eyes were breached. It flushed her cheeks ruddy, and in an attempt to pull the frustration out of her head, she yanked her hair with whole gnarled fists, the scalp pulling, but not loosening.
       She shook her head, let her lips slide into a sad alligator grin, as if she missed the fish in her flight but caught a few scales to savor against her teeth. 
      "Where the hell are they?"
	Below a centerfold on the wall, over one face of several prissy pinups, glowered the clock with the manifold neon hands: 2:14 it said. That's early morning, not lollygagging afternoon, mind you, and still they weren't back. Something must be wrong, or they would've called, or sent Charlie a message. Or maybe nothing is wrong? Fucking shit!
	It only got worse since they moved in together: Drew would be the most charming lad when they were alone, but never by himself or with his brothers; fingering his way into the secret sock under his bedroll, taking handfuls of Calm that blew his mind but whittled his wits (and there weren't much anyway) down to his enjoyed, perpetual state of glazed over contentment; Nic's persistent ramblings and random range of distant isolation, a singular mind layered with thick antiphilosophical insights from his introverted thoughts amplified by his perpetual state of needing to be heard; Zach, a shell of a ghost night and day. Not letting any of them in to what they all truly wanted to share. He wants out the most, but he'd never admit it, not even to himself. They were more emotional than a pack of menstrual teens. Dramatic as a deranged soap opera. A Mexican one: El Blanketere, El Tamar del Lion, El Cabeza de Bag. Mucho, mucho, mucho action: Los Tres Hombres.
	She wished she didn't know. Not now. Not ever. Damn the knowing and damn the weight and damn the hapless days of the fragile Three. It changed everything and she wanted to smash every television screen in the place as they stared at her with brooding eyes of nothingness, promising reflection in certain light, producing no results, just her standing here alone at two in the morning without the mother processor to give Charlie.
	As her mind turned with a vague flicker to Chuck, his message chime rang shrill through the air and she couldn't help but feel her neck prickle. She whirled on her heels to Charlie's console. "Charlie: On screen, messages," she commanded. Maybe a word, finally.
	"Two new messages in the drawers, Mother, shall I open both?" The kind, but fuzzy monotone of Charlie came from the speakers.
	"Yes, Charlie, good boy, tandem!" The screen cut in half. On the right glowed red the words pixilated, fuzzy to her as close as her face was to it; it said: Private Message: jturkey1@freepressnow.com ): Ky, Tragedy in Lowery! Deadsy is smoking out the place + Searching = great conspiracy-/ infiltrated Underground-/ None r safe! Dont come near-/ Wait for update-/ repeat: Tragedy in Lowery! Gather essentials, we're goin 2 Wahoo-/ b ready in .5hr!://(note: this message will dissolve from the network memory in thirty seconds: have a nice night J :c) )
	She muttered and flung herself towards the door from the chair, grabbing her frock coat and binoculars as she detonated from the door.
	Across the twisted junk yard she wobbled as she ran with explosive breaths over the winding trail. 
	For the first time Kylia realized this was a bad idea, only half conceived. Aren't the guys supposed to be supernatural sages or immortal martyrs or at least smart enough to see the path is too traceable, even at night? 
	Then came the vision Kylia would forever remember; 
	Full moon, orbiting hauntingly; blood clouds covering the southern sky, above mountains of dark, red fire. 
	Her knees dropped in pain. Resisting to completely fall down the trash heap, she settled her hips, unsteadily staring, frozen by the great blaze.
                                              ?
	Up over the ridge of the farthest fold of the junk yard, Kylia suddenly caught glimpse of one stumbly figure. She ran down the ridge, hopeful once again as was her chief virtue: the elastic smile: the everlasting spring in her step. She yelled out not caring if it was friend or foe.
       Zach raised a hand. He didn't have pants on. Kylia ran up to him and squeezed him whether he liked it or not. He welcomed her and took her in stride.
       Back at the shelter, televisions glistened with the new comers. Zach stumbled over the threshold and fell on his face, dropping Kylia. 
	Try and try as Zach could, he still couldn't rise to the level of Pi in that moment to meet his brethren. 
	Void 
	Envelope 
	Them
	He pawed at the nothingness mercilessly. Drew-boy, come on, you hear me at all? Dude, we have a problem.
       Kylia was aware of Nic coming in the door behind her but did not turn in her exhausted sleep. 
	The brothers immediately bickered animatedly, both covered in shit. It was kinda funny, except when she heard Nic say he "killed them." 
	
	?Nic managed to stand; rocks & rubble covered in blood falling from his shoulders. The Lion Tamer, the only survivor, standing in a daze, hearing a scream. "MURDERER!" 
	"You destroyed that church! You killed all of those people!"
	"NO! It wasn't me!" He tried to reason, "It was Megladon, he destroyed the church, he killed these people. He was trying to kill US!"
	"LIES! You've always been against Deadsy, of course you would hate the church as well! I won't believe it-- That was Megaladon's church! Why would he destroy his own place of worship? BUT YOU! YOU DESTROY EVERYTHING DECENT! And now you've killed these people." 
	"RUN! YES, RUN IF YOU ARE INNOCENT! NEVER COME BACK TO THIS PLACE YOU MONSTER!"
	
	He escaped to Gramercy Park, hurt, tired, and hoping his friends were safe. The beholder of Pi transformed himself back to Nic, and walked inside. Zach was sitting in a chair, completely still, covered in shit-bath. A cigarette was stuck on his lip, slowly burning near the filter. The ash hadn't let go. Nic grabbed one from his pack on the table and ripped off the filter, chewing the cig until it was fully consumed (eaten), pacing back and forth with hard, dark bits of faux-tobacco stuck in the corners of his teeth. Kylia was heard but not seen. That was a good thing. 
	After a long while of no conversation?
	"So, where the hell've you been?" Zach said, barely moving his lips with strained vocal chords.
	There was an eerie, dark pause. 
	Nic shivered, recalling sounds and screams, of people young and old, ugly and beautiful, smart and stupid, lonely families; the warm smell of the blood sprouting out like popped balloons from their mouths. He could taste it on his tongue; the smell? the flavor.
	"Megladon--He saw me, at the Cathedral-- there was a fight--I tried to kill him, I could've--but--I was too slow--didn't know what to do--it was a massacre-- I lost my head-- I lost control-- I lost, it...they're dead--all of them...I couldn't save em...I thought I could?they're all dead?" It struck him--Defeat. A 300 to 0 loss. His inability had taken their lives quicker than a coin toss. But so much more. "I fuckin killed everyone-" he crumpled over and cried. He sobbed into his hands openly. He did this for a while. 
	Zach finally stirred, running his addled fingers through his stiff, muddy hair, dirt falling, crumbling. "Nic, Drew is gone. Exeter has him. I saw him pull Drew out of a River and haul him away?with the others."
	"I killed all those people-- fighting Megladon? the church fell on us -- "
	"God damnit, I got there 3.4 minutes too late! You fucking hear me?! Hello?!"
	
	This is when Nic turned around and left.
	Zach couldn't believe this.
	"Hey! Wait the fuck up! Where the fuck you think yer going?! NIC! I'm trying to talk to you!!!" He threw a big rock at his brother. It hit him square in the back of the head but he kept going without sign of pain. "God damnit! You son of a bitch! Get back here!"
	Nic ran far ahead and disappeared into the city. Zach couldn't keep up and quickly fell behind.
	"Mother fucker. He doesn't even have any shoes on!" 

	Long after Professor Keesle cleaned her pack and enjoyed a nice cool wine-box, she began navigating towards home, more leisuredly than ever in her life. 
	What her heart truly desired was a cigarette. She hadn't toked one since after the War. All the old urges are getting stirred up, no wonder.
	After the Great War, her life changed into perpetual hiding. Now she was nearly unable to recall most of the incredible worlds she ventured to. Out of this Universe. 
	As she paced herself, she tried to see underneath the deep, black, sewer water. As if it was a message from the heavens, she heard her thoughts converse; 
	Reality is perfectly still water. Clear reflections mirroring the real world, purely inviting us to jump right in, as if expecting us to walk across the surface, dry. Instead, we swim, treading and spitting water with two simple options: sink and drown, or swim towards dry land, praying we won't be eaten by the terrible whatever we are unable to see.
	It was difficult for her to concentrate on anything lately. The images and voices inside her head were laced with vivid-unreal. She nearly killed herself, unable to decipher between reality and imagination. 
	She remembered the Country Music Man fighting beside her and Thasunke Witcolala (who now called himself the Fat Ninja), before CMM was swayed by Exeter's kiss of power. Their final battle lasted well over 3 years, brought down by a single lie. A lie so strong and intricately woven, even the few who did not believe it, found it true.
	Out of nowhere, like stepping from a lucid dream, Keasle awoke in an empty corn field much older than she could remember, only to find everything was gone, as if mercurial. 
	The sun did not shine as it did before. Did I ever see it all, truthfully? Her wits were slow, aged. The hands she used everyday contradicted themselves. They'd grown into small, frail, useless pointy things, not the weapons they used to be. Without her weapons, she would no longer be able to combat the unknown hidden evils that took all her loved ones. 
	Keesle the Weasle found much later her mind was the only weapon she had against this evil. The Mind is Infinite. So she trained her brain as if it were her hands for so many years of uncounted time, until it was the sharpest blade in all San Tropez. And it was in your studying you met your soul mate. Can't you see him now; Jake, wearing that tribal shirt that showed off his chest with the opening at his nipples? He wouldn't dare wear anything like that in public now! He asked if you knew where the Vonnegut section was-You hate Vonnegut! He thought you worked there because you were restacking the books you took off the shelf. You found it for him though. Can't you smell that cheap deodorant spray he wore constantly? How sweet it was? Just like before the war?--But now we have 3 amazing children. She laughed.
 	The boys would all be sleeping beauties (along with her husband), she would have a hot shower to mask some of the stink off her to not wake them. When I get home, I'm going to love the shit out of them. She thought to herself. After another wine-box. 
	She heard the dance music all night, but figured it was just a hoppin Halloween celebration. It was, but why the hell would anybody want to come down into the Sewers of all places to have a party? Apparently, a lot of young idiots.
	Keesle's pace slowed as the music got louder and she unearthed the discovery of the biggest Rave in history. Her mouth dropped with the bass. She nearly choked on her tongue she was so aghast at the swarms of people. The Underground Railroad was at mass occupancy. In a way,this is what we dreamed for, wasn't it? WASN'T IT?!
	Being one of the only hip Professor's at her college, she'd been invited to many shindigs and parties of drunk hijinks and maybe a little pot passing, and they were fun, but she never stayed long, in fear of losing herself in front of her students, and the same fear of the student losing him/herself altogether. The scene before her now was not like any of those quaint, harmless nights reminiscing. These children had completely lost themselves. 
	The music was deafening, and the strobing, concussive flashing lights obstructed vision and concentration. There were fire dancers and girls suspending themselves on hula-hoops like stalactites on the ceiling, dancing and grinding to the irresistible pulse. Some were obviously obliviously having hardcore sex that would make most Greeks uncomfortable, with an audience rivaling the Parthenon. Smoky mist dwelled between spaces, allowing the lasers to have a life of their own.
	Too many of them; by far too many children sweating and half naked with paint all over, glowing in blackness. People were swimming in the cesspool, splashing and laughing as if they were at a summer's day lake house. 
	Keesle tried to see if there was an end to this party, but it was as if she was standing at the front row of an amazingly raging concert and was the only person not having fun and wanted to get as far away as possible, but the massive crowd was pushing her against a wall, so all she could do was stare and watch the music tear out her soul from the depths of her ears. 
	It was no use. 
	The only hope was back the way she came. She would have to find the exit above Central Station, which the Fat Ninja strongly advised against. 
	But everyone and their mama's mama's was down here tonight, flippin shit.. There probably wouldn't be any eyes watching to see a clumsy old Professor emerge from a conduit gutter. Oh well, the sooner the better.
	
	It felt much darker as the music faded; her steps briskly guided her towards Central Station. She texted Josh and Kylia, who seemed to be just as confused as her, and something else--
	
	"Weasel?" 
	Keesle recognized the voice in an instant, and at the very same moment she knew she only had about 3.14 minutes left. "I thought you were dead." Exeter was climbing down the long, rusty ladder, then decided to jump the last 20 feet, landing unnaturally still without effort. He strode a couple of steps forward. "You're? old? gray." 
	The Professor gave no response. She thought she might have a heart attack, she was sweating and cold. All her power finally faded.
	"The last time I saw you, your chest was so big you couldn't even fit in that spaceship you and Thasunke used to fly, what was it called, the Mongoose?"
	Exeter was genuinely reminiscing with her. There was always a special chemistry between the two before the war, and Exeter would never forget. Neither would she. "Ha! That crash in Roswell was quite the show, I guess?" Exeter reached out to her, and she grabbed his hand. Exeter was much taller than her now. 
	He looked deep into her eyes while the Professor seemed to be aging by the second. He put a finger against the Professor's now white cheek and rubbed it softly and smiled, with a single tear filling his eye?the last tear: "You were the only thing I can say that I ever loved? And you left me? You ran away? I warned you to stay, but you fled?" He spit in her ear, "I pulled your body from the craft?I had your skin grafted to my own, your bones shaped to erotic guitars?I ate every other part."
	The Professor's teeth began to crumble in age, falling one by one. Her left arm was completely numb. It was a melancholy pain; sweet and soft, yet terribly cold to the bone. Keesle slouched over but Exeter caught her arm and held her up with one hand. "I was going to say, yet you still stand, but your legs-" 
	She saw down to sheer horror; the lower half of her body enmorphing into a blue gelatinous glob of perspira.
	"So I killed the Hero, but the girl lived for another century?-- Curious?" Exeter's words bewilderly fell, trying to recall a minute detail he'd forgotten, but the former flame in his arms was decaying so quickly that her arm snapped off, brushing bone-dust and powdered molecules into the air. Exeter saw her eyes had melted to lumpy water and her skin was now dry wrinkled black. "The other one must be alive too?Is Thasunke on Earth?" He tried to ask, to no use. 
	Keesle the Weasle aged 100 years in a matter of minutes. Pi had finally let go of her as it does to so many young people, cut off before their prime; out of remainders to tread on. 
	Exeter blew a tremendous weight of air between his nostrils and admired Central Station one last time, almost in obeisance. He put his fingers to his lips questioningly and threw the rotted corpse into the river of poop before teleporting back to his limo. 
	
	"The feed is coming through now, sSs sSs sSsir." The slurring, masochistic voice of Alec Pure stung Exeter's ear inside his blue limousine. He placed his fingertips together into a steeple. I didn't see this coming? Everything's changed now. This is the beginning of everything I dreamed, now coming into fruition, the pinnacle, the Next Age: nothing can stop it.
	Nothing, can stop it.
	Pure pushed the 'On' button at the corner of Exeter's holomonitor. The fire outside reflected wickedly against the limousine's windows. The tenacity in the superman's fixated eyes seemed to feed the flames of the outside ghetto alone. The screen flashed on to Carlton Megaladon, Priest of Thieves, smug and tidy, smoking a cigar. His cutlet mouth pursed to a thin line as if his unseen shoes were walking across a fiery lake, and his nose full of vile brimstone. Behind him the scene was the purest form of chaos. He stood on the fringes of the Lowry and stacked lines of people: younger, older, decrepit, infantile, and invalid, all dredging up grated metal tongues from out the back of rows and rows of large military transports. Men in white robes flew back and forth from person to person.
 	"Sir, I have the honour to relay to you, this night, amidst the raid, I saw the face and form of one of the Three."
	Exeter aligned his underwear, but said nothing, sucking his teeth. 
	Carlton waited for an animate response, then explained himself more lamely as if stopped in the throes of climax. Dead weight. "He, um, revealed himself inside a Sentimentalist church. He was but a child in form. No more than a few years out of the mothers roost and off her teat. Truly Pete: the Three are nothin but confused, shit nosed kids.
	Now Exeter found his fire. I know the answer to this question already, but I'm afraid I must ask it anyway?where is the body? A slight twitch coursed alongside the neck of the man on screen. He swallowed.
	"Sir, the whole roof of the Cathedral fell on top of him." Exeter slunk back in the seat to his former gloomy disposition.
	Fool you are, and I by association. I took you for more than that, Carlton. He must not be pronounced dead until I? until--
	"But sir, we firmly have the people's trust; they believe the Three were responsible for the leveling of the church, and the murderer of a pack of unarmed, innocent, dutiful soldiers of Deadsy, cut down in their prime in the line of duty. They're all sleeping in the same dream we've made for them," he added with a tinge of sadistic pleasure. Behind him, the two in the limo could see the white robed men, Sentimentalist priests, going down the lines, easing discomfort, reassuring the disheartened people. They held up the silver sign of the pX for the frightened people to kiss as they walked into the semis.
	Scour every centimeter of the Lowery and do not stop until you find the boy's corpse.
      "Yes, sir. We'll find him, and the other two will follow as well." 
      A smirk on Carlton's cold face.
      Do as I say.
      Exeter turned on the TV. Wheel of Fortune was on, and Pat and Vanna or however you spell her name, looked young as ever. 

*INCOMING FEED*
	Field report = Unit Captain 696969
-Civilian detained at river bank- -Unconscious -- still breathing--
-13 units were on pursuit for 3.14 miles/coming from marker 413:now demolished
-Brutally killed 2 ranking officers-
-No ID --long hair-5 ft tall-15-17 years of age

Exeter exited the prestigious limousine-tank, dusted his Burberry Blue Trench Coat, and stared at the moon, shyly. "Nott do I see you but freely I leave you," He muttered, eyes closed, to a voice far beyond the Plane of Pi. He waited for an answer --nothing. Strange. Strange indeed. 
"Lord Exeter, more sSs sSs sSsurvivors down our sSside of the river!" Alec Pure announced, interrupting his lord's obsessive fascination. "They may give sSs sSs sSsome word on the Three- BARF-" Exeter squeezed his hands with the pressure of a steroid abusing orangutan around Pure's now scrawny neck. 
Don't say a word, you lisping lab rat. I will handle this. Exeter adjusted himself and Alec polished a fake commercial smile and approached a group of victims that managed to escape the onslaught. There were agonizing cries of pain and children wailing.
"OH GOD! MY LEG, IT'S GONE!" A lady shrilled. A man was trying to aid her. She wouldn't put a sock in it.
"Are there any more coming?"
"Muralee!! Muralee!!! CAN YOU HEAR ME? Muralee!? WHERE ARE YOU!??!
"Did you see that shit?" Others said.
"Holy fuck, I saw everything!"
"I can't believe it's all gone. My house. My bizness. All fucking gone now."
"Mom!!!!!MommmmY!"
Exeter continued to listen, silently drawing near, floating. Some citizens of the Lowery scattered along the water, scared of the new approaching shapes. "That fire?<sniff>... tore down my -ouse."
"Yup?.Mine too."
"Mommy.... da big man.."
"When did Deadsy's first album come out anyway?
"I gotta get out of here! I'm movin to Iowa or Kansas or wherever the fuck!"
  	"Mom.?(sniff)...big man with da whip...."
"We know, Budwin, he demolished everything! WE saw all of it!" the poor mother cried dearly and held her young son in her wet, broken arms. 
"MommY! Mommy no! He saved us from dyin!!" He ranted tiredly, choking out polluted water and blood.
"I'm sarr-----rry, ba-baby." The mother fell over on her side into the water and drifted down the river without life and without her son, who didn't feel his mom's heartbeat stop. He thought maybe she was sleeping. He knew the river was REALLLY Big. But he was cold. He heard voices, then was stunned as he was picked up and examined like a commodity.
"Did I hear you say 'Big Man' little fella?" Exeter corked his brow.
"Ye'sir," the boy said, trembling cold of shock. "He's there, stoppin the church guy." The kid started to smile as if he had been saved. Exeter put him down gently in front of his feet. 
"Where is 'The Big Man' now?" Exeter said with a jaw full of a million fake dreams.
"How the hell should I know!?" The youngling responded profoundly and started to walk away. Before the boy went far, Exeter heartlessly punted the kid in the face. His body flew high, across the river. 
The thin skeleton that connected the boy's ligaments shattered into infinity as a craggy rock impaled his brain that was sent twenty miles away by Exeter's big toe, who descried it like a hole in one for the millionth time in a row. 
Alec Pure came running over with a scantily clad hostage to join him with a high five extended. Exeter ignored it. "Lord Exeter! SSs sSs sStupendous disSsplay of athletisSshisSsm!" He leaped in glee but entertained Exeter none, whose attention had turned again moonward. 
Something was different. Usually he knew everything that occupied Nott. "Dr. NnersSs new experimental batch, sSs sSs sSsir?" Pure asked, squirting an oversized syringe. Exeter grinned at the voluptuous girl; some doped up, floozy rocker chick. 
He swam into her mind as he put his strong fingers through her thick dark hair, but found her brainwaves could not be traced into a logical pattern. Exeter bent to her and took a tiny bite from her cheek, just enough to get the warm taste of blood. Curious? 
The girl's blouse was unbuttoned and had the stink of many, many men. There were shiny braces holding onto her teeth. She corkscrewed around aimlessly in fear, maundering, handcuffed to Pure's grasp. He punched her in the kidney and she gave up with one last, sad and helpless squeal. 
As always; results may vary. "Give it to me," Exeter grunted, smoke coming from his eyes brilliantly. If you are under 18, I will have to ask for your parent's permission, I'm afraid. He jabbed the needle into the left breast of the girl wearing sexy frilly purple underwear. Just kidding. She gasped in astonished pain. He pushed a little more than half way down when the chick made a sensual groaning noise. He grinned at the girl, feeling the true depth of Nott, a clear vision. Not the vision he expected. But this girl could very well be the Key to Gramercy Park. 
He laughed as he completely dropped the girl's body and laughed even harder as it smacked hard on the mud. 


3.1415926524073
'Inside the insides of dwelling demonic demons
They inherit the earth like yeast while taken for granted.
Gracious. Departed. Without. Fornever alonliness.
Swelling, felling from earth, selling beyond hell by the chime of the church bell and the child stuck at the bottom of the well was all we lost and all we saved just because our hair needed some more gel
You wish and dream for everything but we all just die like Sunday heathens
Guilty of the Lie'
	"Doomsday Apparatus"  P. Exeter's book of poetry : [lines 45-54]
		The hand that rocks your socks off 1991 (xlilbris)

	The world knew it happened and was simply watching it happen and spoke of what to do about it but did nothing. They had a bunch of pointless meetings on how they could help solve the problem, but they couldn't even schedule around one another. Postponing and postponing like it was sexually gratifying. "Now just isn't the right time."
	Now is already too late. Now is gone.
	Josh went to the underground central station one last time to see if Nic had shown up somewhere. Unbeknownst to him, Nic spotted Josh when he first came down and bolted off towards shadowy darkness. 
	The sewers were a crazed traffic of hobos, drug addicts, cheap thrill pushers and hookers, and poor people looking up to no good, laughing at Josh like maniacal wolverines. The Underground became nothing like they intended, the exact opposite, in fact. 
	But no one recognized him because they were too fucked in their real world. He sat and sank into his coat on a bench, carefully surveying behind his shoulder nearly every other second.
His super-camera was rolling next to his hip, and the feed was sharp and cleverly radiating brightly on Charlie's monitor. The Underground Railroad looked even scarier to Kylia now with all the lost meanderers, reminding her of post-apocalyptic zombies. 
	"Any sign of Drew?" Kylia repeated into the microphone. He didn't respond.
	Josh wanted to get the fuck out of there. Why are we always full of terrible ideas?
	She wiped away a couple tears, muffling the microphone headset so Josh couldn't hear a few more coughs from her crying fit. "Any sign of Nic?"
	"I don't think it's safe down here. Especially now." He ignored the question. There was no way he was going to randomly bump into Nic or Drew.
	"Nic was trying to find a way to Deadsy tower? and I think he was really close."
	They both shuddered.
	"You will be safer with me in Wahoo, just for a week, maybe. It's too dangerous here." He licked his lips as he made eye contact with a hobo who started to approach him. Josh took off on a run, not taking any chances, scampering towards the exit where he parked his van.
	"Yes, but-" Kylia shed a single tear, "this is my place. Gramercy is where I'm needed. Zach can find them."
	Josh again decided not to comment. He saw Zach only yesterday, and -- well?

	Go figure, they burn the whole place to the ground and leave that monstrosity standing. A fresh winged layer of gray and white pigeons settled obliviously along the brick eave arcade, perpetually slathered with slobs of frosting bird shit. Outrageous burlesque scenes, worn thin with age plastered along the façade. The hovel looked slightly ashamed standing on its own. Two small blacked out windows onlooked droopily from beneath the rusted marquee: 'Pervy Plunket's Beaver Eaters: Sweet XXX' flashed out empty light bulbs and below the various pornographic taglines shouted: Peep Show - Exotic Dancers - Naughty Books--Fine Theatre--½ off Footsies!'
	Bellow this in paint on the glass windows: 'Tonight only: Madame Bridget's Traveling Barn-burners.' Great billows of smoke rolled up from the wreckage of its old neighbors that succumbed to the fire the night before. Other empty lot fires smoldered across the cold dreary horizon. 
The holocaust of the Lowery, and not even breakfast time.
	Raw smoke and an empty stomach produced a gagging sound across the street and then a pale face emerged from behind something else that had been left fireproof. 
	He checked for signs of the men in the blue coats, saw none, then hesitantly stepped away from the dumpster Underground Railroad exit and made his way to the theater. This place should have been condemned a hundred years ago. Josh forced a sharp laugh as he realized he'd checked for traffic stepping off the curb into the street. Look both ways, Joshy, his mother's voice repeated in his head.
	Broken bottles, slabs of roof and misshapen bricks of building walls, fallen like decapitated limbs, charred siding littering the street of sweat and blood. It smelled like foul hotdogs. Through the eyepiece of the camera he pointed at the wreckage. Not really panoramic 'A-class' work here, huh boy? But you're doing what you were born to do. He captured beautiful art work of destruction; haunting visages of streets practically screaming with silence. One particularly poignant and telling shot of a child's doll ravaged and blackened hanging from the haggard cross outside the ruined Church of Sentimentality, where his mother's body lay. 
The scene was reminiscent of WWII footage: Disemboweled buildings standing like overgrown dissected frogs, some botched, others mostly successful. Smoke and ensnared broken wires mangled upwards like mutated flowers. Blotches of dried blood here, blotchy of wet blood there. Empty bullet casings here, slather of other nasty bits there. Deserted, empty ruins of a ghost town. The aroma of burnt hotdog BO. But no bodies?
	Twice Josh was sure the Trenchies spotted him while crouching behind the alleyway dumpster. He muttered through silent lips the Hail Mary his mother taught him as a child before hurdling a particularly obstructive piece of tin siding and clicked record. The button stuck but he unclicked it finally with a curse. 
	"I, Josh Mitchell Turkey, endeavor to submit this log as evidence, truth. Along with all history, my voice, the real voice, will not be truly discovered until decades later?" he paused searching for the right tone, the camera rattled wildly but the focus rate was uncanny, "?to be handed down to posterity as an accurate account of the unspeakable horror committed by the same paternal forces of government and corporate infrastructure that claim on an obtrusively frequent basis to be our sovereign protectors and defenders of the sacred Constitution. Deadsy, and Exeter." He pushed open a frail door, checking behind his shoulder for blue coated devils. He began again in a lower voice. "?The time is exactly?9:00 AM. I'm attempting to infiltrate the only building left untouched by 'the fire' that ravaged the Lowery somewhere between 12-2am. I--" He nearly dropped the camera when he realized a small twisted man was standing behind the ticket counter, and suppressing a shriek he glanced nervously around the dim lobby he expected to be completely abandoned. 
	"Can I help you sir?" said the strange man holding onto a black top hat. 
	"I..uhh?.hmm." Josh left the camera on, falling to his side. "I--I expected this place to be rather empty." He said stupidly. "Because of the fire..." 
	"Oh no sir, we're open twenty four hours a day, seven days a week." A feeble hand waved to a sign nobly set above the popcorn stand, reading: No Rest for the Wicked. Suddenly he was aware of the panting sound of a woman creeping lowly from the batwing doors that led to the theatre. 
	"You're not telling me there's a show going on right now?"
	"O yes sir, our matinee feature this week is playing at nine, two in the afternoon and ten at night. Three showings a day. A real gem, 'Full Moon Over My Wife' A saucy tale of a love triangle that -" 
	"You're serious? Do you even know what happened out there?" pointing to the street, "the whole Bowery has been eradicated-bombed--sacked! There might be 12,000 dead! All witnesses shipped off to god knows where!" The panting rose to a raucous moan in the other room, cheap organ music working over it. 
	"Darn you Sir, I'm well aware, but our contract explicitly says we must keep the theatre open at all times. We have a loyal clientele, many from Trendy Town & West O, and we're not about to close our services to them just cause of a bit of drama in the Lowery. Some of our customers have been here all night. They're not even aware anything happened. It would be bad for business, should they know..." 
	There was something terribly wrong with this little man, terribly wrong with all of this. Josh wasn't at all surprised to see the Deadsy logo embroidered onto the rawhide vest of the weird guy's tuxedo. He bolted into the theatre, leaving the little man talking to the empty lobby. Raising the camera, he saw the screen a blurry patch of warm colors. 
The rest of the theatre was so dark he thought he'd break an ankle. Lowering to the dim trailing lights along the aisle, he made his way, noticing intermittently the presence of a dozen slouched and scattered men in the theater. Oh for heaven's sake Josh, this place is disgusting. I want you out of here in three seconds! It's not safe here!! His mother's voice heckled within his head. 
The organ music and the woman's moaning was reaching a fever pitch, sliding together emanating from the porous screen like oil and water trying to mix. A greasy saxophone cut in with all boisterously preposterous tones of sleaze just as the blurry woman was repeating a loud and emphatic "Yes! Yes! Oh my god yes!!! Don't ever stop! HALLELUIAH!"
	"Stop, stop! Stop this right now! Everyone listen!" Josh's tall gaunt frame threw a giant shadow on the bright screen, an erect penis projected on his face. He waved his hands wildly, shouting over the noise. "There's been a catastrophe!"
	"Hey! Get outta here asshole!" Someone yelled. 
	"Shut up!"
	"Moooove!"
	"Get the pphuck outta the way or im sendin yer ass home on a pphuckin rail! BBUUURRRPP"
	"Yeah, outta the way! This is the best part!"
	"A genocide has fallen on your family and friends! Except for this building the Bowery is gone!" He emphasized the last two words but apparently they failed in force. "Go see for yourselves! Stop this now and-" Something caught his eye from a black corner of the theatre. 
	"Move asshole!" The first voice shouted again. 
	"Yeah, this is the best part!" Josh squinted into the audience. A spidery hand covering a pale face and something else: an eye patch. The slouching pervert was wearing an eye patch. He ran towards him.
	"Zach?" Josh asked without subtlety. The boy in the eye patch let out a loud snore and squiggled in his seat. "Zach, is that you?" He sat down in the seat next to him, the camera still rolling. Josh poked him awake. 
	"Arg, sonofabitch, Get that goddamn camera out of my face Josh!" it was a roaring whisper. "Shit man, what you doing here?" 
	"Me? What the hell are you doing here?"
	"Josh, quiet, please?.shhh, peaceful, I'm trying to sleep...I just wanted to hear her voice?"
	"Why? Why be quiet? What the hell are you doing here?" he turned in his chair and implied all the perverted company, "What the hell are any of you doing here?!" The outrage was plain enough. Perverts squirmed in their seats trying to avoid him. The camera sought them all out. He turned it back on Zach. " - you don't look so good - What? Are you saying something?" Josh lowered his head near the eye patch. A number? And many accusing uses of the sharp word "them" that rose to an audible level in the mumbling.
	"I can't hear either of them," Josh thought he made out from his low drunken muttering. 	
	"Who, Zach speak up, I can't -"
	"Shhhh. I can't hear either of them. Some number, a goddamn number. They're both gone. I tried to," he looked Josh earnestly in the face, "I tried." Josh thought the eyes would break his heart - he had to get this on camera. "She looks so pretty in this one."
	"Hold on-- slow down--are you drunk? I don't understand, who are you talking about?"
	"Get that goddamn camera out of my face!" Zach roared. A couple of the sleazy perverts made irritated faces guiltily. Josh felt the knotted hand pinch the collar of his shirt tight to his neck and pulled him level with a breath reeking the pallor of whiskey, hot as a hairdryer. "Listen, I'm telling you, for the first time since I can remember, I can't talk to them. The plane is closed. A fuckin number! ---Drew's captured. Keesle's fucking dead. I saw her die. That was the last thing I saw. Dara could be gone too... I can't talk to them. I can't even fucking feel it!" He looked at the screen and saw Pundara taking it from behind. It was a pretty hot angle. "I-I love her." He cried.
	"What?" Another girl with a slightly more irritating voice of passion began squealing on the screen. Josh and Zach paid homage, 
	"She was supposed to meet me," he wiped some tears, "Nic fucking bailed."
	"Drew's been captured!?"
	Zach nodded.
	"Oh no?" 
	"My last hope was she'd be here?They play this one every day though." He trailed off. The porn star on screen hit a high C# as Pundara received a frothy orgasm. 
	"Zach, the Outernet broadcasted the source of the fire as an accident. They say people were 'evacuated.' Can you believe that bullshit? Evacuated - Ha!" he shoved a finger into Zach's caved in chest, resembling an urchin stuck to the cheap upholstered movie seat. "This is a fucking secret war, but it's?What - don't laugh, I'm serious: sitting in a porno theatre? Come on, this is only the beginning! You know Deadsy is going to do something with-- "
	"I told you, I lost it. I can't feel anything. It's gone. We're done. Exeter won."
	Josh had a flush of cold overwhelm him. "Get up, we're getting out of this shit hole. You need rest and a decent meal...Eww and a shower." He picked up Zach's limp body by the wet stinky armpits to no resistance and gave a loud 'auffft.' "Yes, one foot in front? that's it. Let's go." Zach hung off his shoulder in deadweight and Josh noticed him cast a longing glance back to the screen as if he were sad to leave. He even caught Zach whisper 'Goodbye Princess.' 
They stepped out of the dark into the musty lobby. Josh thought he heard voices, loud tortured screams, coming behind the projection screen.
	"Did you hear that?"
	"Yup, they're behind the screen?that's where they took em, back there. Man I'm glad I'm not on one of those things."
	"You must be fuckin loaded."
	"Shut up flogbomamit, they'll hear you then kill us."
	"Christ..."
	"Nner is back there and he's poking a lot of needles into screaming people."
	"Let's get out of here. YEASH! You smell--eck--god awful. When's the last time you slept?" 
	"I fell into a good cat nap there, until you started yelling like an asshole, but before that, it must have been?" the stumbler bit his bottom lip, "?Tuesday, I guess.' 
	"Tuesday! Its Friday!" Josh exclaimed.
	 "No rest for the wicked." With a nod Zach indicated the sign above the popcorn machine. They both almost found a genuine laugh in themselves. "You heard it though, right Josh?"
	"Heard what?"
	"There were people behind the screen?"
	"Yes, yes I think so."
	"Deadsy was brain-flushing right behind the titties?" 
	"You gentlemen come back real soon. Next week we've got a lovely picture starring Ms. Clitoris Maximis ?She's got three tits. That's six nipples!" 
	"Thanks Roger." Zach gave the man a tip.
	"Turn in this flyer when you come in next Mr. Zach and we'll get you and your friend in for free!"
	"Nice." Zach nodded. Josh rolled his eyes. Zach took the pamphlet as they stepped out into the smoky morning, leaving the little old usher talking to the popcorn machine.
	Outside they were surprised to find a large caravan of busses that had navigated the littered streets and smoking craters of the Bowery. Zach and Josh could only stand, leaning in dumbstruck wonder. Painted down the side of the leading vehicle, a bright green school bus, the words 'Madame Bridget's Traveling Barn-burners.' A woman in full 19th century Madame regalia bolted towards the double hinged bus door, holding her dress with both hands as she leapt rubble with the agility of a trapeze artist. 
	Zach ran up to her. The lady recoiled pulling out her mace and sprayed Zach in the eyes. He yelled out a scream of pain, but as he lay writhing in the jungle of rubble he managed to ask "Is Pundara in there? Is she dead? Please tell me, I can take the truth."
	"Again and again the love sting of Pundara cuts deep?No young man--- wait--- you couldn't possibly be the alleged 'Zach Attack' could ya darlin?" The smeared porcelain doll threw a pair of surprised gloved hands to her ring of a mouth. 
	"Uhh, why yes, my name is Zach? Is she ok?" The hotness trapped in his eyes made them water. They itched but he refused to wipe them. His skin flushed red wherever the pepper spray touch.
	"Come on Bridge, I told you the Net said they was all evacuated er dead. Aint gonna be no show tonight." This was from a man Josh and Zach took to be the driver because of the amount of chewing tobacco his words had to break through and the drooping suspenders supporting his girthy keg of a belly as he stood spitting in the doorway. Josh cleared his throat.
	"Please my friend must find a doctor. He's sick. Can you take us to the hospital?"
	"Well fancy that sugar, just so happens your lovely Dara ended up their last night? Sometime after she met up with you-?" The woman fluttered her eyes. "You've got some weapon in your trousers boy."
	"Bridge come on." The driver yelled and spat again. 
	"O yes, I'm sorry, please step inside our caravan, you can both ride with us."
	"Thank you," Josh said. As they stepped inside Zach noticed the rows of show girls that stretched out like a buffet to the back of the bus. Most of them were topless and a few were pillow fighting and other common girlish bonding ice-breakers. Something tells me that this will be the best bus ride of my life Zach knew.
Josh got out the super camera and said into mic: "And in kind and just fashion, the decadent but persevering spirit of the Bowery has once again emerged from the rubble of terror of the previous evening, to give hope to a situation left for dead." I'd like to see her wear that skimpy outfit ten years from now.	
	Josh hushed his mother's voice and turned close to Zach. "So how do you know this girl?"
	"I paid her a lot of money to have sex with me?"
	"That woman made it seem like you made quite the impression with her."
	"I wonder how much she knows?"
	"What did you tell her?"
	"Not enough."
	
	The Hospital was a horrid site. Outside, hundreds lay moaning next to hundreds of corpses, overcrowded from the debacle of fires. They were lined up on makeshift cots, bearing resemblance to a teeming WWI hospital.
There weren't enough doctors or nurses. There wasn't enough bandages and toilet paper. There was no candy in the vending machines and the cafeteria meatloaf was overcooked.
Most of the people lying outside were already dead. The rancid hotdog smell was much more dank here.
	"Holy Shit." Josh said. Zach could barely make a garble of a response. A chill went through him like someone had unzipped the flesh of his back. Things looked pretty fucked up, like, apocalyptic.
	The busty Madame led them to a beaten and swollen Pundara, who had yet to be diagnosed by anyone with medical history. Her glowing, dark skin was grey. She lay slunked over in the waiting chamber. "Holy Shit." Josh said again. Her breast was bleeding and her mouth was foaming. She lay there twitching and convulsing unaware of their presence.
	Zach was afraid to approach her when the Madame nudged him close to her. Oh my god? no?my princess?don't die?I'm so sorry?I love you?please, don't die?
	He slowly fingered her hand, but when he touched her skin he could not resist coming closer and wrapping his hand in hers. She didn't respond. He wiped along her arm. She was wet and her skin went all goosefleshy when Zach stroked behind the soft of her elbow. 
	She went stiff, grabbing the back of his head, opening her eyes close to Zach's mouth but her eyes were an untamed yellowish gold with the slit of a cat's pupil. She might've said something to Zach but he was too drunk to tell, and wasn't sure if it even happened?
	"Let's get her out of here. No one's going to help her."
	Zached snapped out of his trance and spit, "Where the hell you gonna take her Jojo?"
	Josh grabbed the cuff of Zach's shirt, "Wahoo you drunk asshole!"
	Zach laughed. "I can't go to Wahoo."
	"No, but I can. I can take her and Kylia there. We will all be safe there."
	Zach didn't like the idea of Josh sleeping alone with BOTH of the 'women'. "I'm not going to leave my brothers alone in this city. Nic's got to be in the Underground somewhere. Pi help him.
	"Just go Josh,"
	"What?"
	"Go. Take Dara and Ky. You'll be safe. This is the last of my cash." Zach didn't know but it was 653 dollars. Josh's eyes lit up, which made Zach feel warmer.
	"Pi still exists Zach?" Josh hugged his younger friend.
	"How the hell do you know?" Zach gave a pat and started to walk away, lighting his last cigarette. 
	"I don't."
			
	No one was out. 
The sun was painting the clouds and skyline a merciless blood red blanketing overhead. The bank thermometer read 'Fuck You: 35F. Shoppes were boarded for safety, gas stations were closed hording their supply, and the people could do nothing but sit and wait for death, pacing through the night, sleeping only during the day, frightened in benighted fear by the warnings from the mass media the Three would suddenly appear and fuck you while you slept. 
Zach was delirious. He needed sleep. You idiot, goin on a solo mission eh? This is serious shit Zach. What the hell are you gonna do to this Kirtcheimer asshole anyway? Beat him up?-- Yeah, that would show him. Beat shit out his ass. 
	But he did not think of the Bag, couldn't even if he tried.
He did not feel Pi. 
It was gone from him. Ever since the Three's horrible vision of their own demise, their connection was wavering and always faulty. They had tried to change many times, called out for the voice of Pi to warm them, but it never Echoed. 
	
Zach stumbled slowly to his destination with no concept of what to do. He was hungry and thirsty. His head ached from his drunk wearing off. He sneezed and rubbed the boogers on his flannel. The city had a strange drone in the background like a hum of encapsulating darkness. Zach had no idea it was the Cosmic Lie closing in for the kill.
	He snuck through a fire exit to the snazzy deluxe apartment suites and flew up the flight of stairs to the 13th floor. 
No sign of life showed itself, even in the biggest city in the world. Everyone sounded like they were asleep, and they were, even though most were still conscious.
	Zach quietly sauntered towards one of the many golden doors. The floor was an ugly maroon carpet with shitty brown flower designs. It made Zach think he was walking in lava with an evil vine molesting his legs dragging him through layers of insanity. The hallway was sweltering.
	1313. 
The door to hell. It wasn't late. He knocked rather casually. He waited a few seconds then heard the sound of a big guy approaching. 
Zach put his hands upside down and made ring shapes with his thumb and pointer fingers and covered his eyes, donning a mask. He heard someone approach. The big guy said "Who is it?"
	"MURPH." Zach responded without thinking. He thought he heard someone say "Do you know a guy named Murphy?" but wasn't sure and then he heard a click and the door began to open at which Zach took the liberty to kick his foot at with all his might and ran through dismally unaware of the peril that await him.
	He trampled some fat douche to the ground. Zach jumped on his stomach while he was still down and ran to the couch where another guy was about to get up. The guy reached inside his jacket when Zach mistackled him. They wrestled viciously on the hard wood floor and delivered blows to the head and side of the gut when the guy kicked Zach in the balls and threw the teenager off of him into a bookcase, his face cut and bleeding. 
Kirtcheimer zipped up his pants as he came out of the bathroom, half stoned and partially bewildered at the silliness in front of him. He didn't give a shit about anything anymore. Soon, he would be living in Deadsy tower and would have everything he could ever want. He was untouchable; he could do what he wanted, whenever he wanted.
	Kirtcheimer watched the bloody struggle for a few more minutes, casually reloading his drink, taking a swig then pulling out his firearm, a juicy 45. 
	The guy on the couch bloodily defeated Zach. It was easy after the initial burst of adrenaline kicked in. The kid attacking had no fighting tactics whatsoever. Zach was pinned down, blind, mouth red liquid and helpless. Kirtcheimer walked over to him, wearing his silken blue Deadsy trenchcoat. "You have no idea who you're dealing with kid. Honestly, do you know who you just assaulted?" Kircheimer cocked the pistol and pointed it at Zach's face.
	But Zach was in a different universe.
He had completely given in to darkness and abandoned consciousness. Kircheimer wasted no time and shot the gun aimed directly at the center of Zach's brain. 

But the time it takes to shoot a gun is massive compared to when the Power of Pi can overtake oneself. 
	While Zach's face was beaten into oblivion by the dick on the couch, his thoughts transformed into the Bag-Head, and his inexplicable form of Pi came into existence. Whether the bullet hit him square or if he dodged it entirely was impossible to know. The Bag-Head stood near 7ft tall and absorbed all of the energy in the room. Kirthcheimer gasped but did not understand anything at that moment. Reality was broken, even though it had been shattered before him only recently. This was unbearable to comprehend.
	The Bag-Head slammed his fist through Kirtcheimer's face and his nose broke and the rest of his body fell crippledly to the ground like a person's whose skeleton instantly vanished. The guy from the couch pounced on his back but the Bag-Head made a multi-furious expression and flipped the thing of flesh and bone incapacitatingly hard and drug him to the window where he threw the body head first through the glass. All the shattered pieces of sharpness pierced easily through his neck with the weight of his body and his blood came out so fast out of his nose, eyes and mouth that he died way before he could realize he was truly dying.
	The Bag-Head slunked over to Kirtcheimer. He held him up, so he could see as the Power of Pi saw him. 
	What are you= nothing. You have nothing for me. I should waste you like the inbred on the couch? Then Bag-Head saw he was not speaking on the Plane of Pi, nor could he feel it or the presence of his brothers.
Nothing was all there was. He couldn't even remember what Zach or the other little ones felt or thought since the false seeing of their own expiry.
But the Bag-Head only cared for his goal, which made him the most dangerous of the Three. And, his weapon.
	The Bag-Head saw everything for what it truly was. He slapped Kirtcheimer across both cheeks to wake him up. When he did he reveled in horror, but the Bag-Head brought him closer, so he could taste the smoke from his eye-sockets. "Open your mind and wake. I will take you to places where comprehension meets infinite: In the realm of Nonexistence, in the multiverse that doesn't exist?" The young child businessman looked up at him with glossy eyes of terrified wonder. "Yes: Nott; you've heard the word?
"But you were lied to. Nott is a place only lacking physicality. Where I am taking you, is the true realm of nonexistence, that I have created." Kirtcheimer made a face of processing, like a long math problem that resulted with full castration. "Yes. I have tricks too. We all do. Exeter will find out the hard way, and so will you."
	Bag-Head called, opening his Bad of Unfathom. A bright piercing light emanated out from it and shined and sang louder than ears are meant to hear. But in the same instant, the Bag-Head shut the bag, impossibly swallowing the both of them into the abyss of Unexistence.

	Nothing was all there was; atramentous, black, but especially not limited to color. 
Kirtcheimer couldn't feel his face or hands. They were there, he thought, but then he realized this was not true. There was nothing. 

He was in a conscious nothingness. The child screamed but it made not a sound but only an empty echo of a shrieking thought, naked and fruitless. Yet, it was cold. Empty frozen and black. He wasn't even breathing, but he didn't need to. He didn't need anything anymore. He would be trapped in nothingness for eternity, he immediately realized, and it was horrible. All he could do was wail and moan and grind his thoughts against himself, but he himself was not there. Nothing was.
		(Good. You have acknowledged your immortality.)
	"Exeter-please, I'm sorry, I LOVE YOU!" Kirtcheimer's endless whispers cried into the nothingness and blackish emptiness that was Nott. The other voice in this void made some type of cowling noise and almost a viscid wind scattered across the blackness of nothing somehow and Kirtheimer swore he heard children playing happily behind an impossible wall. He whimpered and tried to reach out to them but they were galaxias & dimensions further away from him. There was no dimension at all.
	The Bag-Head Laughed,
		(I am something more cunning. I've yet to truly reveal myself to Him, because I am the one that will stop him.)
	Kirtcheimer didn't understand. This other voice was demented and strange. He feared it, though he knew he could not be mortally harmed. But then he came to the frame of thought, where had he been before this nothing? Now every memory was a bland scathing hyperbole. Had he already forgotten color? Faces and places began to recede into his memory, which was nothing now. All there was, was nothing. He was a part of it and would soon forget all before it and would be a piece of the nothing and cease to care, and thus cease to exist.
	But the Bag-Head did not want Kirtcheimer to ever forget his face, and out of the infinitely bleak nothingness, the hero unfolded himself from the emptiness of nothing to a form more majestic than art can comprehend; his being was no longer in any mortal hero type construction, but Godly in shape, stature, consumption. The Pi Thing was ever changing in colorized texture, dimension and frequency. It was orgasmically frightening. He was much more enormous and American; the wandering Scarecrow. Auspicious dust floated off his nebulaeic silhouette; wind made of purple fire.
		(You are part of me now Kirtcheimer. I know everything you know. But I will let you know nothing of me or what is real. Yet-- this is the real. No more dreaming of dreams. No time or imagination. You are Nott, and I control it.)
	"Please-please, I'll do anything! Please let me go back-" he cried and cried and cried, like a man whose constant despicable decisions lead him to atonement. 
		(There is Nothing you can do for me.)
	Even though Kirtcheimer had no body or mind to disassemble, the Bag-Head succeeded in this somehow. As much as Bag-Head wished he enjoyed torturing the little bastard's conscious nothingness, he did not, but gained what he could.
	When Exeter had used the Cosmic Lie (when the Three and Kylia had been given a dream of their own death), the rift in Pi started. The Three could no longer change at will, nor hear the voice of Pi or the inner spirit of their Heroes.
	The Bag-Head wanted to leave Nott for Kirtcheimer to be alone truly forever, but this place was more comforting to him than the real world, or so it seemed.

	The Bag-Head resumed to our side of reality, making loud squeezing popping sounds as his dimensions formulated themselves.
He was back in Kirtcheimer's apartment. 
The dead body started to smell.The Bag-Head had no nose, but he saw the stench. It was awful.
	There was nothing of use in this place. Bag-Head felt loneliness on the Plane of Pi.
Could he even feel it at all? 

Yes, it was surely there, somehow, but there was no trace of his brothers. Only the cosmic lie?
 Exeter had yet to realize the Bag-Head's secret weapon; the bag of Unfathom. He could never let Exeter know of its inception; otherwise he would learn to overcome its power. No, not until the true moment of defeat would he reveal the Bag's true power.
	The Scarecrow peered out the window and looked down at the layers of puss and detritus on the wretched city. The people were pigs, but pigs had clearer morals. Surely, pigs could've evolved into a noble race if they were given a bloody chance. But humans came first and were able to stabilize their evolution to conform to what they needed it for, food- adultery. Exeter worked us in the same way.
	The Earth had much power in it, but it did not want to share it with us anymore. Maybe we don't want to share our power with it. This power was much stronger in the days of our erased history; the prehistoric anomalies. All was pointing to Pi, but something made our heads turn away. It was power of a much different kind, but it made us dull and distant from our mother earth. And those who were one with it, were taken away from us by those who controlled the other power. But if the Power of Earth was truly greater, we will never know.
	The Bag-Head parachuted across the cold night like a nocturnal hawk towards the Lowry. It was a dangerous mission, but the Bag-Head knew his time was short, that Zach would come back nearly any second and stand in his place by the grace and Power of Pi. His twin; his other half. They were interconnected by multidimensional umbilical cords from soul to mind to hero to pi. His other brothers in Pi were not connected in this same way. Were they connected at all? (At first, yes--but now they have separated and they cannot control who is who-You started this Bags-the universes are accelerating and you are pushing the wheels faster -those old cranks can't take the accelerating of time anymore--) 
San Tropez changed about him from a posh clean and sleek futuristic utopia/dystopia into a dirty scolded fire pit. (Deadsy took the people-but they will be back in ways I wish not to imagine)   	Nothing was of use for him here. The Scarecrow retreated to the sewers with vulpine slyness. He felt his own essence fading into the recesses of Zach's perverted mind. He tried to call out to his other self (Zach-let me be) "What are you going to do" (You must know by now that you are different from your brothers-that you have other duties that depend solely on secrecy) "What?" (Exeter must never know about the Unfathom. It is too powerful) "I'm running out of options" (Yes, we both are) 
The Bag-Head completely enveloped himself inside Zach's mind, beneath and between memories. Secret; safe. The Bag-Head showed an alternate image of his present situation, even with Nic AWOL and Drew captured. 
Deadsy drugged and raided the Underground, but it compared nothing to the devastation of the Bowery. In fact, the party lights were still going and music played rampant stupidly loud. 
Zach heard footsteps and foots falling, voices, but they sounded like ravers who were coming down from their partay. 


Nott
~ The birth of Pi is fantasmic beauty.
The offspring of Creation. Sex.Life,
The Garden of which all fruits are labored, 
Spoiled long, long ago by Exeter,
 Father of Darkness.
                                                    it's swell we lasted this long,	
With all the bickering, WWI & II, Disco and cocaine,
Inside the knot tween the pretzel shaped multiverse,
 Imprisoned souls
There is no answer that has not brought more questions,
This is where it ends, 
Inside the knot tween our pretzel shaped Multiverse
But the ends to the end is just another beginning, 
and Pi goes on forever!
 "The Power of Pi Compels You!" Nic
	
	A dawning of multiverses, 
Life throughout the cosmosis. 
The Eye of the Big bang. 
Who's eye it is?
Only few know.
The oldest form of intelligent life evolved with time and the ability to evolve on command, and they are always in command.
The strangely shaped Sentients were sentimental about nothing. Literal galaxies spun and orbited their two-pronged, pointy heads, nebula and cosmic dust and all. So tiny it's huge. They composed a civilization of only twelve remaining 'bodies.' Death was closer than it had ever been for the Sentients, and Pi was the only cure, the only secret of the Multiverse they infuriatingly could not explain. Exeter promised them he would harness the Power of Pi, but throughout all of his insane conquests, the Sentients were always left unfulfilled.
	But seriously though, these alien assholes don't care much for humans; else I would be partying with one right now. Unless they're here, hidden, pretending to be someone, or something else? Hey, wait up!	
When we gaze beyond the stars we find everything there is to know about us. Is that possible? Of course it is. I'll show you, because we've been through a lot together, and so much more is to come?You might've already foreseen it with your own mind. When life walks, death is sure to rest. Skeletons of civilizations are petrified into diamond, frozen deep inside its icy, metal core.
	Our planet will end up like this; ravaged by its own people, consumed by our own corruption and passion and morality that make life possible for nothing. Our own arguments kill the whole planet. We blow it up. 
	Overcoming violence will be the biggest step towards globalization, reaching for utopia. 	But that is only a dream. Or nightmare?
	This is Nott: nonexistence. In a multiverse that does not exist is where it exists. If we had a map I'd show ya, but basically, picture the Multiverse; pretzel-shaped (because it is), Nott would be the part at the bottom that connects the figure-eight loopy deal <which also happens to be the mathematical symbol (sigil) for infinity>. 
Now, [I'm purposefully trying to confuse you] where Earth and all of life as we know it has ever existed, resides at the center of the Knot in the Pretzel, and in this knot, we are connected to all of the multiverses.
In the center of all things, You are the universe. We all have the Power of Pi within us, in the "confines" of our own minds. But not even the smartest and most creative genius' ever reached it. The ones that saw the barricade tore it down.
	Don't be afraid to fall in love with your imagination, where both Heaven and Hell exist; the infinite dimension. 	

Drew's eyes opened to see the first place that ever was.
An anonymous source of dim lit the bland sky of graying rusty whiteness through a source of alien shaped clouds. The wind froze and sniveled against pockets of crevices that had never been touched. The ground had been bushwhacked by a storm for the past 146,389,562,402,374,334,553,790,660,517,215,212,485,753,871,561,060,510,677,583,212,012,101 years or so. Broken rocks stood pokingly out in a savage and sandy sort of way. A dull, dusty rank aroused the air as if something bad just happened. Faint whirring noises echoed from a paradoxical mountain in the foggy and unknown distance.
	The air had a voice of its own. The ground grumbled in savage answer.
When Drew closed his eyes on Earth and slithered into the river caked in mud and strangers blood, he opened them to Nott; kingdom of never.
	He thought of Nic and Zach and wanted them close. He would not fear anything with them by his side. Then he saw Josh all alone, helpless to ill-fortune. And Kylia, nice, innocent, and kind. They all felt she was the most vulnerable but-- the most important. Drew prayed they managed to escape the fire and tyranny from the all-out deadsy takeover of San Tropez.
	it could destroy him to think such. Exeter meant for it, the final separation, Booby-traps, Blind corners, stink-fists, poltergeists, and oceans and oceans of blood. The cosmic lie.
Drew planned not to have a plan and hoped that anything that doesn't go according to plan is the power of pi. "The element of surprise," 
	Drew might be a metaphorical mouse being dropped into a clear glass python cage with Exeter watching. We don't have to, because we know how it's gonna end, and it makes for grand amusement, but for the mouse, not so much. 
The desolate landscape of a zero sun gave the impression that nothing ever existed. But at the same time, everything persisted to be in a false, prepubescent light, reflecting an illumination of the soul, which was near a projection of prescience. Don't make me explain it again.
The world of nothing orbited the Great Black Hole in a perpetual state of nothingness and impossibly preposterous physics that would make Stephen Hawking a born again Sentimental.  
A dust devil blew about Drew, introducing him to this horrible place, flinging his cape over his face. His figure mimicked a dog with a blanket covering its entire body. 
	When he freed himself of his nonsense, he then was immersed in the immense godly horizons, engulfing him like perfectly pyrotonically manufactured psychedelics, blazing across the empty spaces with phantom speeds like horny banshees, intertwining him like a spiral staircase, binding him to an incredible yet incomprehensible concept of the temporal. 
	<Being struck by lightning for the first time>
	There was absolutely no sound whatsoever. Not even the beat of a heart, however small. 
	Drew stared at his fingers; he was in complete control of The Blanketeer's body. They meshed together like dark purple and bright green Play-Doh, making a unique, yet superior color. His body felt no need of consumption. Breathing seemed unnecessary and asthma free. All the crap that was silently blowing everywhere didn't burn his probing eyes. He wondered if he had insides at all, but then, he felt something inside him; Electricity. It was jumping around like a hungry newborn inside him. It was tickling him, but it was also saying hello like love at first sight. He could feel static energy orbiting from within like electrons circling a nucleus. He was the nucleus. 
	He was born again, again. But this time in the alien obsidian sky and smell of Nott. The cape and a snug PJ one piece uniform blended weightlessness into him. The towel-like fabric of his costume felt softer than fucking velvet. Flying became an infinite appendage.
	"Is this Zen?"
		<No, it's Pi>
	Drew felt a rush intensify through him that made all sensations maximize, demanding release out of the shelter and into the cold dark unknown.
	Lightning flew from his fingers-- first, as little spermy sparks, then gradually getting bigger and harder until it was a monster that gave wisdom to the weak minded and courage to the unprotected. Thundering into the sky of rust he tested himself. The Mouse commanding the sea. 
He zoomed off in a grab-bag direction, testing the limits of quantum meta-paraphysics. 
There were none. 
He exploded through in an approximate 5,995,849,160 miles less than 20 seconds on the shard of a lightning bolt, barely mapping a complete percentage of the surface area of nothing. On a tall, sleek and misshapen hill resembling a Dorsal fin, he descent to indulge in the bizarre landscape. He squeezed his fists and commanded the surge of inexplicable energy swell and glow green, brighter and brighter, until the Blanketeer's whole body was vibrating and it gave him intense pleasure. Then it exploded with an enormous crash with the force of a tidal wave that could drown the world; a bolt appeared, wide as the Lion Tamer, and screamed for miles up into the sky, reaching out into the spaces of blackness. The Blanketeer's reflection shined triumphantly in the center of the gargantuan Lightning Bolt. The most righteous and impossibly bright effulgence smiled at him, and then it was gone in a wisp of smokeness.
"I'll take that as a good sign?"
	The thunder echoed infinitely throughout Nott, waking anyone who might've been asleep.
	Then it was if nothing happened at all, again.
	There was ground; rocky and jagged, barren and withered, broken foundations, fallen pillars of life. He saw a rather large boulder and sensed the need to test his might. He flexed and cracked his neck, approaching the large piece of unknown mantle. He began to lift it over his head. It was big heavy.
	"Hey-- HEY!" a man's voice yelled. Drew lowered the rock and twirled in search of the voice. He was definitely alone, but he could hear, feel, a trembling presence near. "Please! Put me down!" The voice screamed. It was coming from the rock. Drew spun it like a Harlem Globe Trotter. There was a face on the rock almost similar to the facial expressions that paint the Bag-Head's brown paper bag cranium.
	"Whoooaa!" Drew grunted in a bass clef stoner matter.
	"Please, just put me down! I have a family!" it screamed. Drew was waiting for tears to waterfall down the eyes of the rock.
	"?heh, relax Rock, I won't drop ya, buddy." Jinxing himself, he stumbled over another jagged rock jutting from the ground dropping the talking cobblestone. It made a blood curdling cry of terror as its face shattered on the contorted shape which Drew tripped on. He thought there might be some sort of rocky intestine or lungs that would pop out as it exploded before him and turned to dust. He felt kinda bad.
	"Unholy death and destiny! He killed Ernie!" a similar voice shrieked behind him. Drew turned and saw hundreds of eyes open and mewl puny rock howls. 
	"He'll kill all of us as well!"
	"We're dooooomed!"
	"He hath no heart nor soul!"
	"What the hell? Why are you speaking English? You shouldn't know my language?"
	"Your language? Your speaking our language! He's a witch!"
	"A WITCH!"
	"WITCH!!!" 
	"Don't be silly, I'm not a witch."
	"That's exactly what a witch would say in this situation!"
	"I'm from San Tropez?on a place called Earth," Drew took a breath, guessing if that sparked any bedtime story a grandma rock might've told when the rocks were mere pebbles. "It's sure fuckin better than this pieceashithole?You guys ever see this symbol before?" he pointed to the yellow Pi emblem on his chest. He was nipping out. The white eyes of the rocks searched each fellow rock, but the only reply was mass confusion. "Ok?well?hmmm." he extended his hands and waved his past comments away. He felt a rush go through his arms and there was no time to stop it. Electricity jumped from rock to rock in a fury of violently catastrophic disasters.
	Miserably enough, they were all cognitively painful deaths; guy rocks, girl rocks, and even baby rocks (pebbles) disintegrated before him. Some of them screeched their rock brains were melting, which Drew found rather curious. For a moment, he just stood there, perplexed. 
Black smoke now only occupied the rock patch or rock family or rock village or rock country that only a few moments ago, thrived. 
	There was thick disbelief smeared across Drew's face. He stared at his hands as if he was higher than normal for quite a while after, until he shot himself in the face, which didn't hurt but made him tumble over in erratic surprise?when he learned why the rumbling ground was so unstable. 
	He could barely see the vibrations were so intense that it blurred unreal time and perception. He found himself getting lower, slowly sinking as the ground around him rose into distinctly polygonic shapes, morphing into something new, making abrasive electronic noises, loud bellowing shrieks of confusion, and an insane, almost rhythmic clicking. "What the fuck now god damnit?"
	The dorsal fin he thought was an enormous rock was the top of a Moby Dickish spaceship machine. "Whoa, a UFO!" At this discovery he began to levitate, trying to escape from the swallowing ground, but when he thought he was safe, he realized he wasn't flying at all, but actually trapped in an asinine spherical ball of white and orange throbbing light. 
	Drew couldn't escape it, he was stuck in a web. "Seriously?!" And then the clicking intensified, reminiscent of a pod of pissed off porpoises. But this was deafening, and Blank found it was making him very, very sleepy? 

Wahoo, NE

	Josh felt the harsh breeze of frozen air blow against his goatee as he propped himself against his mother's tombstone. Unexplainably sad, unable to speak, overwhelmed by countless emotions. Kylia let him cry.
The cabin in Wahoo where he spent most of his childhood years was where he drove Ky and Dara, without lyric. You are a man of prose, a journalist; yet you've nothing to say. He remembered running through cornfields, jumping bales of hay, feeding cows and pigs, driving tractors, shooting guns, swimming and getting lost in a creek that led seemingly forever. To be a child again?I dream of this place too often.
All they could manage for Keesle was a poorly knotted cross of jagged sticks brightened by a few yellowish weeds.
Kylia laid whatever wildflowers she could find. It was a pretty, multicolored assortment. Most of them were poisonous weeds but they really didn't look all bad when bundled together.
The gravesite onlooked a nice set of scenery in the shade next to a swampy (but still nice) area of the huge lake. The sky was pitiably dark grey. The north wind blew cold, freezing boogers upon impact... 
Kylia was bundled up beside Josh, too devastated to speak. Her arm was wrapped tightly through his and her head was leaning against the side of his shoulder heavily. She opened her crusty eyes. Snot froze around the top of her lip. 
	"Will you bury me here, when I'm gone?" Josh asked desperately through the pouts of wind.
	Kylia wretched away furious, "For fucks sake Josh, let's not talk like this right now."
	The wind blew harder and the copiously spread out pine trees answered without warmth, shrillingly scratching and creaking within. Dry dead leaves brushed their feet and flew across the ice cold water. They both watched a big maple leaf get caught on Kylia's dress, then vanish away and away. "Who's going to be next?"
	Without a sound Kylia let go of Josh and stormed inside, crying profusely, though no tears would fall. They came out of Pundara's eyes, though she lay perfectly asleep?

       Back within the bowels of San Tropez, Nic awoke from the worst dream; not necessarily a bad dream, but the instant he awoke, it was no longer good; for the dream was spectacularly awesome, and to wake in a sewer with the stench of amplified shit caked into the everywhere was to also throw a humiliating anvil on the conscious ego of the gluttonous imagination. 
People sat in a circle passing a television around like it was a joint. Nic's body ached like he'd been digested through a state-of-the-art garbage compactor. 
It's hard to remember things. He didn't know how long he'd been down in the underground or how long he'd been asleep. His stomach was empty, growling, his mouth dry and stupid tasting. He walked in the direction of light and hoped it was true.
	Nic trembled awake from the dreamless sleep to the commotion of some straggling ravers. They were rolling on synthetic dope and could barely keep their balance so they leaned against the wall for a bit, next to a fire with some pretty tame hobos. "Ahh man, I'm so fucked up?..WOW!"
	"I told you it was good shit," the girl responded. The hobos just stared at the fire. The couple took a drink of something before the guy had to puke in the river of poop. But something in the water moved as if alive. It looked like seaweed or some type of ill grown moss?but it sut it moved drink of something,tractors,rwhelmed by countless emotions                                                          away from the puke. The puker noticed it too. "Hey Laeyotta, did you see that?" He asked, but the girl just laughed and then started to puke herself. The moss retreated below the surface of the poop river. They both laughed and started making out. 
They suddenly stopped and gazed toward the deep brown water and reached a timid hand out, then something took them. It grabbed them in with uncanny speed and force it barely made a splash.
	That was the first incident. 
Near the exact same thing happened 3 times; some half doped up kids would bobble around the shoreline, notice movement in the water, then something would reach out and grab them. Snatchers. F
Nic remembered a rumor regarding Zorinsky Lake; small children would often go missing when unaccompanied. Snatchers, they hiss and drown you in the lake bed, leave your bones in tangled weeds at the bottom. But where Nic first heard this story could not be known. Possibly a manifestation of his lack of childhood throwing images and words from a past that was not truly his, but shaped by whatever input his eyes took ahold of.
	He decided he would be bait. He would try to get caught by one of these Snatchers. They stunk like Deadsy?

Samuel Simpleton was quite a simple fellow, who led a simple life of simple pleasures. But on this day, Samuel was having a particularly simple day, and this caused him to break out in a whistle. Of course, whose tune was, wonderfully, simple. Samuel walked with his head down. It was much simpler to not look his fellow pedestrians in the eyes, and it also gave him the liberty to count the blocks of the sidewalk. He only counted up to ten and then began again at zero. He desired to keep it simple, and single digits are much simpler to say in the span of one block to another. It was not until he noticed the shadow of a figure coming up behind him that Samuel's life was, by no effort of his own, made very very difficult. 'Give me your fucking money you Muppet!' A sharp pain entered Samuel's kidney at the base of a blunt object this fellow pedestrian was holding to his side. 'You want my money?' Sam didn't want to complicate this man's endeavor, he simply wanted to clarify the man's request in order to allow the transaction to run simply as possible. 'Give...me...YOUR...FUCKING MONEY!' the gunman spit humorlessly towards Sam. 'If that's your desire sir- here- please, have my wallet.' Samuel knew more questions would only further complicate the matter. He handed the wallet over the shoulder opposite the pained kidney. Knowing the man's right hand was pressing into his, he assumed that the fellow pedestrian must have his other hand free, and so it would have made it much simpler to receive the wallet over his like shoulder. As swiftly as the wallet was removed from his hand did the pain in his side ceased to subsist. With a casual sigh, Samuel began to simply walk on, neither turning to look at the man, nor turning a regretful thought to his lost wallet. 'You fucking Sentimental?' Samuel heard the gunman say, and turned, not intending to speak, a wave was enough to express his departure, and the wave is notably the simplest of salutations. 'I can't live in a world filled with fucking Sentimentalites like you.' The fellow gunman pulled the trigger, whose fatal end was pointed at Samuel's head. The bullet left the muzzle as precise and fatally as humans can measure at a speed which allowed its entry into Sam's skull with the simplest of ease. A manner that, to Samuel, would have been most satisfactory, if he'd been given the opportunity to think it over. But, he did not, expiring painlessly and immediately like cattle, but much more fruitlessly

RETURN TO the REALM of NOTT
	At this point, there was very little that could be understood. Drew thought he was at the airport because all he could hear were planes taking off or landing. He was wrong.
	Dripping noises and soft computer chimes would bounce up and down in pitch and timbre; the smell of a salty beach... "Hey?.. Kid?..ppsssst?can you hear me?" Drew was lying on his side. He felt wet and sticky. Damp lights and high pitched ringing tones moaned curiously throughout the bijou corners of the dolorous prison chambers. The hum of a sleek but dying engine?.a motor to life?footfalls and atonally rhythmic singing-- Am I back at the fort?
	"I think I know how to get out of here?" The voice was kingly, yet grim.
	A large mechanical door opens making a loud whooshing noise. Several heavy and loud footsteps enter with periodic clicking. The alternating confused light is coming from colorful computeresque walls. It smells like the ET ride at Disneyland. 
The oversized stinky creatures grunt and burp deep pig oinks, distorted grunts, more clicks, blowhole letting go. Another door opens with a hissing puff. The vibrations give off color. And for a second he is in two places at once; one real, one fake: "Drew? Hey, his eyes are open! Here drink some water--"
	The aliens holding the Blanketeer prisoner squirted him with a load of liquid and it went DRIPDRIPDRIPDRIPDRIPDRIPDRIPDRIPDRIPDRIP off his body. Drew spit a swash of the stuff through his teeth, "That wasn't water?you FUCKING FAT CUNT!" But the aliens didn't appreciate it and gave him a nasty TTWWWAAAAAARRRRRZZZZZLLLLEEESSSSSHHHHLLLLAAAAPPPPP
	Drew didn't make a sound lying on the ancient yet convincingly clean prison floor.
	"What prisoner is this?" One of the things grunted and drooled in a British accent. It smelled like a gas station smoked bacon taco burrito.
	"ID badge 314159265...This is the one I was telling you about. They found him in the middle of the Aiuqualurakl circle 12 cycles ago,"
	"Jesus, how the entwistle did he get that far undetected?"
	"He must've teleported and gotten lost."
	"It's a disgusting little thing. What the hell is it?"
	"We don't really have any answers sir. It's species isn't even listed in the Guide?Looks, almost Tovinian."
	"More like caca-excreta."
"No it's fish?"
	"What did it say? It just said something, didn't it?"
	"Can they learn language that fast?"
	"Shit, this dinomonkey's got an attitude. Go zoink him for awhile. That should keep him quiet." 

& after a long period of zoinking?
	The voice, the watery ancient accent. It was grim, like the baghead but-stranger--"You got a lot of zarz kid, but take my advice and shut yer blow hole? what the hell are you from?" Drip Drip Drip Drip . 
No lights. 
Then a flash of blue. 
Then nothing. 
Then a flash of red.
Black now, Black forever. Light again, green and shining through the thick humidity. Another brilliant neon flash of light scattered the moisture gravitating like an asteroid belt throughout the serpentine warren of the archaic prison vessel. Tuna, shrimp, scallops, sea weed, oil and vaseline smells regurgitating in the swampy corridor.
	Drew and reality did not seem to be mixing cohesively. "The Blanketeer?.." he said dazed and heavy. Drip Drip Drip Drip. 	
	"Why don't they ever respond normally? always something you gotta hide so when you drop the bomb it goes boom?" The voice growled like a monster. Drip Drip Drip Drip "You're no use to me or yourself?"Drip Drip Drip
	"What the hell are you then?" Drip Drip
	YOU DON'T NEED TO SPEAK ALOUD, JUST THINK IT AND I CAN SEE IT, HERE, LET ME SHOW YOU ME-
My name is Franqullonianophark, and I'm a -shark--
 Drip
	We are prisoners of the Dolphins and they mean to have us killed
 Drip Drip Drip
	Its safe to talk, for now.?they can sense-telepathy-I must show you--I know how to get us out, but I need your help." Drippy drippy drip drip
	"Well I gotta be honest with ya Frank?it's hard to trust a Shark that has the ability to read my mind. How do I know you're not a figment of my imagination?"  Drip Drip
	How are you still alive? Or, why? I've known better, younger, soldiers than you, that died much easier and fought with infinity... Go ahead and rot in your cage. You'll be dead without me soon enough.
 Drip Drip Drip Drippppppp
	"Echo is my key outta here. take me to Echo, Franky, then I'll do whatever you want. Unless you wanna S my A." 	
Echo?
Drip drip drupe
What the hell would anyone want with Echo? The dolphins blockaded him for Life Exittrosis, Father of Darkness
	"Exittrosis? His name is Exeter where I'm from, enslaving, or already has enslaved my planet. He's going to make it Nott." 
Drip Drip Dripe Drip
	The sigil on your chest, speak everything of it.
 Drip Drippy Drip
	"I am it." Drip Drip
	You see the Taimtorlm's Plane?
	"It is the Plane of Pi, Frank-- it feels? empty..."
	Oh no! #+<>?but?.I WONDERS?
 Drip         Drip        Drip      Drip
 	the Power of the Plane is gone. It perished in the Fires.
 Dripple
	"I'm not a figment of your IMAGINATION; The Power of Pi brings me. As for the Plane, I've seen it since the birth of my Pi."
	Hurmmm?No; You're the last of the Pi: The flames went out in the eruption times and times ago?.or?. Maybe, you ARE the burst. Everything that was left went into you.
	Drip
	"Into us, my two brethren on Earth." Drip Drip Drip.
Then a short dull ray of burgundy light made its way across the prisoner's cell and showed the Shark's face, a sharp pointed snout with floppy gritty hound dog ears and 3 antenna's that looked like plastic balls attached to wires, but they were looking at Drew curiously. His features were more doggish but he had the built fragrance of the cunning primordial predator whose shark-like structure outlined him. His skin looked wet and rough as sharp sandpaper. His nostril flared with the gills on his sides. Drew thought he looked like a creepy blue/grey Muppet. He had spikes on him that looked like fins but they recessed back into his skin frighteningly, but it seemed very normal to the alien. His eyes red orange glow resembled the way toads pupils are shaped. He sniffed and barked low, smiling.
	I can lead the path to Echo-- But you must help me-- as long as the dolphins exist, Earth will be in danger-- they hunt my species for sport-but Pi wielder, hear me very well-the Existence of all life in the multiversees, spawned from here, long before anyone can remember, well-- This is the awakening. But it will be the end of something great. The big bang. The Long hush.
Drip Drip -- Drip Drip Drip Drip
	So--what is it that you do?
	Drew extended his arms apart. They began to glow, spark. The shark jumped back as he witnessed Drew ignite a bright blue ball of electricity between his hands. It buzzed in continuously still motion. Visions of what might be the future were etched within the sagacity. Then the coruscating beam grew larger in an arc. It floated like a butterfly. A flash of white and grey joined the blue to form a triad rainbow that revolved around 360 degrees.
	Another flash of white light blinded all, followed by a dark purple after glow. A ball of lightning hovered Drew. The shark was stunned but seemingly unafraid. 
	The ball of energy revolved around Drew in flawless orbit, then slowly multiplied into smaller spheres. Each set smaller and faster until they were no longer visible.
	"I've never done that before, but has been there all along, waiting to be found, even though it was right in front of my face." he said guiltily. "There is much more out there waiting to be discovered?"
	You must ignite the planet's engine, it can revive Nott, perhaps the entire multiverses! It can act as a beacon, all sharks will unite again--- others will see it?there will be devastation-- But triumph as well-- There is nothing we can do from stopping the inevitable from happening--- I have to turn it on. We do. We have to, you won't see it or know why until the very end? but, that's why Pi goes on forever."
	"Tell me Drew, have you ever heard of Piezoelectricity?"
	He continued to talk, and what he said was very important.
And During that same night, they broke free from their hallucinametal hamster ball cells and commenced what would later be known in Dolphin history as '9/11.'

Josh left in the middle of the night while the girls laid in restless sleep. He never felt worse in his life. 
Kylia had thrown her plate full of dinner at him, and well, that was the last straw. He'd given up on hope and could think of nothing left to do or say, but run away.
	What's it with guys and running away?
	Pundara was still sick, sleep full of sweat in bed, pale as the moon. Kylia would attempt at putting water in her mouth. A few times she had slurped down a couple sips of soup but then quickly retreated back to her catatonic state. 
	Kylia broke the screen door as she stormed out the back of the cabin. It was a beautiful but desolate and lonely place during the winter. There were many other distantly placed cabins around, but most were empty, for the lake was most popular during summer's relentless heat.
She felt she was useless here. 
She was tired of being afraid. 
Yes, it was true she possessed no secret power against the supreme onslaught of evil imaginings that wrought Exeter, but she knew there had to be something she could do. She struck a dead-end each time she thought about it. If it's anything, you know it has to be with Charlie. He is your other half. "I don't want him to be my other half." But together you make one. Something new. "Yes." She said leeward with the wind. It would not be the last time.
The beach to the lake was huge, since the drought made the water slunk deep into its quarry. There was barely a trace of leaves on the trees. The cold North wind saw to that. Her flannel coat kept her warm, but she didn't have any leggings under her overalls. A chill went up her hairy legs and she retreated inside defeated, again. 
She was hungry and tired. Luckily, they had stocked up on plenty of vittles and medicine. She threw her coat on the floor and kicked off her boots inside. The pale light coming in through the windows was not enough. She flicked the switch and the inside of the cabin came to life. It was nice. She turned more on.
	Josh had said this cabin was older than the civil war. It had been refurbished when necessary and always stayed up to date with basic needs of comfort, so it lacked nothing a basic home would.
	She went into the kitchen and turned on the stove and threw on a fresh pot of coffee. She whipped out some eggs and bacon and cheese from the fridge and kicked it shut behind her back without looking like a pro. She made ten strips of bacon and seven eggs, scrambled, and sprinkled a blend of blue marble, cheddar, and mozzarella while putting a little zing of green and devil peppers for a kick. 
	But this would not do. She also boiled a kettle for the assortment of tea Josh purchased, and took out several slices of the prime rib and slabbed it into the same pan as the bacon eggs and cheese. "Yes," she said, "join and be merry." She dabbed the breakfast slop with salt and pepper and decided to cook a frozen gourmet vegetarian pizza. Then she forgot they had peeled shrimp in the freezer and thawed that out quickly and flung it into the pan of gluttonous delights. The kettle started to whistle at her when she shut off the knob and set it aside. 
	All of the aromas in the kitchen finally wafted in Pundara's direction, stirring her awake from terrible lucid dreamscapes, realizing she had to pee really bad. She got up and went to the bathroom. Kylia couldn't hear her thumping about she was so proud of her attempted feast. She had cut up tomatoes and avocados (that were terribly overpriced) and set them next to the grapes (purple and green) and berry plums (which were only a dime a piece!). Finally, Kylia opened up some dipping chips and beany salsa to go with her imported beer and cola (she had already drank a cup of coffee and a thing of tea). She was wired and eating whatever the hell she wanted. It was great. Then Pundara came into the kitchen in her underwear and scraggy tee shirt. The food smelled so wonderful that if consumed, one would surely ejaculate. 
	She looked up at the sexy rocker chick, hesitating, then a big piece of food fell out her mouth, "Help yourself." Kylia garbled. This girl finally portrayed an image of beauty, now she wasn't convulsing or puking or sweating from sleep. "Are you feeling better?" but she didn't respond. "I'm Kylia?I'm friends with Zach. Well, his brother."
	"Where is Zach?"
	"San Tropez?We're at Josh Turkey's; Wahoo."
	"Who the fuck is Josh Turkey?"
"Uhm?"
"Wahoo? ShitWow, I haven't been here in years. My Mammy lives here." Kylia nodded not truly concerned anymore with this fluzy and ate some bacon. Dara couldn't wait any longer and grabbed herself a plate and dug in with no apprehension. They scarfed down the sustenance with precision and speed, but also with a kind observance to the lucky mastery of the chef. Since their last meals could hardly compare to this one perhaps made this victory even more, triumphant.
	By the end of the session, they had completely consumed every course.
	"Can I see your teleprobe?" Kylia shrugged and got up and picked an ice cream cone out the freezer and threw the phone at her, licking the vanilla up and down with her tongue.
	"Can I go with you, back home?" Kylia asked innocently. "I don't know when or if Josh is coming back."
	Pundara gave her a wearied look. The ice-cream fell off the cone and onto her overalls. Kylia made a funny face out of bewilderment. Pundara couldn't help but laugh. It felt good to do so.

	She called three desperate dudes before one of them agreed to pick Pundara and her friend up.
	"Can you get me to Gramercy Park?" Kylia ask Dara quietly. 
	"Hey Groggs, stop at Gramercy park." She instantly instructed, sending messages on Ky's teleprobe constantly to numbers Kylia didn't recognize.
	The car smelled of a fresh air deodorizer. The muffler was loud. Groggs nodded his head as if he could care less. He was listening to Workingman's Dead on his teleprobe. Dara rolled her eyes at him. "Is that where you think Zach will be?" She asked her new friend.
	"It's where he sometimes sleeps?" is all she could really say. "He's a very busy guy you know."
	"No shit."
	When they got to the quarantined junkyard, Dara had second thoughts on attending. "Tell Zach to give me a call, if you see him." Kylia mouthed OK. She was let down she wasn't going to hang some more. Even though Pundara was kind of an idiot she was still really cool to hang around. It would be a nice leveling out of some the boys immatureness, but then again, they were all gone. All but Charlie.
Dara and Kylia texted Zach, "back in town." 

Josh returned to the cabin, found nothing but scraps and took a nap. Dreaming.

RETURN TO NOTT 2: Blood of the Dolphins

	"You didn't tell me everything Frank," Drew stated as the carefully timed explosion breached their confinement, melting a hole the size of a house, creeping to a surfacing exit, Frank's nose leading the way, swimming through the air, "Why?" Blank asked.
A lightning bolt shot them through the passageway they created by combining their powers of electricity and telepathy. 
	Outside the Dolphin spaceship was the dusty rock filled air of Nott. Hot wind blew and the smell of fish was replaced by the smell of a terrible fire. It smelled like sulfur from radioactive minerals.
	Frank went to the obliterated nose of the ship when a bottle sized computer came out of his right shoulder, displaying a colorful screen with symbols that looked like Picasso pointillism. "Dead South, That way! Shoot us out of here, quick!" The computer screen went back into Frank's shoulder without a hint of slow.
	
Thunder baboomed, and they were miles away and a second later they were even many more miles away, then landed under a tall dead tree on a jagged depressed acclivity.
	The computer popped out his shoulder again and Frank said "Good" then they focused at a mountainous lucent dome with a giant lightning rod shaped thing sticking from its crowning point. 
	"There! That's where the machine is, and Echo. About 3 1/2 kilometers beneath." 
	"Don't be guilty of the lie Frank?I won't judge." The general wasn't listening.
	"Seven Earth minutes, that's when the reinforcements will respond. Hurry!"
	Drew grabbed Frank and shot a lightning zip-line across the sky. It nearly ripped Frank's face off. They landed at the peak of the Dome. "The eaters of the multiverse; the Dolphins?" bewildered unseen commotion beneath them echoed skyward. Wind was picking up. "Will they devour all life?"
	Frank shook his head disconcerting, "Drew, it's the Sentients, they control the progression of galactic evolution. The dolphins worship the Sentients and will assault your birth world... But this war is far bigger than Earth? this has to happen. Do you see? This is our task." Drew had no choice, he had to return to his family. Frank lashed his jaw into the metal like material they stood on and ripped a large chunky piece off and threw it behind them. Drew was astounded by the layers of hidden razor blades in Frank's mouth. It would be useful against the alien dolphins. The hole glowed rhythmically enigmatic. They descended into the perpendicular pod.
	
One of the most beloved pastimes of the Dolphins is lurking. Whole schools of Dolphins would spend hours every day lurking. Intense sport-like competitions were dedicated to such. And at the end of every year there would be one final Lurk-off where a new King would be crowned. The winner of this Ultra Lurk was the same winner for the past 25 seasons, and he was the one who all Dolphins called, King Traumeraira the Long Tail; sharksbane.
	 So it was no surprise to see over 50 of the brutes lurking in this super fancy room with a bunch of white computers and what appeared to be Dolphin scientists (lab coats and glasses and pocket protectors).
	Standing upon two small irregular bulging feet that supported a tank load of weight, their arms pulsed veins that flashed colors under synthetic bulging muscles. Some wore dirty tan overalls holding steam-punk ray blasters. Others were naked and had obscenely huge penises. one of them even looked Jewish. They had no necks, but a colossal head and jagged sharp but small teeth discharging some god forsaken gak. A sleek dorsal fin sat on the back of their horrid bodies. almost always they appeared to be smiling, without emotion.
	They shrieked and stuttered dolphin-talk, clicking long sentences; warning others. Drew let them think for a moment. It would be their last.
	They pointed their freakish fingers at him, recognizing the symbol on his chest. Frank growled and backed himself closer to Drew. "Go for the dorsal fin!"
	"GET THEM!" A dark red eyed brute ordered in a liquidy haggard command.
	Drew bolstered with demented romance, a wicked psycho light darkened and swarmed to the Blanketeer and the machines around him seemed to short-circuit.
Frank leapt at the throat of an extra nearby and came out it's other half. He ripped off the arm of another. Drew released the most pure red electricity, piercing through a row of forty, leaving them with boiling deaths. Another he strangled with static who was about to club him from behind and pulsed shockwaves to defile the innards of the Dolphin. 
Brains were scrambled, fish were fried; most, burnt to a crisp. A shorter dolphin managed to bite drew's right shoulder, but to no avail. Frank snarled and ravenously went after the head of the attacking alien and spliced it open like a delicious cantaloupe. Frank was gorging in his victims blood and loving it. Then suddenly he sprouted up all defense-like, "Quickly!" Frank yelled in a panic. "The Engine!"
	There was smoke covering a sparkling corridor and few dolphins remained on the floor. Those that survived the onslaught would pray every night before starfall the boy with the yellow cape would never come again. 
	They ran side by side, slaying anything that stood in their way, lighting being their only guide through a pigmentless hallway. "The Machine, I can smell it!"
	"I can blast it from here," drew said noticing that they would soon be cut off. The ground shook as if it were ready to cave in.
	drew couldn't hear Frank's words over the intensifying warzone. A group of Dolphins jumped in front of them. drew released a powerful burst of red static energy that banshied down the hallway like a sphere through the dolphins and into the Engine.
For half a second noiseless silence consumed the air, then with a rancorous BBBAAAANNNGGG!!!! The prehistoric Engine came back to life. It quaked the ground and insulted the entire infrastructure of the Dome. Frank bit drew's arm and jumped into the ground as the ceiling collapsed. The machine hummed and hissed steam and made a low bellowing noise as if a giant demonic godwoman was uttering softly in an ancient tongue. A jade smoke erupted from the top and began to pour into the layers of atmosphere. 
	
a series of lights flashed on and off like a Halloween New year's bash. There were twelve Dolphins circling the machine in enchanted awe. the Machine sounded possessed. Sparks flew wildly from its infinite sequence of switches. The Dolphins drew closer, deep in trance. The Engine was calling to them with clicks of its own.
	A lightning bolt from a mystical storm struck the Rod on the roof, releasing 12 streams of energy connecting the Dolphins together. 
	The thread of energy from the Blanketeer and the sky above granted the 12 dolphins the power of Pi. 		
	
	Frank landed on his side and broke 3 ribs. He made a high pitched yelp as he collided with the cave floor. "Oh shit Frank!" drew said and picked him up. 
	"Shut it," Frank hissed, "The light, GO!"
	drew looked away from Frank and at the light. Shit fell off the ceiling and the yellings of dolphins could be heard. "What is this place, I mean, really ?Nott ? sharks, dolphins, sentients? Exeter sent me here, but why?" drew suddenly began to grow weary and ill. His chest cramped and broke into a frigid sweat. He made a wince of pain as if something was shredding his insides and crippled to the wet cave floor. He hiccupped and spat out bubbling blood. Drew whispered into Frank's floppy ear. "I don't have any more time," drew stuttered, "Exeter?he?" He spat more blood. "Somethin's happening... He wanted me to do this?" 
	"Enough." Frank said and licked Drew's face several times. "When they find me, they'll come for you. Warn your brothers, and fight together, never surrender." Frank spoke then dissolved into the shadows. Drew never got to ask him what the fuck he was talking about. Frank kept to his end of the bargain, he led Drew to Echo. Blank limped closer and closer to Echo. Dust and tiny rocks fell randomly from the ceiling. 
	Then he came to where a fat man with a sleazy goatee sat with a crown of brass on an oaken throne. He was asleep, drooling.
	When drew said "What the fuck?" Echo's face came to life. He smiled and approached Drew step for step, who rose to one knee out of breath. Echo did the same. He hoped Frank was right. He spoke:
	"I Echo of Nott,"
	"I Echo of Nott," Echo repeated with a blank face of expressionless sorrow.
	"Grant passage to Earth,"
	"Grant passage to Earth," Drew coughed and echo did the same.
	"To Blanketeer of the Plane," 
         "To Andrew of the Plane," voices were bouncing off the cave walls along with bruting shadows, clicking.
	"Wielder of Pi." Drew rushed.
	"Wielder of Pi."
	With the last words exiting Echo's mouth, Drew slowly felt himself disappear. Since it wasn't the first time it happened, he didn't let the horrifying sensation of all your molecules and subatomic particles fading away into nothingness destroy his nerve. Echo waved goodbye with golden fairy dust dripping from his palm.
	Frank leapt from behind and swallowed Echo whole, ending the apparition's second existence. Frank sat there for several minutes out of breath and in severe pain. It was just as he had seen in his electric vision. It made him laugh. But the laugh was short as an image of his wife and children sprouted in his head. He prayed to himself that the rest of his vision was true as the Dolphins came down, beat him, and took him, to their king.

DEADSY TOWER	

	"Master? Master! Might I take away your attentions for a moment? A pressing issue I believe needs your immediate consideration." 
Exeter paced behind a map of the known Multiverse, it was brown and crinkled, even a wine stain circled over a parallel universe from a bad stint during the middle-ages. His hands folded behind his straight back, heels stomping, toes forward. His went to the edge of a great window and cast a gaze downward to the streets below, giving no return to the profound Doctor.
	"I realize your Highness that no matter ought be brought to you unless it has proven beyond my control, and I bow a thousand appreciations for your trust and confidence in me and my abilities, but there's one thing I must discuss with someone, and frankly sir, I trust no one's advice or comforts as I do yours."
	Exeter lifted his eyes to the pale and smoggy horizon. Another sun was falling from the sky. Soon the darkness will have completely repressed it, winning victory over another star who had fought with burning rage, and yet, finds its battle's only beauty in the clouds in which it commissioned to its aide, now blushing crimson as they fail him again. 
This time as he reaches out to grab hold of them, to fill them with the light to fight on, the star finds their forms empty, as his light only deflects right through.
	Doctor, do you believe light will reign forever victorious over darkness' oppression?
	Doctor Nner stood confused, he had not expected a question. "Exc...excuse me sir? I don't believe I understand."
	The night is inevitable, constant, but each new day the heavens send a new star into the dark. At the end of each day, the night returns victorious, but surely, if a star could hold for long enough, long enough for the next star to come along, perhaps together they could hold long enough for a third. Could three stars then hold long enough to keep the darkness away forever?
	"Sir, actually, well, as a scientist I must suggest...that is, I mean I respect your metaphor, but you shouldn't allow such silly comparisons to take hold of your mind. You're worrying yourself over something that doesn't exist. There's only one star that lights our sky, the sun, which we revolve around, spinning through space. The days are the result of a cyclical motion, not some cosmic battle between light and dark, where suns are born and die by darkness," he snortedly chuckled.
	Exeter dropped his hands to his sides with an angry glare at Nner, You come with flattery holding the muscles of your tongue together attempting to educate me? I gave you a second chance by allowing you to stay here in San Tropez, and this is how you show gratitude? Patronizing me with your, 'science?' You think you're so wise, so...SAFE! Safe behind your ridiculous SCIENCE?! YOU'RE A FOOL TO SPEAK TO ME WITH SUCH CONFIDENCE. Confidence gained in your trivia-like knowledge of widely accepted masturbation. He lowered his hands and his voice. A smile crept across his face; the smile a man gives a child in realizing the boy's innocent ignorance, But really, doctor, I asked you a question and you did not answer it.
	"Sir, I did not understand the question."
	OF COURSE YOU DIDN'T! The anger returned, YOU'RE AN IDIOT! A BLIND VAGRANT BEING LED BY WRITTEN PRINCIPLE RATHER THAN YOUR OWN! UNABLE TO SEE THE WORLD AS IT IS, AND ONLY ABLE TO SEE IT AS IT IS TOLD TO YOU!
	"Sir, I apologize-- I beg your forgiveness."
	Now in a tone of sympathy, Exeter gave his knowledge, but withheld his forgiveness, Of course you would. You see Doctor, you have nothing to teach me. I understand the rotation of these celestial bodies. But you must understand, that was not made for you. It was here and you came into it. What you see with your limited perception is only a small theatre of the grander workings of all things. A film if you must, in order to wrap your feeble mind around such an obtuse representation. Each day we see what is happening everywhere, only on a scale we can comprehend.
	Exeter walked from the window and toward Nner's petrified body, Now tell me, and this time Doctor, I would advise, it is in your best interest to simply answer the question I ask you.
	"Of course sir."-- gulp.
	Ha...of course 'of course'. So, Doctor, tell me, The night sky, and the emptiness of space beyond...how would you describe it?
	"Describe it sir? You cannot. It is simply emptiness, darkness?"
	"NOW DOCTOR! WHAT DID I TELL YOU! SIMPLY ANSWER THE QUESTION! YOU MUSTN'T TRY TO CORRECT ME AGAIN! YOUR ABILITY TO EVER MAKE ANOTHER SOUND DEPENDS ON IT!"
	"I'm sorry sir! I just don't know how to describe something that's--that's essentially nothing!"
	Exeter now standing in front of Doctor Nner, rests his hands on the Doctor's shoulders, smiling, 
	"But doctor, isn't that a description in itself? Emptiness, darkness...nothingness."
	"Yes sir, I suppose."
	"HA! You suppose. Of course. Well then doctor, tell me, where do stars come from?"
	"From the remnants of other stars. New stars form from the matter left behind by old stars."
	Still trapped behind the bars of your laughable 'knowledge'. But that will do I suppose. Then why do they form?
	"Why sir?"
	Why doctor.
	"Well, ----er the matter begins to bond, and collect, and burn...and?"
	Your confidence falters where your science does not reach. So why does the matter bond, why does it form a star? Why not some other body we do not know of?
	"Sir, that question has no answer. I mean, yes, what I mean to say is, I don't know. Not beyond the fact that, simply, that's the way it is. Hyper-gravity?Magnetics perhaps?"
	The way it is? Magnetics? Perhaps? And you are satisfied with that answer? Well, you're right enough, but you only know the process and procedure, you don't know the motive, or the reason. Let us move on. A star, what is its function?
	"Function sir? I don't know if it has any real 'function.'"
	"You are intolerable Doctor. Then answer this, what does it do?"
	"It gives off great amounts of heat, and light."
	Then that must be its function.
	"Nothing suggests that it 'must' do this, or even funnier, sir, chooses to do this."
	But it does nothing else, so this could be its only function! Now, do stars live forever doctor?
	"No sir, they burn out."
	Burn out? Explain this to me.
	"Sir, after millions of years of burning they eventually burn out all of their supplies of matter, and thus die."
	Die? So they had once lived?
	"I wasn't implying that! I was, just-- just describing it."
	"But you didn't describe anything, you simply labeled it. Please, doctor, if you think it so necessary, I wish you would 'describe' it to me."
	"The star burns out, and then explodes creating in its wake, a singularity: a black hole."
	So the star burns for its entire life, giving off light until in its final moment it gives a great effort to light the universe in a grand explosion, then only to be transformed into infinite darkness?
	"Sir, well-- I suppose one could look at it that way?"
	"WHAT?! YOU TIT! YOU JUST EXPLAINED IT TO ME IN THIS WAY! THIS IS THE CYCLE OF THE HEAVENS! BEYOND YOUR PITIFUL EXISTENCE!"
	"But we never experience any of that. It simply happens. It doesn't affect us."
	Does it not? Have you looked into the night sky Doctor? What do you see?
	"Stars."
	Precisely. The darkness of night has been perforated by stars that have existed for years you cannot measure. The sun is one of these stars. If enough stars were created and remained, would not the darkness dot the light shown by a night sky filled with stars?
	"Yes, technically, but there aren't enough stars for that."
	Not as they are now, but tomorrow no one knows. Alone a single star cannot make a constellation, and a single constellation cannot light the sky, but enough stars could snuff out the dark.
	"Master, why do you worry yourself like this?"
	This is the problem we face, Doctor. You refuse to admit, and instead, distract yourself by the trivial happenings of your day to day. The consistency of your ignorance and insolence has left me fatigued by my own lethargy, ask me what you came to ask me, or leave me now.
	"Josh Turkey daily tells the populous the truth, and you continue to let him do so. Why not kill him?"
	"YOU DARE TO ADVISE ME? YOU!? HA! THE ONLY OF MY MEN WHO DESERVES PUNISHMENT IS YOU!" If all of my media were to say the same thing, then the people may begin to believe there is foul play in how the information is given to them. With Turkey, we're given the benefit of the doubt. The brainwash thrives as long as Turkey continues to counter; It seems like everyone is as free to speak the 'truth,' as long as one is, and he is seen instead to be a fool, or radical conspirator. His voice has no validity, and yet, is the most important one for our prosperity.
	"The brainwash is stronger than ever my Lord. The Gomez! Cracker Factory has begun to produce at such a rate they're practically giving the crackers away for free."
	You mustn't forget Doctor, the Cracker factory is our payroll, as long as they're selling, we're funded. We lowered the price to monopolize the food industry. Who'd buy a dollars loaf of bread if you can do so for 20cents? Quality is nothing to the people of San Tropez. They want as much of everything as they can, and the factory allows for that. By selling things for what they're worth, rather than how much we can siphon from the pockets of the people, we triumph top sales. The people are content and apathetic now their bellies are full of sugar and lard. Why fight when you're made content by the services provided by those you would battle?
	"My Lord, you bring me great comfort, even now, but, I feel I must address what caused me to begin to doubt."
	Your weakness and foolishness?
	"Yes yes yes, and a million other offenses, but more so sir; Nott."
	What is it Nner?
	"The boy, he's escaped Nott."
	Wake him.
	
	Someone had broken into Pundara's apartment. It could have been one of many people, or many of the same type of people. She didn't want to stay a second longer than she needed to, just snag a clean pair of clothes and pills. She prayed above everything else whoever broke in didn't steal her Calm.
	She ran to her secret drawer, undressing. Luckily, under her bed was found full of drugs, next to a crummy journal, she grabbed everything and tried to read some of the chicken scratch, "The Cosmic Lie resides in darkness. But darkness does not equal lack of light, but lack of hope." A cold chill ran through her as she tried to find the author. On the back it said "Zach Attack, The Power of Pi." A warm flush went about her. She thought she heard a noise outside and flung the rest of her shit in her voluptuous purse and headed for the monorail.
	On the train she read much more: "We all feel the weight; fear we won't become who we were destined to be. The Cosmic Lie is an illusion we imposed on ourselves that can dictate the downfall of our fate." There was a lot of illegible writing, sentences crossed out and smaller letters above, but nothing comprehendible. It didn't look like Zach's handwriting at all, and the pages were definitely out of order, some words upside down or dyslexic in nature: "Silence," she thought she made out, "Only the humming within the mind. A heartbeat, expansion of lungs, creaks in the wind, bubbles in the stomach, the sound of nothing being done," Pundara read on believing this purposefully placed diary was the ramblings of a coked out doper, but also found relevance somehow. Her eyes scanned vigorously further until they met a juicy section, "Death comes in 3's; a lion, a witch, a wardrobe &*%$@!#/? Don't make laughter come uneasily. Laughter equals hope, but hope is not all you need. Sometimes, all you need is luck, a whole shit ton of it."
	The rails screeched as the trained reared until the slowing halt climaxed. Coming out of her trance, she skipped a few pages backwards, the scrawling was more intense and angry, "I am the Faceless man, with hatred as pure as a new-born that evil hath never seen; the evil of evil. Even sworn enemies favor truce in dark times, when nothingness is right around the corner." The cold chill attacked her again from her soft ankles to her curvy spine. Skimming over what she read, she presumed Zach didn't write this. He never talked like this? he just said he loved me, like all the rest? and I always told him to shut up and put his money where his mouth is?
	The doors to the passenger-car opened and people exchanged bumps into each other while staring at their teleprobes and ethrapads. Before Pundara rose, she fingered to the last page, "Dear Beholder of Pi, you must fight through the eons of dark vast nothing. It will be traumatizing. Everyone you know will die-It is your duty that everything is not all for nothing. You must tread through darkness so that one day the light will shine forever--"
	Pundara heard her client's voice yell her name sleazily. She cavorted over to him, acting with a pouty giggle, dropping the Power of Pi on the floor of the monorail car.
	
	Kylia gave up on her teleprobe and ethrapad. No one answered, and call backs were hopeless. Even when I'm with them they pretend I'm not around. Like I don't mean anything? She was finally done with crying, emotionally spent from her own loneliness. Charlie's voice was even muted. The only thing that felt real was the voice inside her head. It was a new type of thought; brave and balanced. You are faced with the impossible at all hours of the day, but here you are, practicing your craft so someday it will be a force of reckoning. Kylia didn't know this voice, it was a new reinvigorated woman.   
	Gentle drizzles of freezing rain shattered on the fort's tinny roof at Gramercy Park. Turquoise emanated off a computer screen onto thin walls. Breath visibly drafted towards the monitor like a smoke-ring daydream. Charlie's outside thermometer read 20F.
	She could barely recount near seven years ago, when at the age of 15 she walked her first timid steps into the Excelsior school for the extremely gifted. She graduated on her second year, something unheard of, achieving an honorary PHD in Technological Sciences, all thanks to Professor Keesle. She could care less what the diploma meant though. She was only interested in her art; Charlie.
 Kylia casually refereed to Charlie's new Robotic-skeleton blueprints the Three engineered with her enlightened history of digitalia. And now your soul mate will have a body. How come you have no problem loving a computer, but each person you meet, not a sliver of a connection is made on the same intimate level? This Judas of a thought made her face scowl and work harder.
Clicking the decorated life-like mouse, her mouth wide open with eyes blotched red half way open, she photographically memorized how to route Charlie's eyes and mouth to his neck. Her fingers felt like erotic magic. Screwing the nuts and bolts of Charlie, fingering deep parts of him she thought couldn't be reached physically. Charlie nearly screamed with joy when she attached his arm with a four fingered hand a couple nights ago. She hadn't slept since. 
Her legs cramped and the lower back of her neck ached. You've been working constantly. No need to get burnt out this early. Sleep so your work is even better tomorrow. She agreed with the voice in her head.
	Rising, stretching her arms out, letting a queer sigh warm the stale garage of a room, she congratulated herself with a scratch below her clitoris. The humming of the computer faded as music blossomed from the vinyl record they chanced to find one night while drunkly looting the piles and piles of electronica waste. She preferred the mechanical sounds of the player itself, how it would click and rotate into position So perfectly, but music helped time tick. And the Three would stupidly dance to it, in merrier fits of mood. It was always quite the spectacle, for they lacked all that was linked between rhythm, dance, and music. She picked her nose and went to the bathroom where she began to undress and shave her legs. She was completely naked when the door budged as if it were to be slung open freely, followed by a massive pounding, "Hey - open up!" A voice rang from outside. 
She stopped breathing. The brave voice in her head had retreated and all she could hear was the Cosmic Lie, They found you, You're done for, They'll eat your brains, Your friends failed you, there is no such thing as love, you will die, you will die die die--
	The floor seemed to pull her in a Tell-Tale-Heart sort of way as she panicked and lied down face first, her hands nesting behind her head ready to be arrested THEN molested. She felt a rush of hot tinkle down her leg, ever so slightly warming her, temporarily in the cold of the fort. 
	"Kylia, open up," the voice spoke with relatively cool annoyance. The person outside spit a nasty loogie. She wept. I wish I could be a hero, just once! Deadsy had finely caught her. The door baboomed again, "Kylia, open the door!"
	"Oh balls," she painfully rose to a crippled walk, excruciating to move towards the door. "Christ-- I'm going to die-- I know it-- I might be dead already!" Her hand fell hard onto the metal latch that was built with the Three's teamwork. It made her cry worse than before. How could brothers who work together so well, reach such grand accomplishments, now find the need to drift apart from each other? "They could've done it if they worked together like they did at the Flood!" She snuffed her tears standing as tall as she could, ready for whatever torture might come next and unlocked the door. Her entire life flashed before her eyes then suddenly--
	"Shit its cold, thank Pi you're here!" Nic said wetly, directing himself inside drying his curly red hair like a sheep dog.
	"Nic?!" she bipolarly boasted. "Your back?!" He shrugged not even giving her a glance. The door slammed behind him, locking shut. I'm naked! She covered herself quickly with a robe while Nic was taking off his wet clothes in the bathroom. "You're not dead! You're alive! That's so awesome! Point for us, right?" she somewhat joked.
	Nic barged out of the bathroom. "Yeah, and I got us booze and pizza." He adjusted her robe so her boobs would stop staring at him. 
	"Good to have you back Nic." She hugged him tight and kissed his cheek.
	"You too," He replied gingerly and handed her a frosty cold one.
	"How'd you get this stuff?" Kylia asked curiously taking a sip, making an unwanted bitter face.
	"I stole it," he said, "And some other things." He threw the case in a loud dirty brown fridge. She took another sip thinking it would get easier to go down. It didn't. DRAT!
	"Stolen? Isn't that a little 'dangerous'?" She made quotation marks with her bunny fingers.
	"Yes, it was. But I did manage to snag a greasy pizza pie for two."
	"My hero!" she cheered with a fist in the air and grabbed from the warm cardboard pizza box. "Can't you tell Zach mentally you're here or something?"
	He shook his head no and began biting into a hot cheesy piece. Juice from the pizza squirted on the sides of his mouth. He licked the grease fiercely and spoke, "I tried but the way is shut. The Plane of Pi appears empty, but is being closely watched. If a turd drops in there, a swarm of piranha might jump in after it. Who knows, it's probably a good thing we can't communicate right now. Evil's stirin its twisted spoon." 
	"That's for damn sure." Kylia said as hip as square. Nic threw crust behind him and bit into a brand new piece he nearly fit all the way down his mouth.
	"It will only get worse, if it is to get better." He looked down at his beer can, but Kylia saw he was staring straight through it trying to hide a traumatic memory he'd never be able to cope with. He took a burly swig and gagged from alcohol going up the wrong pipes, shook his head, paused to catch his balance and started to search for something he forgot. "Here, I got you a gift." She grinned excitedly clapping her hands frolicking to him. He turned around with a generously sized hand-gun resting on his two palms. "Take it," he said enthralled by the glowing silver weapon. It sparkled like overflowing tear drops from heaven's toilet in the mystical computer light, as if there were a billion tiny diamonds engraved within its skin. Kylia was hesitant touching it, as if it would bring more great unspeakable malice.
	"I've never held a gun before," she said shaking. 
	"Just take it. It's an easy ticket out of here, if Exeter or anyone else might find us."
	"Are you suggesting that I shoot myself?" She slapped his shoulder screaming, backing away from him, disgusted.
	"It'd make me feel better when I leave you're not helpless." He met Kylia's tiny eyes magnified beyond proportion by her glasses. "Would you prefer something bigger?"
	She blew air out her nose. "No, you're right, well, a BIG GUN would have been fuckin sweet," she said and studied the gun more carefully. "It gets creepy out here at night when I'm all by myself." She slowly extended her hand and embraced the tool. It was heavier than expected. Something about it turned her on as she held it. Smelling it naughtily, she pointed at a Kate Upton poster and eagle eyed through the cross-hair, pretending to shoot and made a silent "bang" with her mouth. 
	He winked at her, and immediately found it weird he just winked at her. Shaking his head with a blush he noticed a pile of Zach's things. His smile faded. "When's the last time you saw Zach?"
	She looked up at him, very seriously. "The last time I saw you." They both took a drink. Nic didn't like the sound of that news. "Josh is back in town, but, he's not responding to any of my texts. Professor Keesle's dead." Nic turned his head. I saw her die. I thought it was the Cosmic Lie? He chose not to share this with her. 
	He went through the pile of Zach's clothes and knick-knacks, all smelling of alcohol and shit. There was nothing but lint in all of his pockets, except? matches. 
But when he grabbed them, he felt his hand was on fire and immediately let go. Had one of the matches ignited? Kylia thought he had plainly dropped them. Weird, Nic thought. As he inspected closer, a strange aroma was drawing him in like a fetish to the matches. Weird. The matches were? precious. Kylia was still trapped in euphoria with the gun Nic suspiciously gave her. He bent slowly to swipe it up when a grotesque giant slit of green and pink gnarled teeth suddenly screamed and chomped at him immediately before he pulled his hand back. It happened so quick he didn't think it actually happened. Later, he would flashback in déjà vu to remember it resembling a hideous Venus Fly Trap. He turned again to Kylia bewildered and back to the matchbox squinting. 
	It read: 'Pundara's Box : Awesome XXX' with a 'Dara' signature girly handwritten on the flap underneath kissed red lips. (It was a particularly big matchbox) Zach's secret side he willfully hid around the boyz. One with bizarre interests of warm stinky damp lingerie underwear fantasies he kept in taboo. "Bastard's been goin to the whore house without giving an invitation to me!" He mumbled to himself insulted. 
	"Nic this is totally wicked," interrupted Kylia. She was going to french him (their first). "Thanks for looking out for me--" 
	The gun misfired with such an enormous boom that their ears popped upside-down, heads cringed in between shoulders, faces wrinkled enough to be elderly, eyes closed tighter than a-- Kylia stared at Nic with an open mouth. Her eyes transfixed.
	"Oh yeah," Nic chuckled, "I neglected to mention I don't know dick about guns. I didn't know if it was loaded or had the safety on or whatever!" he chugged his beer and swished the empty can into a trash bag burping as he broke another one open. Foam spewed everywhere. "Phew--That was a close one!"
	"Holy Fuckin MOley!" Kylia boasted in a huge scared breath. He locked with her eyes dazed. "Nic, I --I fuckin' -- I fuckin shot you!" He gazed at the top of his left shoulder and saw a raw dented wound oozing blood steadily. He gave it a poke with his middle finger. Blood spat out like a cheap squirt gun. Kylia crossed her eyes and fainted puffing out a light sigh as she collapsed. 
	This was very much unexpected.
	Nic cringed as his fingers dug into the open bloody wound. The Power of Pi stopped it from going to deep. "Well," he said to the bullet that took a chunk off him, searching his delirious cavern of thoughts for something witty to go out on, "Eh, I got nothin." He shoved the rest of his beer down his throat then passed out--

	--but snapped out of a warm happy place back into cold reality. He was being dragged by Kylia through a shabby deserted alleyway. "Hey--," drools of spit bubbles fell out his mouth, "hey--stop--stop-what's going on?"
	"Nic!" She set him down ungracefully and reviewed the wound. "Are you ok?"
	"You shot me--"
	"Yeah, yeah, I'm super-duper sorry--," she massaged his scalp with a fee cold hand.
	He almost laughed. "Where the hell are we?"
	"Uhh, well, I don't know actually. When I woke up I got my things and you, and headed towards a hospital."
	Nic surveyed around. "Kylia! There can't be a hospital for 10 miles!"
	"I know, I know, but I took a short cut."
	"There's no short cut!" He thought of slapping her.
	"Yeah, I realize that now."
	"Because you're lost?" 
	"Yup, I don't know where we are, god damnit." She scratched her hair and pushed up on her glasses.
	"Well I do, and it's probably one of the worst places we could be." He spit out some dirt.
	"Really?"
	"Really? God and Pi help us all, this is the North Bowery Kylia!"
	"Oh?No shit?" She started to whimper, desperately trying to hold the tears, trying to be a good solider. Nic saw this. "I'm sorry." She turned away.
	"The gun -- you got it right?" He asked as straight as he could.
	"Doi, only an idiot wouldn't bring it," She responded skeptically sarcastic, briefly swiveling suspiciously behind her back.
	"Give it here then, I don't need another hole," he slurred. The bleeding in his arm slowly dried. Nic threw an overkill of Calm he got from Groggs down his throat to fix the pain dandy. He knew there were bad guys nearby, but didn't want Kylia to know.
	"SSSHH! I think I heard something?" Kylia grabbed the bad arm, "Wait, shouldn't you change?"
	"No. Never again. I can't. I won't." He was coarsely stern in tone (possibly agitated by her clawing his weak swollen arm) who was unsatisfied with the answer, but figured if Nic said so, there was probably a damn good reason why he wasn't the LionTamer already. 	
	He stopped, displaying a creepy blank face. The expression made her push out a tiny squirty queef. 
	Kylia swallowed her spit and timidly tip-toed and took the smallest peek around the corner. Nic gave back the gun. "Don't shoot me, please." She nodded and they peered together like an incomplete Three Stooges gimmick. 
	Wind blew over silence. The smell of burning stuck in the air like brown stuff under fingernails. Kylia attempted to brush off her fright that had grown much worse since she awoke to find bleeding Nic hunched against a wall. Her teeth clattered flamenco claps.
	Low octave voices mumbled back and forth in between distant monotone footsteps. She was about to stroll into the open when Nic's icy hand flipped her sunny side up. She nearly fired the loaded weapon straight into the air in surprise.   
	"I'll go first." he spoke quietly, clenching an invisible fever.
	"Nic, no! This is, this is bullshit!" she whispered as loud a whisper can be, pointing the barrel of the gun at his throbbing shoulder. "You can't do this, I can't do this, I don't even know, what the fuck? Why did I leave? We should've stayed HOME." 
	"Think Scoobie-Doo, and I found a clue! A classic one as well: Matches, with a girl's name on it. And don't point that damn thing--" 
	"What? What girl? Pundara?" She had no idea what he was talking about, but Nic's eyes squawked open with the sound of Dara's name as if their stupidity got much stupider.
	A voice shouted. "Fartfignoogen!" Footsteps turned to marching.
	"Fartfignoogen?" Nic laughed. "Is that Norwegian?" He stopped laughing bipolarly, reaching. "Hide-quick, we're surrounded?"
	"We're surrounded?! Shit, we're screwed! We're screwed!" She fidgeted then felt the cold and heavy weapon press against her side. "You know what?" Kylia cocked the gun and pressed her back hard against the alley wall, took a deep breath and made a sign of the cross for fair measure. "It's time to be a hero." 
	Nic couldn't believe it. "Kylia, don't you fuckin dare!" 
	She dared.
	She hurt herself lunging into the open in a barrel roll motion and dizzily rose to her feet-- Everything spinning- She felt our Earth rotate. She pointed the gun straight in the center of her and hopped in small acute angles, eyes wider than an obese chick's bass drum. Her face was flushed red and a vein that normally doesn't pop out showed its river branches on the side of her forehead. Her tiny fingers were ready to trigger anything that moved.
	No one was in sight though. She glanced back and even Nic was gone. Smoke idly rose like candle's lit for a sacred prayer randomly on the ground. She again turned to where she jumped from in confusion. She lowered the gun. "Nic!?"
	[In slow motion, if you can digg it]
	The floor spit up at her throwing rocks, glass, dirt, and whatever the hell else was on the ground. Bullets wizzed by her head zooming her name. Loud fire cracker noises spewed from unreal directions. She whipped out a dance move that only dorky and chunky young single white females can accomplish successfully and dove behind cover. Her glasses, hair, and jacket were plated with dust. Thuds broke off chunks of brick crumbling on her pin shaped head. She rolled over several feet more and called for Nic.
No response. 
In fact, the bullets stopped their orgy when she spoke his name. She realized her chaotically beating heart was the only thing she could hear. She sneezed with a boisterous "Aaaachhoooo!" 
	She was calm again with a strand of snot extending to her chin in the shape of crooked spaghetti. "God bless me," she said to herself and wiped her face on her coat. She felt lighter. Did I blow a load of pudding in my panties? 
Somewhere in her surviving, the gun had dropped in the middle of the no-man's-land, mirroring its beauty, mocking her, "Titty fuck." 
	But a wave of courage sprouted within her. For most, it would be considered instinct. In any other circumstances it would have been a daunting task. It came natural now. She stood with minimal sound and crept like James Bond: the new guy, I think his name is Ralph or Dolph, something Australian. 
	The gun was within reach, but she would have to be faster than a snake's cum shot to safely nab it. She licked her lips making them as reflective as the shiny silver steel handgun. Another sacrilegious sign of the cross was painted and without thinking she sprung, reuniting with the weapon. A rush of adrenaline tickled her groin and made her smile cockily. She Eskimo-kissed the gun, "I love you," she told it lustfully.
	A distorted howl nearly made her soil her khaki cargos again. There was a scream of pain followed by an onslaught of gunfire. She emerged like a hippo coming up from underwater in attempt to scan. "Nic!" she yelled but could barely hear herself over the shooting, yet mewls pleading mercy amplified over the bullets. She saw the sparks of the guns aimed at something else. 
	"Please Spare ME!" someone yelled
	"Dear Chirst!" another pleaded, "NOOOOOOO!" 
	The sound of splattering flesh being ripped inside out made Kylia cringe and vomit a smidgen of leftover maple syrup and pickle mustard pizza.
	"Nic!?!" she yelled hands cupped around her mouth. In the depths of the echoing silence, she noticed in the lonely cold distance a flickering lamp post. For a moment she was reminded of her childhood, watching other kids play kick-the-can till twilight while she sat inside by the window at her Mac, overthrowing top secret government firewalls in an endless matrix. And now here she was, gun cocked in the midst of battle of underdogs against the unknown evil controlling and consuming the world. It felt pretty cool.
	Another harsh breeze blew from behind her. Almost ass-facing it, she somersaulted to the opposite side with the gun extended ready to fire.
	Quiet again; silent except for a wet dripping sound harmonizing the moan of the lonely wind.
	She swiped the crud off her brow. The air feels soulless. The tension resolved like the end of a song and she maneuvered across the open into shadow. She wedged against a wall and planned her next move closer to the ceased gurgling and tortured screaming.
	Out the corner of her eye, she saw a shape move like a ghost the story above her. She stuttered and pointed and fired three times. Smoke echoed up from the gun into her nasal cavity, making her sneeze a bucket of goop reaching her trousers. 
	It fell off the high ledge.
	"Oh shitohshitohshitohshitohshitohshit ooo shit," She murmured maniacally and sped to the fallen. She flipped the body over. It was caked in brown and red grime. She almost lost consciousness before one of the stained hands clamped her vagina. 
	"Shot once by a miss-fire, OK, yeah, whatever. But TWICE?! Are you trying to kill me? Fuck Pi's poetic gratitude," Nic wheezed and let go his Kung Fu grip.
	"Oh God, oh god, Please Nic, I'm sorry, I didn't know it was you!" Kylia spoke higher pitched, nauseously worried yet jubilant of her freed gonads. "Where-"
	"My thy, grazed it," he responded trying to lean upright. "Not as bad as my shoulder, but it stings like the fuckin dickens." He laughed then bit his knuckle.
	"Can you walk?"
	"Shut up..." A flush released from Kylia's innards and threw itself upon Nic's face. She had never seen so much red before. It appeared Nic took a blood bath. "You done?" He asked slightly irked.
	"Yeah, I think I'm good now." She nodded just before the gun misfired for the last time and went straight through Nic's shoe and foot. He bit his teeth and gnarled the collar of Kylia's shirt with bruised fists. "I'm sorry Nic! I didn't mean--" She pleaded with empathetic cries.
	"Shut up, you-- you--you-- aww FUCKING CARPET PUNCHER!" He panted and let out every tear he had held back in his 18 years of existence. "God damn it! It hurts! It hurts more than anything I've ever done wrong in my life! Mayhap this be my penance," he cried and threw Kylia off of him. 
	"Wha-?"
	"There's more coming- A lot lot more- - they're close and will know where to come after your display of trigger-happiness-"
	"Come on! Get up! I can carry you!" She attempted to lift him heroically but failed miserably crashing into a wall knocking his head, not at all lightly. 
	"Oww!--goddamnit woman- I'll slow you down---Kylia- listen to me--run as fast as you can to Gramercy park---before the fan starts shitting," pale and weak, he still managed to laugh.
	"Transform! You can take all of them, I know it!"
	"Ky, if you don't get your stinky ass-breath outta my face, I'm gonna light all yer pubes on fire and make you sit there and smell it!" He shoved Kylia with an enormous boost to start the race, but she jumped on top of him, and for the first time in her life, she frenched. He was surprised but accepted her and they were at peace for those 3.14 seconds. It tasted horrible, but they took it like proud soldiers. It made him forget about his new holes. But they shot me? All of those Trenchies shot me! But the bullets bounced right off. And in the sewers, the Snatchers couldn't eat me either? but Kylia's cut right through me though?Where are you Pi? What are you doing to us?
	Then all of the sudden, it seemed that all the giant buildings around him were reaching out misshapen hands to gobble him up. Growing, taller and taller. All color vanished and sound turned into a grate scraping all of his mind and body and soul apart into mangled catastrophic pieces. The city was consuming him. The Cosmic Lie taking its rightful place in an empty world.
	Nic saw the nearest sewer and drooped down painfully face first in shit water. One of the Snatcher's he befriended was able to swim him to safety. 
					     	
		
A young man stands staring, face twisted in a manner only achieved by one contemplating fine cheese. His brown bloody bandages loosely tied from head to toe share the aroma of sewer exhaust and intense BO. 
	"Sir yer order's finished."
	"Mam, I assure you the cow on this plate was finished long before he entered your oven."
	"No, not the cow...eh, your meal...sir, hrmm, uhh what did you say?"
	"I haven't eaten it-?"
	"No shit?OK?uhmm?I mean the preparation is complete."
	"But I've yet to place my salt and sauces on it." The waitress was beginning to become irritated, prepared to say whatever necessary to get this boy to take his plate, 
	"Ok sir, the meal is not yet finished, but it is ready for you to take."
	"I will not take a plate if it isn't finished." The young man looked puzzled, and slightly concerned, "Please hurry, I have an appointment to keep." He turned leaving the plate on the bar, walked out of the cafe, and, lit the filter of a cigarette. The burning, acetylated cellulose caused him to cough uncontrollably, launching the cig into the soup of a nearby diner. 
In a fever he thrust himself across the terrace, his body lurching in convulsions hollering in such fashions as a blood raised wide-eyed baboon in heat. "Water! I need water!" He caught himself with his chest on the top of a proximate table. With his cheek nearly stuck to the near frozen faux-plastic, his hand grasped wildly blind above him, scouring the limited landscape for a pitch of relief. The coughing continued, and shook the table with each forced discharge. 
Plates and glasses atop were cast to the ground by the violence, and the young man rolled to the ground, picked up some of the spilled ice, and began to rub it furiously atop his tongue. He hollered in pain as he realized it was not ice at all, but rather a shard of glass from the broken cutlery. Blood was now falling from his limp tongue that rested itself on his dented chin as his eyes began to tear. 
	"Here, HERE! Here's some water!" A wool coated arm handed him a dewy bottled water. In a gulp its contents were consumed and spat back onto the ground. With its immediate aid Nic was returned from his world of pain and torture back to the cold terrace of the cafe. The girl braving the winter weather stood at a loss of this sketchy homeless-looking prankster. The young man steadied himself quickly and began rubbing excess blood on his shirt. 
	"Ahem...excuse me. One would expect to have a warning on these sort of things. Really, they're dangerous!" He pulled the base of his shirt and righted his collar. He sat himself at the seat opposite the woman, and began prodding his tongue with his index finger with the curiosity of a child first discovering the elasticity of pork. The waitress from within the restaurant came over to him carrying his dish and studied the ground. He smiled as blood continued to leak out his mouth.
	"You left this inside, now please go away."
	"Thank you. Um, excuse me, may I have some salt?" But the woman had not hung around in fear of more conversation. The rest of the patrons inside began to slowly make their way back to their seats from gaping out the window. Taking his first bite, a grin came across the young man's face and he began to dance in his seat humming in deranged ecstasy. The sun shoved its way through some white clouds onto his face. The girl that gave him the bottle gave him a final glance and turned away, waiting?
	"Are you waiting for someone?" he asked.
	"Maybe."
	"Is your name Pundara?

When the other One woke up
	The first sound that crossed his mind was a voice telling him to rise and shine. The First Mother? Here? She's gonna be pissed! The second thought was the acknowledgement of a sensation in his lower side, a stern poke, a jab. That's not friendly, Oh shit, I have to pee. 
Zach abruptly fell off a bench still wrapped in his soggy newspaper blanket. A female officer was standing over him talking into her radio. He mistook her for a man and kicked her in the crotch. The lavish punt to the genitals phased her long enough for Zach to get on his feet and off to a run. She shot at him and screamed obscenities, all which have been stated previously somewhere. 
	But he held no grudge as he ran faster than he could ever remember until he was miles away. It was the first time he had kicked a woman, right in the muff too! He thought it was fucking hilarious. But he couldn't laugh. Not because he was out of breath, but for the reason he was alone in a completely full world.
He saw a future of loneliness with an unobtainable goal laced underneath his soul.
His friends decimated, unable to endure the turmoil. 
The people he vowed to protect blind to the cause, only to suffer come judgment.
All began to unfold before him. 
	At this point, coincidence and fate were worthless as dead soldiers. The only thing there was, and the only thing that mattered was Pi. The only thing he could count on. 
	Lifting his head from his hands he continued to walk with a pain in his side. His city was moving on in a direction that could not be turned by anything. This world doesn't have heroes anymore. Everyone's a villain. Even me. I can't stay true to anything, but myself. Then why do I always feel embarrassed? of what?
He wanted soft sweetness, love; not the feelings of hate filled violence uprising within him like a damnable disease without a cure.
He abandoned all his things at the Fort, completely penniless, without a teleprobe or ticket to the monorail, and finally he walked to a place he vaguely recognized.
This corner had a few cafés, a gas station, a record shop, high apartment buildings, and an ice-park. A warm fragrant smell came from down the street; cinnamon and chocolate. Zach's stomach farted out a mean growl of emptiness. Shit I'm hungry. But my legs feel too stiff to book it if I snag a bagel or croissant. Oh well, stealing it is? again.
But just as he was about to cause a ruckus in the credulous café, something else made him reconsider. Though his vision was poor, a familiar frilly haired shape caught his eye from afar, implanted by sex. Dara? Sweet Dara, I can save you, but that means I can't ever see you again. Oh shit! I was probably supposed to meet her for lunch. 
	As Zach approached, he felt his stomach churn over. It was Pundara alright, but she was with someone else. Interesting. A client perhaps? They were sitting at a table on the terrace of a bistro across the street enjoying a rare glimpse of winter sunlight. Nearing closer, eager to talk, he realized the "client" looked like he just came home from a long stint at the hospital. Frustrated, he hurried his steps eager to catch her with the unfamiliar figure. 
	
"Holy shit. Nic, is that you?"
	"My Pi Zach, what are you doing here?" Pundara said flabbergasted. She was eating a hot raspberry donut glazed with powdered sugar and chocolate frosting. She licked her lips, shying her eyes away from Zach's.
	Nic glanced up at the girl, sitting with a relieved look on his face, "Good, I feared you might've been a Sentamentalite." Dry blood smeared dark infected pathetically homemade bandages bubbling off him.
	"Nic, long time no see." Zach said nearly gagging at the sight and smell of his brother, but then realized it could be his own smell that was so revolting.
	"I'd expect a Sentamentalite wouldn't've shown me such kindness...I should've known. Sentamentalites I've met before, but you're for sure the first Pi believer I've met at random. Definitely the prettiest-- hehe-"
	"Nic-- Nic! Look at me damnit!" Nic finally noticed it was Zach standing next to him. 
	"Oh, Zach, hey, whazz up? You're looking well." Zach saw Nic's teeth were an odd orange color, and his gums were glowing crimson. The bandages all over his body oddly looked like children's flotation devices. He smelled like excrement and his face was splotchy and torn. 
	"You know this dude?" Pundara asked Zach crossing a dark leather boot. Zach's neck flushed when she finally met his eyes.
	"How do you know Nic?" he asked her, reaching for one of Pundara's cigarette's in between her breasts.
	"He called out of the blue, needing a friend," she lit Zach's cig, analyzing his demeanor, "He caused quite a commotion," she pointed to the mess of tables and broken glass and scattered silverware that the café workers were probably never going to clean up. 
	There was confused awkward silence. 
"Yeah, me and Nic-- we're- War-Ball buddies?" Zach grabbed Nic by the shoulders, stood him upright, "Nic," he tried to seem secretive, "I saw something snatch you up? I thought you were eaten alive?" he didn't respond, swaggering and turning pale green. Zach leaned in, cheek to cheek with Nic. Nic's face began to twist in disgust and his cheeks bulged in a series of deep burps. Zach showed concern, "Gum?" He didn't have any though.
	"War-ball? You never told me you play. Did you just come from a match? That would explain why it looks like you just gave birth." Zach laughed, but Pundara did not.
	"I woke up on a bench and pissed myself." This time, Pundara laughed thinking Zach was joking. "How you think I tip so well?" He took the time to undress her mentally. Pundara knew exactly what was on his mind and scowled in disgust. Every guy makes the same shitty perverted face.
	"Zach?" Nic hiccupped then burped, "Zach-" he spit up on his shirt.
	"Gross!" She got up from the table.
	Zach picked up Nic and tried to open his eyes. "What the fuck man?"
	"This kid seriously needs help Zach, you should take him to a doctor or a shrink or a homeless shelter."
	"Nic, seriously, you look like a cartoon!" As Zach finished his sentence Nic leaned over the railing of the café terrace and spewed a pool of projectile vomit, blood red with large black chunks of congealed cruor. Zach hollered in disgust, "What the FUCK? Fore-Fathers of Pi! Fuckin SICK!"
	"It was a strange incident earlier; He cut his tongue open about a half hour ago. He's been sitting here staring blankly not shutting his mouth. He must've swallowed a pint of blood. I thought he was homeless or some dirt cheap criminal," she commented nonchalantly. "I couldn't keep my eyes off him." 
	Zach met her eyes again which resulted in a wet kiss on her tan cheek. She replied with a half fake smile. He felt this and spontaneously whispered, "I need to talk to you?"
	"Yeah, I need to talk to you too about something actually." 
	"But, not here."
	"No, we should be in private, just you and me." 
	"I haven't told you the truth about me, and I want to change that. I want to be, different; honest. I'll explain everything. I promise. Don't worry. Ok?"
	"Don't make a promise you can't keep." She took a breath. "This is your last chance Zach, if you're not at my place in an hour, we're through, for good? got me?"
	"I'll be there?.I'll see you." He threw down $200 dollars on the table like he just paid for sex. He winked at her, and left. That was smooth?I am the wheeler and dealer?whatever that means?wait, what the fuck, where did that money come from?
	They crossed the street, making their way toward the Ruins of the Lowery, leaving a trail of small spats of blood in their wake. Nic flashed an orange grin at his friend. The two hobbled, clasped at the shoulder. "JJJeeeeerrrrrrrsssss-" He sloshed and spit a wad of syrupy red, landing on the crown of an already red fire hydrant oozing down. "There's the water you need when the well goes dry," he said lowly, watching it with his eyes, "Just trying to enjoy a nicotine fix, just trying not to trip on my wings and make a fool of myself, just trying to get a drink. Thank Pi Almighty your girl has a good soul. She pulled me out of one back there."
	Zach rolled his eyes. "Well that's questionable."
	"No, really, she saved me."
	"No, I mean the other?never mind."
	They assumed silence for a few paces, watching a big black dog wag his tail at a store front hung with a garland of basted brown duck. There was the smell of roasted meat and peanut oil and fried rice, Chinese characters written on a wooden sign. The dog licked his chops, drooling.  "Hey," said Nic, "That one looks like Pi." He was pointing to one of the characters in the middle. 
	"Sure. Sure it does?Listen if we're gonna continue not talking in the High speak, why don't we just say what we mean."
	"Fine by me, but I think you know damn well we couldn't if we tried right now."
	"What?"
	"You know." He looked at Zach sidelong: orange teeth, glossy eyes. 
	Zach nodded. "Yeah, yeah, I do." He faced down. "I was hoping it was just me. I was hoping I was only going crazy and you could pull me out of it? The Plane, I can't feel it at all, not even my own Pi.
	"I can. I feel its weight squeezing air out of me, like the goddamn church? so if we're being honest, what did you mean when you said 'that's questionable?' About the chick?"
	"Dara?her name's Dara."
	"Dara! That's the one! Man, she's a keeper." Nic fantasized.
	 "We had another huge fight, just the other day, maybe, I think? But it wasn't a fight at all. It was so much more?desperate. I swear to God, I couldn't do anything to make it less desperate.? Okay, she hallucinates, but only till recently, she never used to have them. I'll be with her - at the park, holding hands beside the pond sharing a hotdog cluster and she'll breakdown. Last week she got so bad I had to carry her back to her apartment. She takes Calm. Apparently it's developed by Deadsy to counter Trojan molecules that spark Alzheimer's. But she takes like thirty pills a day. Five with meals? ten just to get to sleep every night? handfuls when she has these-- attacks. I tried to make her stop, but she can't handle anything without them. She says she can't feel anything anymore. She kept saying 'I can't feel anymore, Bobo, I can't feel anymore' - she calls me Bobo - and it sounded really stupid and I wasn't in the mood for her shit so I got all irate and told her to knock it off. She was just being dramatic, a hypochondriac. It got to the point where I had to hit her, I tried everything else. Pi forgive me, I bitch slapped her across her soft beautiful cheek. WHAT KIND OF MAN AM I?!
	"But it worked I guess... She turned red and started bawling and I tried to say I was sorry like a freak but she wouldn't come out of it. She started swooning, drunken like, I couldn't shake her out of it. So I slapped her again. She screamed. Her body was possessed, like in a medium. It spoke so quick I only made out 'scorched land, the great black nothing,- and the -wolves and the moon.' And then she said one word, louder and clearer than the rest: 'NOTT!' Then instantly, she was out of it, and she looked at me again and cried. I shivered at the word, it scared the hell out of me, the whole scene. We must've been between realities or something. Has that ever happened to you? I dunno. It wasn't safe. I took her with me and ran to the nearest motel. We had continental breakfast." 
	They came to a cross-street, waited for the heavy afternoon traffic to go through, and walked at the crosswalken path. There was a large billboard of Exeter smoking a cigar, it said 'Smoke My Product' in large letters. Both of the friends shuttered.
	"We can never get away from him can we? He's everywhere and he's been everywhere since forever."
	They turned their heads and gave the advertisement another gander.- Smoke my Product- or I'll feed you to the people as potted meat. 
	"At least there isn't too much subliminal messaging?.I think."
	
	Inescapable Nightmares for a month
	Down at the river thinking and suddenly she's back in her apartment, window open and shivering unable to figure what happened in between and then another attack: tied down in a gray room. A doctor, lots of tubes - test tubes - filled with liquid. Static, electricity in fingernails and your toes and eye sockets. Standing on a gray plane of ash, night sky, a single gravestone: 'The Fated Lovers: Found their Last Waltz in Gramercy Park,' and she knows someone standing next to her. She's holding someone's hand. 
	She wakes up every time. She knows the nightmares are her remembering. She couldn't explain it exactly, but she knew. 
	She's worried. She thinks she brings death to both of us. Her family cursed. Her family and Deadsy. Her brother, a dapper, super-alpha-male sonofabitch, makes slaves out of all of them. They own the Lowry.
	You mean, DID own the Lowry. 
	The Theatre used to be classy, upscale, where people went to be seen, show off fresh catches: champagne, red carpets, photo shoots, posh and style. Celebrities put their hand prints in the sidewalk. Le Grand Chateaux, it was called. Her grandfather was this nice old man who chewed a black licorice stick and wore a top hat and everyone in the neighborhood loved him. When his granddaughter was born, he renamed the place Pundara's Palace in her honor. Pundara and her family were happy and she would roll him cigarettes and go for walks with him on a small plot of land just outside the Bowery. A garden,
	Of Course
	 vast, jungle gyms, tire swings, chrysanthemums, rare botanica; ancient cottonwoods and endangered Erythrina Schliebenii, sundials, twirl slides, bird baths, grass mazes, pumpkin patches, foxes, rabbits and black squirrels. The old man made it a playground for the children of the Lowry. Fields for football and Frisbee and everyone was happy doodily doo, ding dong doodily doodily doo dah day? 
	Dara's older brother, Eli, from a young age, plotted to rid the old man and usurp the family business. Spent all time learning computer matrix theory, studying UNIX to memorization. Went to this genius computer school at age eleven. Graduated top of his class. Got rid of grandpa and took over. Exploded the park. 
	The park: Gramercy Park, most of it had been converted into a junkyard, but grandpa owned it all. The Gomez' were the last holdouts when Deadsy bought all private property. Grandpa refused to sell the park because he knew its value. So did Eli. He closed the park and converted the theater into a slum porno market, renamed it Pervy Plunket's Beaver Eaters: Sweet XXX, and now he works for Deadsy in the process of uncovering the key to Gramercy Park, going straight to Exeter with his findings. 
	@ The theatre: about a dozen preverts, glazed over, dirty seats, sticky floors. Noises over the sound of sex on the screen. Screams of people. Not the screams of sex but of pain torture cruel hopeless hollering. The pervs hadn't moved at all. Completely mesmerized, slack jawed. One slid down in his seat and stared at the ceiling, all drooling. Not the drool of sex addicts, but low dogs of insanity. Idiots. Brainwashed zombies.
	In between two slats of paneling, a sliver of light. I tugged on a panel and it slid loose. Then I saw it: a huge sterile room, circuits and wires and screens. A giant iron lung. Four men in lab coats plugging numbers in a massive computer and Eli in an eight thousand dollar suit, smiling, big rubber gloves. Pulled a switch. A million jiggawats of electricity passed right through a man strapped down, rang like a bell, yelping, blue lightning all around the smell of burnt hair and hot flesh. They unstrapped him and sat him in one of the front rows to watch the porno movie. Brain washing. Soul eviscerating.
	A couple of blue coats walk in with Nner and Megladon. Sterile cockroaches. Nner says to Eli "I'm a great admirer of your work. I look forward to working closely with you." 
	ladon sez "Cut the shit, let's get down to business." 
	"Alright," sez Eli. "You'll find where they live at these coordinates. I've no doubt Weasel is there as we speak trying to help Kylia upgrading Charlie before we arrive. Deliver her and the Weasel to me and you can do what you like with the rest." 
	"That's all well and good," said Megladon. "But we don't need your goddamn permission to do anything. Weasle is dead, and we've known where the Three reside for quite some time. Nevertheless, we have orders from Exeter himself to oversee this operation, and the Three are to be brought here and given treatment under the care of Dr. Nner. You're prescience is no longer required." 
	"I beg your pardon, Carlton, we're this close to perfecting the use of the electromagicity on the human body. For years we've programmed the people of San Tropez to be good citizens. This stuff is literally flowing beneath our feet in this place!" 
	"Yes, yes," said Megladon. "And you've done Deadsy a great service by discovering it. This region will be mined to its fullest capability and capacity. Don't look so glum kid, you'll probably get a nice new car for this at least." He laughed insidiously and ordered the Trenchcoats to go. 
	 Josh bolts in the theatre, running down the aisle, wielding that damned camera he always carries. Yammering about stopping the picture and the Lowry being destroyed. 
	Exeter is mining in the ruins of the Bowery. Some untapped energy source. They're siphoning it from Gramercy park.
	I walk home, through the door a good deal of blood pooled on the floor. 
	Yeah, sorry about that. It was probably my blood. 
Charlie said something to me; "Zach, take this" It said, and ejected something out of its hard drive. I've never heard Charlie say my name, I didn't even know he could identify us like that, I didn't even know he was on, but he knew I was listening, "This is my GOD, Zach; short for Gigozitronical Organic Distributer, as long as Exeter and Deadsy don't find this, mother's secret will be safe. Please, take good care of it until things quiet down." 
	I don't remember what I did with it though? I hope I left it with the pile of shit at the Fort.
	Zach saw a half burnt cigar in a passing ashtray and picked it up and till it reignited and sucked it all the way to its filter in one brave inhale. 
	"Smooth."
	
Deadsy Tower
	In a tall fluorescent-white humming chamber, perfume reminiscent of a Dentist's office, a monitor beeped like a cell phone telling you to check your voice-mail from a phone call you purposely missed.
	Drew lay on a flat metal operating table being zapped with all of the freshest Brain Wash electromagicity Gramercy Park had to offer. An exotic rainforest of tubes came out of his arms and chest, pumping with his heartbeat, in and out, in and out. Synthesized blue drugs chemically enhanced to potentially extract his Pi essence was injected into his spinal cord via super large needle. Deadsy Co also hoped this would also disable the transformation to The Blanketeer from occurring. They also had massive chains strapped around him tight, making escape futile? 
?Just in case, the Blanketeer showed his face. Drew was snoring nude, peacefully.
	Dr. Nner was printing a graph of his official report. The cloning procedure was a routine operation, and this proved no different. "Dr Nanur?" a nurse said. "Nanur? What is that, Polack?"
	The doctor could not be more upset or frustrated. "It's pronounced Nner, and it happens to be French." 
	"Nanur?"
	"Nner!"
	"Nener?"
	"Nner damnit!"
	"Nner?"
	"Yes you cow of a woman! What do you want with my attention, this is the gravest and most delicate of studies that you are participating in, and I cannot afford to be disturbed like this! Do you understand me?" He made a face like every scowling wannabe loathsome villain does but the tone of his voice was very unthreatening, in fact it was hilarious. It was high pitched and had the accent of somewhat confused Jewish New Jersian. The Nurse however, was a solider and was able to stay intact. 
"The patient will be fully drained in 20 minutes, Doctor."
	"I know that, you stupid looking tree-hugger!" He didn't. "Get me an expensive coffee with a lot of things in it!" She didn't.
	The doctor slid over on a five wheeled chair tapping the top of Drew's glossy forehead. "Wake up." Two armed guards stood by hesitantly, recalling gruesome rumors of what their fellow Trenchcoats exchanged: ripping people inside out, a disembowelment here and there, a fetish for biting throats and sucking out eyes, how his brother collected the bones of his victims and made them into instruments for an orchestra he would someday conduct for his magnum opus greater than Beethoven's 9th symphony. "Blanky, rise and shine! wakey wakey!" the Doctor said in the tone of a caring alcoholic grandmother. "Yes, I suppose it will take you awhile to gain consciousness? you've been pumped with some of my best shit, since your arrival here, heheh, waking will be somewhat of a task." He smiled and readjusted his spectacles, seeing his chart, licking his porcelain lips. He picked a piece of tuna that was stuck between his teeth and flung it on Drew who made a groaning noise that sounded as if he said "I don't want to get up yet grandmama!"  
	"You've been paralyzed from the neck down." Dr. Nner moseyed over to a phone and dialed the intercom and in a feminine voice he said, "Lord Exeter, the patient is ready to see you now-- Lord Exeter, the patient is ready to see you," and hung up.
Heavy static feedback. Drew stirred uncomfortably wiggling his toes. Lights flickered off then back on.
	"Water?I need water."
	"Of course you do." the Doctor reached down to a bucket that had been collecting waste from Drew. It smelled like an expired overflowing Port-O-Potty. He smiled and dumped it all over his face. Drew remained still, covered in his own excrement. "Taste good? I hope it does. It did come from you!" He laughed a vulture's cackle and set the bucket underneath the table. The guards got a kick out of it and nudged each other snorting. The nurse cleaned it off with a rag of dreadlocks. "Oh, hehohaha, I'm sorry, I had to - haha - I couldn't miss that golden opportunity, you understand I'm sure. I never get to have a wisecrack around here!" He wiped off Drew's face with a towel and sprayed him with an odorless disinfectant in a Windex-like bottle. 
	Drew grumbled drooling with snot bellowing down his nose. "I'm gonna fuck your eye sockets and make your shitty brain pregnant."
	"My, you're a charming young lad," Dr. Nner replied, glancing back at his charts and the monitor, displaying every vital sign congregating in Drew's body. "But where did you learn such foul taste?" He shouldn't even be able to talk, something is horribly wrong. "Anywho, I don't believe his Majesty will tolerate such juvenile potty-mouth in his quarters while he performs..." 
Drew briefly relaxed and closed his eyes. "What have you done to me?my mind, my body?" 
	Dr. Nner, felt stupid, "Oh no?" Why did I give him all those Electromagicity Brain-Wash-Waves, the flushing is having a complete reverse effect! He stepped back several feet.
	Drew lunged into the air, (as if the strength of the LionTamer filled his veins) breaking free of the massive chains. His eruption sounded like thunder. The rubber tubes popping out of his skin, letting his own blood scream into the open cool air like a virgin feeling another's touch for the first time. 
	"Heavens to Betsy SOUND THE ALARM!!!" Nner screamed so loud he went nearly deaf. The guards saw each other blankly and extended their electric cow prongs towards Drew, more scared than a newly deceased soul descending into hell. "No you fools! Use the pain-killers!!! IT WILL MAKE HIM STRONGER!!!" But the guards had no time to react.
	"HAHA!" Drew laughed completely nude, eyes glowing, summoning the strength of all those who have ever struggled and screamed arms wide apart: "I AM THE PAIN KILLER!" A flash of invisible lightning struck his soul and thunder rumbled sending a tendril of seismic ripples through time and space, pushing the TrenchCoats off balance. He punted the tall one in the testicles so hard they came out his mouth as he immediately went for the other guard, punching the bottom of his jaw lecherously. Pi was flowing through Drew so incapacitatingly hard and fast that his strength could not cognitively be deciphered, as the jaw of the TrenchCoat flew off his face and glided over to Dr. Nner, kissing him on the lips. "YESSSS! YESSS! Holy SHIT, I think I'm, I'm cumming!" He dazedly grabbed the hair of the guard clenching his no longer working penis and ripped off his scalp with one slow tug, coming off like the greasy skin of fried chicken, then threw the bloody scalp on top of Dr. Nner's bald head singing to himself, "Looks good on ya dawlin!" He winked at Nner then stretched, cracked his knuckles, feeling quite relieved. 
	"I think I have to change my name to the Naked Killer! No? wait?. Killer Cumshot! I mean, I did spooge all over the floor! Haha! My kryptonite is that I need a couple of minutes before I can get it up again, but maybe I can prove myself wrong." He slowly walked closer to Nner, who in by no means understood this hellacious and triumphantly disgusting turn of events. Drew spoke like an old radio announcer, "Will our hero manage to traumatically molest the Evil doctor with all the violence he deserves? Tune in next week on THE CUMSHOT KILLER!!! Ok I like that better." Dr. Nner sat petrified with a pant leg of urine. Drew grabbed Nner's chest and was ready to rip his heart out when the door opened.
	
	Enough-- 
	Exeter demanded and all stopped, froze; clocks refrained from digital ticking, the air molecules in the air stood still, sensations went numb. Put some clothes on-- he commanded, taking note of all that was Drew, with a little too much attention to his penis and retro bush. 
You know little one that we have much to talk about. Come, speak with me, things are not always as they seem, and the future repeats today. He studied the scenery and shrugged. Drew knew not to listen to Exeter, his words were the sweetest poison there was, but they were treacherous and hard to shield. So he pounced toward Exeter, but very quickly found himself in suspended animation. 
	Exeter turned his hand in command to rotate the abnormal specimen. When he examined Drew's body and soul enough, he released him and Drew smacked the floor with his face, still not fully able to absorb the sphere of circumstance. He bit his tongue on the fall, the taste of blood was in his mouth. There was no way he could take Exeter alone, so he attacked the only other way he knew how.  
	"Does the size of my penis frighten you?" Drew stood tall as his 5 foot 3inches could, noticing Exeter had his feet in a puddle of steaming white goo. He kept his laughter to himself.
	The only person that should be frightened by the miniscule size of your penis is you.
	"OUCH! You're a quick one MR X, but all the lil girlies I've rummaged through have yet to complain."
	Please, you've never touched a female, and yes, they do care about size-- all of them.
	Drew stood perplexed briefly. "Well, how big is your dick?"
	You're an idiot of a thing, aren't you? I don't have time for this. Ha! Why should I share a secret with you? You're obviously the weakest of the Three and can offer me nothing. Exeter observed his well-manicured nails and noticed that somehow dirt got under his right index. His temper flared, but he saw Drew was listening, wounded.
	"Listen close boy, I'm not going to repeat myself, and once it's done, it's done, kapeesh?" he started to come close to Drew, who wanted to dance around the room wearing Exeter's face, "I'll admit, I'm an admirer of your work. This display of apathetic slaughter, truly might suggest you are one of a kind." he gestured to the broken chaos in the room and peered straight through him, "I'm a bit of a collector?" he then turned to the doctor who was shivering in a corner on his swivel chair. "Dr. Nner," Exeter pointed at him in the shape of a gun and made a clicking sound with his mouth, You're suspended- and Dr. Nner's head then suddenly exploded in slow motion. Particles of his brain landed on Drew's lip which he inadvertently swallowed. It tasted salty and was chewier than calamari (not that he could ever remember having it, of course). Blood highlighted his hair and Drew wondered if he was the next to explode. He would've been intrigued to see Dr. Nner's head rewind itself back together in slow motion, and that was a shame, because he thought it would've been cool to witness.
	At all instants of a sudden, as Drew turned around, he knew they were on an entirely different planet: completely alien. 
Exeter sat on a lavish thinking chair across from Drew atop a high hill onlooking a queerly shaped and shaded forest. 
The air was stiffly familiar, lighter somehow. The grass on his bare feet was ridiculously soft and an ever changing color of violaceous. Smoke snuck about the horizon behind the rivals and the sky shone mauve black, stars burnt with superior qualities igniting the anomalous galaxy; much brighter, polygonically magnificent, impossibly colorful, dim twinkles of red like dust across the sky. 
And the moon; beauteous beyond recognition. Actually, too many to count on both hands and feet. They shared some of characteristics of our lunar friend, being round and pock marked, but they resembled diamond asteroids, or possibly some type of wondrous space jewel. 
Drew could hear the soft song of water in a stream but even the rushing and swelling had a unique high pitched squeal to it, almost a harmony with the nature around it. Much like on Earth, when the hills call to the forest and the wind and the water whisper back with the rustling of leaves and a splash ripples in a pond.
The scene was much like that, but like any new harmony, it sounded chaotic at first. Once the realization of the harmony was recognized, bliss overtook all other things. 
2 suns appeared northward in the heavens, and one of them was setting, or rising, Drew could not tell, How can it be both night and day? -- But he realized that even Exeter was studying the surroundings just as closely as him. 
	Drew thought this be the opportune time to attack. He ran screaming and slashed a fist at Exeter but found himself going straight through Him, as if he were nothing more than an illusion or hologram. He did this for a while until his energy was depleted and he was lying face up on the soft now bright greenish grass, the same color as Blank's outfit. 
	The whole time Exeter was watching him curiously, studying something that was not there. Drew felt him inside his mind, or even perhaps himself in Exeter's mind but grew sick of the thought and decided to give in. 
	"Why haven't you killed me? You've been trying to kill us all along, and now you have me and I'm--"
Drew, Drew, Drew, I don't want to kill you now. I would prefer it if you were to join me, if you can believe such---such---heresy?
	Drew was stunned how quickly Exeter's conversation started. He paused. "Bullshit!" he pointed.
	No, he winced as if it was painful to say, No bullshit. In all honestly, I'm <akhem> intrigued, by you. You?Three. Never in existence have I met such a peculiar combination of humans, and I broke bread with Hitler, Da Vinci, Cleopatra, Hendrix... I hate to admit, you are made of different stuff than the rest. You are special. I couldn't acknowledge that until now. You Three will be part of the next coming! He actually laughs, I say twice, Exeter laughed. I haven't felt this alive since the Creation!
	"How do I know this isn't another figment of my imagination? God damnit, what the fuck are you talking about?! Where the fuck am I? What did you do to me?"
	Drew, I'm having fun again. I simply cannot take you Three for granted! It can get very boring and all so lonely here on top of the Food Chain. I've been on top for too long. I've taken everything I need from San Tropez. I was soo close to apocalypse merely because of monotony, but now I have opponents that apparently have fun trying to keep up, so to speak; I have to make it all worth my while. I have to keep you.You killed Echo! Fuck. I really didn't think you'd pull that off, but I hope'd you would. It was worth the risk sending you there?
	 "So, all this shit, is just a fucking chess board?"
	Ah?the layout of the board is complex; a gyroscope within itself: layers,dimension, depths and steps to stories upon stories upon stories?where will you go? 
	Child, this is Nott: once a dimension of nothingness, completely transformed into an alive utopia of advanced primordial civilizations. You started the Engine?with the power of Pi?with the last of it?
	You wish Exey, but the power of Pi cannot die.
	Well well well? now you're speaking sense?Its true, it comes and goes?And that's why I've been hiding you from the rest of the Multiverse?But with what you've done with Nott, I will no longer be able to do that. Or maybe, it's even quite possible you reversed time?
	Hiding us? God damnit and Pi alike! Hiding us from what, your Mom?
	HAHAHA Boy! You're truly made of the old stuff! The First Great Mother? I killed her Drew. I ate her, and put to fire all she held dear. But that is all, Prequel.
	"You were scared. You still are." Drew could feel the twinkle of Pi.
	The Dolphin's senses are the keenest of any race, and they will follow your trail back to Earth. This will be The Multiversal cleansing Drew; the evolution of the cosmos, and they've already begun!
	Sharks-- Drew was so confused he stopped listening.--were the first terrorists that emerged from Pi, the Loop Hole.
	"Loop Hole?"
	"Pretzel Logic" -- when I enlightened the pretzel shaped Multiverse, I had all of the equations set, Big Bang and BOOM! Life. Then came Pi, The Universal Remainder. The unanswered questions, the impossible, the unknown, insolvability, gave birth to itself. I can never escape it, so it seems.
	"Alright alright, I don't need a fuckin history lesson, in fact, I have? headache-
	"This is all in a universe in your mind, Drew. But the problem is, we are in a universe that doesn't exist."
	"Fuck you, now you're telling me I don't exist." Drew punched himself several times in the jaw like a smart person being berated by an ill-informed poppycock. "I feel my heart beating, hear it pulse through my body. I see every color between shades of light and darkness. I smell and taste the salty stink of blood in my mouth. I wish I didn't hit myself. Now I hurt."
	Exeter was in glorified awe, perhaps even enjoyment danced in his eyes as he took in their entire stunning milieu. He looked smug to Drew. "I'm glad you're aware of these things, but that is all perception, not reality." Music started to play, eerily soft, vague and familiar. "There are only moments when we truly experience reality. It shapes us, how we connect to our world. Fit in with the interstellarness in the pendulum of the cosmos."
	"Shut up, faggot." Drew wanted to violently and perhaps sexually disembowel his nemesis and the conversation.
	"Curse me all you can, but I can give you real words; enlightenment. Words with real power. Beyond everything. I can show you the Horrible Secret?" The Music went silent, but only for a hush of strange, cold wind.
	"Something tells me I don't want to know."
	"That's because it will literally derail everything you have ever hoped and dreamed of."
	"Maybe I shouldn't give a flying fuck-stick then."
	"Yes," Exeter exhaled sarcastically, "obviously your life is so blissful you couldn't possibly part with any of its ignorant pleasures. This piece, this juicey, wet, dripping, piece of information, will be so unfathomable--"
	Drew liked that word; unfathomable. "Alright Papa Ex, you're clearly too smart for my dumbass and my asshole brothers. But please, I would love to palaver over this unfathomable, Horrible Secret."
	Exeter did not catch on to Drew's sudden, wickedly sly tone, but tried to explain best he could, deceivingly. "There are infinite planets, galaxies, universes, multiverses, dimensions, time continuums, parallaxes, some smaller than nano-atoms, others larger than everything combined multiplied by kagillion.
	There are places I remember that have ceased to exist, but in my mind they stay perfectly intact?We are here, in a universe that doesn't exist-
	But I'm here, living.
	Haha, now we approach the metaphysical.
	Fuck off.
	That's the horrible secret. Our universe doesn't exist in 'outer space' - it exists in a mind, maybe multi.
	"And now you're saying that I'm being imagined? You really are a fuckin' prick if you think I'm gonna buy that fat piece of bullshit."
	Haha "Come on Drew, this is a trilogy for Pi's sake! You were there, with me, but you're the one too fuckin' stupid to realize it."
	Drew closed his hands over his eyes and said to himself, "I am not a figment of my own imagination."
	Exeter burst out laughing. "Now I know you are ridiculous."
	The two sat staring at each other for quite some time, until Drew could be annoyed no further, saying "If you're not going to take this seriously, then I'd like to get this over with!" Drew cracked his neck, stretched from side to side and went into a Hollywood Kung-Fu stance.
	You don't get it do you? You're pests to me. OK? Cockroaches, weeds?a unibrow. Something I can easily snuff out.
	"That's funny."
Excuse me?
"A cockroach, weed, a unibrow? All of those things come back, eventually?"
Smile, he did not. You don't know when to shut up do you. Maybe I should kill you, right here, now?
THEN FUCKING DO IT ALREADY!!!!!!
	Ha, yes, your suffering, but no, tis more fun this way. My trap is set young man, and now I will sit and watch it gracefully unfold like some expensive 178th century toy. Drew's face showed he came to a great horrifying realization. Yessss, now I've told you enough. Foresight is always misleading, but I can tell this is already starting to dampen your intake of already limited shut eye. I love insanity. That's why you're my favorite. Join me Drew, come, leave your brothers, they will only slow your lightning?
	"YOU ARE LYING! IT IS ALL YOU KNOW & YOU HAVE LOST YOUR GIFT! IT IS PI THAT YOU WANT! WHAT YOU NEED! YOUR POWER IS RUNNING OUT! PI WILL BE THE LAST THING THAT EXISTS! AND YOU WILL BE GONE! LONG BEFORE IT!" Drew screamed himself to tears. He had enough of all of that was bullshit.
	But he insulted Exeter too much. My Power? Fading? No boy. Far from it. I will say twice, because I know you have no choice?Nic, your brother, is already in a much worse state than you ever were in, and Zach, well, he was on his own long ago, and he will fail for it. But you will come crawling to me, and I will say, "Told you so." 
	Drew, you're beyond desperation. And now I will punish you for it. This will push you even further. Look here boy?
	He then fully consumed Drew's mind. There was no point of resisting.
This is how you will die. 
	It felt like he was falling off a tree limb tossing in his sleep, 
	Scrambling, Wind and dust, Taste of powdered bone, A girl screaming at the top of her lungs in a foreign language that knows no mercy, blood and strobe-light vision, The voice isn't hers, She's possessed, The Blanketeer eyes blurrily open to see a maroon sky and a desert and jagged mountains, no air to breathe, He sees a sword, It's a magic sword, but then It goes into his heart, He sees a set of eyes, Kylia's eyes, but her face, her body, they are changed, but it is her hands that are holding the blade, and as his Pi dust falls out of him, her Mouth curling to a smile of satisfaction. 
	"It's not true?"
	"She will kill you. The only girl you will ever love, will kill you."
	He did not believe it, wouldn't believe it. Exeter had shown him and his brothers visions of things that did not happen, even felt them. This was probably the most sui generis however. But there was no one way of knowing how someone would actually die, was there?
And then he did the only thing he could do, "Papa Ex, where would a Super Hero be without a demented whatever the fuck you are."
	Exeter rolled his eyes at the attempted satire. Don't call me 'Ex' it sounds too? homosapien.
	"Whatever you say Home Boy," Exeter clenched his teeth, "but it's my turn to wag my dick," he turned around displaying his pale pimply ass and let out a raunchy fart that sounded and smelled like it had been incubating for some time blowing in the direction of 'Papa Ex.' He laughed and turned around with a stoned grin stretched across his face.
	Exeter did not share the same sense of humor. Drew's smile made his inner fury so tense that his snarl could have been a supernova. Drew savored as much as he could, and he saw it coming, so he crossed his eyes with his tongue flailing out giving him the Middle Finger Salute, just before Exeter rocket punched him across the face.
	
He felt like he fell off a tree limb tossing in a dream and he woke up, smacking the colder than cold concrete floor suddenly at the fort in Gramercy Park. He spit out a cavity infested tooth. The door was swinging open freely, welcoming the boneless haunts of the North Wind. 
No one but him. "OOWWWWWWW!" he howled, and then it was quiet again, save the horrible wind banging the door about.
	The first thing he noticed was an empty bottle of Calm on the floor staring back up at him. There was an IOU in there from Zach, and two from Nic. "FUCK!" he screamed and threw the worthless piece of shit plastic into a pile of beerless bottles. He threw over tables. Smashed panes of glass over his forehead. Punched holes in the walls nearly breaking his wrist. Tried to take a shit and fling it but didn't need to poop. He cuts his face from scratching it too intensely. His skin itched all over. Nervousness overtook his wants and needs. He forgot every word Exeter told him, and where he just was, and what he had been doing the past several weeks, if he had even made any contact with his friends during that time. His brain throbbed unnecessarily reckless selfish thoughts. He could end it all right now and all pain and suffering would end. But not for his friends: his family. And that's what kept him going.
	But, the Calm, he needed it. It invaded every aspect of thought.
	Unable to change, unable to feel the power of Pi, he soberly put on the only clean clothes he could find; a pink robe of Kylia's with kitties on it. He went to the couch and stared at the charred wood in the fire pile. He did so for hours until he fell asleep 
           You will die alone, cold and far away from home, sooner than you think.
	When he stirred awake out of a strange incomprehensible dream, the fire was blazingly contained, though no one else had been there.
	Drew began to wonder if this was all a figment of his imagination or nott.

	
4.13
"Hark the Pearls that Deadsy brings, Fools are all who clip his wings!
	Can't forget the riches he shares, He will kill the Pi barers!" Psalmo 666

	The first snow to the end of a record dry autumn fell heavy for hours dancing down wherever the wind would take it. It was a clean feeling; calming, serene. The ground finally soaked up the first layer of droppings and the tiny flakes piled up to somewhat of a blizzard status before the snowstorm had given any sign of lowering intensity. The wind howled through the slits between doorways and windows.
	It was beautiful to watch; snow white Blanketeering the entire city, floating and blowing in frosty swirls. The headlights shooting out into the snowy darkness made it look like they were traveling through hyperspace faster than the speed of light, even though the van was quite bumpily trudging through the snow with the most difficulties of slickness. Luckily, they were almost to their destination, and Josh thought that was great, because his gas gauge had been saying Empty for near half an hour. No one else seemed to notice. Everyone is preoccupied.
Josh and Kylia found Nic and Zach at the Fort, and all went together to pick up Dara.
Somewhere in the recesses of Kylia's mind jingle bells could be heard over a distant ho ho hoing.	"Did you see that?" Nic asked the van. Zach nodded his head, the eyes of Bag-Head glared with him, pondering everything all at once, Lightning.
Nic and Dara had been exchanging secret glances at one another the majority of the ride. Kylia could also not help herself from contemplating over the iconic sexual goddess, That's what a woman is supposed to look like; curves with swagger that make grown men kiss her feet. Not some lumpy, pale, flat girl with the face of a boy, like me. She'd never seen a woman so true to form; dominatingly voluptuous. Dara's braces might have been the only thing throwing her chic.	Nic consumed a butter drenched popcorn-popsicle, scarfing it down, it being the only sustenance in a fading memory. Zach wasn't saying much at all. He was watching the snow fall but thinking of something entirely different.
	The van had started to make noises, like it had been partying all night but finally needed to crash. Josh knew this sound instinctively, but was not worried, for now all he had to do was drift down the slow hill and they would be at their destination, but then realized he probably wouldn't be able to use the brakes. None of the passengers seemed to care as they accelerated and slammed into a pile of old TV's, DVD CD VCR players, radios, Nintendo's, microwaves and pinball machines. They all looked at Josh as if he was supposed to say something. He unclipped his seatbelt. "We're here." He said and the rest of them exited without conversation. Even though Josh was the last to gets his things, he was the first to notice something wrong with the fort. "Is that  light coming from in there, or is that just Charlie's screen?"
	"No I powered him down?" She reached for her bag and pulled out a remote, pressing a code to power up her Son. "Maybe it's Drew." Kylia said hopefully.
	Zach did not want to crush her spirits. She was the heart of everything, he thought. "Not likely?" Zach heard himself selfishly counter in response. "Its glowing like a fire though."
	"What the hell? There's someone in your house?!" Dara yelled immediately covering her mouth, but there was no one to hear, except the person inside maybe.	
	"Don't worry," Kylia interrupted moving in front of the group, "I have a gun."
	Dara turned to her, "You have a gun?" she said in nonunion with herself.
	"Yeah," she bragged, "I shot Nic twice, wait, no three times." There was a pause, Zach and Josh were trying their darnedest to not encourage further commotion and peered closer.
	"Did you say three times?!" Dara was astoundingly worried. Nic nodded and showed her the scars that healed much too quickly to be described as human. 
	"Well, who is it then? Who could be in there at this hour?" Josh whispered harshly.
	"I dunno, maybe it's the Fat Ninja. Outta my way, I'll go in." Nic said, and stubbornly went through Ky's bag for the key.
	"Ok ok! Just wait a second, damn man." Zach made a motion to Ky that said 'pass me the ball yo' and she very unsafely threw the loaded weapon to Zach and ran after Nic who had already had the door open.
	"Hello?" Nic said loudly to the stranger.
	"Hello?" echoed a familiar zoned out voice.
	"Holy Pi on a fucktits it's him," Zach said.
"It's Drew? I don't believe it!" Josh smiled. 
"You fuckin sonofabitch, we thought you were dead!"
	"Drew?"
	"DREW!" They all barged in, wet and rosy cheeked. Drew's appearance could pass for a junkie who just got the shit kicked out of him, but he'd been doing more hibernating than drugs. His eyes rolled back and forth awkwardly in their toad-like sockets and a slobbering drool ponding a circle round his pillow. Licking his lips, he tried his hardest to make a clean sober greeting before he timbered off the couch, then started snoring.
Kylia was the only one to move and help slap him out of his sleep. The others watching coolly not to let confusion get the best of them, knowing he was safer now (maybe), but not at all in a safe mind. Kylia Eskimo kissed him when Drew opened his eyes. He smiled, they'd never done that before, and he wanted to do it again. She helped set him up-right on the comfiest chair in the fort and threw a warm blanket around him. She whisked herself over to the kitchen and brewed a batch of dank hot cocoa, whispering encouraging inspiration. Kylia couldn't believe he was alive, and here with them now. "Is he ok?" Dara asked concerned and muddled.
	"I hope so," Nic responded.
	"He will be," Zach said.
	"Well, isn't he your friend?"
	"He's our brother."
	"Then help him for Pi's sake!"
	"What? How?"
	She stared at them dumbfounded. "Just go over to him! Can't you see he needs you?"
	"You should listen to the pretty lady," Drew said taking a sip of the dank cocoa, nodding in pleasure to Kylia because of its dankness. She smiled and went and sat on his lap, squashing him. He didn't care how heavy she was, she was warm. He saw Dara with a hungry and curious tilted brow. "You guys just woke me up from the best dream."
	"Sorry? was it the one where everyone had tits on their face?"
	"No? I had Exeter between my hands, and I was choking him with the purest lightning I've ever felt, and his soft skin and stupid fuckin haircut all melted into a steaming pile of shit at my feet."
	"That's a nice image."
	"It was." He took another drink. They were all staring at him.
	"Drew, what happened to you? It's been so fucking long I don't even remember the last time I had a conversation with you."
	Drew nodded but he was really masking a quick glance down Dara's cleavage, who unknowingly had a pompous exposure to the inside of her huge knockers, barely held by a black and gold bra. "Breast told me, I mean Exeter, Exeter's breasts, I mean." Drew couldn't look away and Dara saw and made a disgusted face and closed the top of her shirt and buttoned her sweater. "Uh, I mean, he let me go."
	"What?" 
"He let you go?"
"Why the hell even take you in if he's just gonna throw you back?" Josh said.
	"He's used me for something else? I don't know. He is saving us for later?He's playing a huge trick? everything? its all just some fuckin... lie. And I think it already happened... I think we're out of time."
	"Time doesn't exist."
	"Nic, don't gimme any of your philosogical bullshit right now, ok?"
	"Christ on a cross not this again?"
	"What-- why are you guys talking like this? Isn't this your friend who was kidnapped?" Dara interrupted, a chill of gooseflesh ran up and down her silken body.
	Drew smiled at her. She was very pleasing to look at. "You have to excuse my rude accomplices. They apparently don't know the cordial laws of introduction, is your name--"
Dara cringed as if his hands were fondling her, "If you're going to make some Brown Sugar remark, or something or the other, you can go ahead and shut up, little man."
"Damn," he scratched his cheek. One of Drew's super powers was the inability to tell when other people found him annoying. "Ok, be honest with me, you like short dudes with long hair?"
	"What the hell did your mama do to you kid?" she said in the tone of an angry, single, middle-school teacher, but didn't necessarily hate the attention.
	"Listen, I think I'm in love with you. OK? So, will you marry me?"
	"What?!"
	"Drew?look at me," Zach said, lighting a cigarette. "Josh has got a plan."
	"Yeah, you wanna go blow up Deadsy Tower?" 
	Nic laughed. Drew got up and wobbled.
	"We're going for Megaladon!" Josh tried to interject.
	"Hey, Drewboy, HELLOOO - Do you even know where you are?" 
	"Do you really want me to answer that?"
	"Well let's see if you can keep your balance." Zach approached his little brother and threw Kylia off of Drew into the couch, but before he was able to make a punch, Drew landed a sharp backhand to Zach's left nut, quickly reflecting what an unwise decision that was. In Zach's painful anger, he kicked Drew justifiably in the balls, but before he could lay more harm, Nic seized a stern hold on him from behind. Zach, still not satisfied with the inflammatory pain of his testicle, managed to kick Drew in the face who flailed to the couch, overthrowing Dara out of her seat and on top of Kylia, inadvertently stuffing her plump golden tits into Kylia's face which again became on the verge of nakedness.
The Three immediately stopped everything, glaring enviously at the space in-between Kylia and Dara. Dara groaned, basically saying "what-what the hell just happened?" However the noise came out much more erotic sounding than intended. She felt Kylia trying to gasp for air and removed her head from her jugs, making an obnoxious suction-cup sound. She readjusted her lady-like composure, reminiscent of a naughty librarian on the graveyard shift. 
	"You guys are a bunch of fucking psychopaths." She calmly and rather bitchily taunted them. They laughed as if this was some sort of inside-joke/compliment. 
	"Well, frankly my dear, I don't give a damn," Drew said in a poor imitation of the suave southerner from "Gone with the Wind" [very boring shit]. Nic and Zach went into much needed chuckling spasms. Kylia joined in after she felt left out from not laughing, not in a bad way either, because it was genuinely funny, to them at least. Drew continued to make faces: Groucho Marx, Gumby, a mimed dance interpretation backwards-- Pundara started to laugh as well. She started to get it: she peed the couch she was laughing so hard, and that made everyone laugh more. They didn't stop for fifteen ½ minutes. 
	The floor vibrated with an Earthquake that lasted less than half a second, thudding the walls. For whatever reason, they didn't notice.
	"It's Pi Dara, its coming back. Don't you feel it?"
	"Yes, yes I do!"
	"That's good." Zach said enthusiastically.
	"I can too, I think." Kylia said.
	"I knew it, I knew you would," Nic said, "The power of Pi is contagious!"
	"Cool." Drew said, untangling wadsof his hair.
	"Something is coming, bigger than Pi. Something bigger than Exeter."
"It could be tomorrow, or the next day, or next week, a month, a year, a decade. He can prolong this to however long he wants. 100 years maybe, granted the Power of Pi sustain us."
"So, it would only be logical, well, with all the odds against us?to do something completely unpredictable." 
Drew paced in a circle and stopped, making a face like he had an epiphany, "Let's do something so fucking stupid that it fucks everything up forever!" The others shook their heads mystified by the stupidity of Drew's language, who himself thought the revelation was profoundly genius. 
Kylia went over and was trying to open a big bag of potato chips. The crinkling of the bag was quite obnoxious, decibelly speaking. It was high pitched but carried sound too well to be ordinary plastic. Drew complained to her, forgetting what he just said, "Jesus, that must be the loudest bag in the world! I can't even hear myself think." Zach stopped moving.
"Holy shit, you think?!" Dara said rather quickly.
"Only about you baby!" Dara made another disgusted noise, realizing she was just as guilty for instigating.
	"Wait--What did you say?" Zach's refrained from lighting a cigarette.
	"I can't hear myself think,"
	"No, about the loudest bag in the world?What about the loudest Bag in the Universe?"
	

	 January 13 of the new year; San Tropez Native Robert E Lee's b-day (FYI)

	This is the day of days Carlton; perhaps the exact moment in history where all of my conquests will coincide, and all my purposefully placed shortcomings will finally pay off. This is the moment we've been working for; the apex, and now, I give True Power to your hands to see what colors bleed through. What are you really made of?
But the Multiverse will see me, as the champion of all things; the bringer of dawn.
Exeter smiled staring into the mirror, dressing himself in hip clad surfer attire: blue shades of tie-dye with palm trees and PxPxPxPx outlining the rim of the shorts. He wore a white beater under a thin cargo shirt. His hair was golden and appeared shaggy. Tonight is the night all of my fans, critics, and haters will claim to be my crowning achievement, the coupe de gras, my magnum opus. They will scoff at the mention of my Nobel peace prize, the countless Oscars and Grammy's. Yes. There will be no one to care for those after tonight? Exeter gazed directly at Carlton who showed no sign of animation. You will not fail me, and I know you know, that if you do fail?well let's just leave it at that. 
He clapped his hands. Very good then, to reassure myself and perhaps yourself: will you watch my thrown while Alec and I are at the Coast? He formally asked Carlton Megaladon, who wore the most celebratory robes of the Sentimentality: black and red with white face paint. Alec Pure was shutting the last of many suitcases.
	"Your grace, what will I tell your people in this chauvinistic absence? Your voice will be greatly missed on the Feast of All That Is Dead."
	You will not have any slight of mention, for all they know I am there?Is that clear? Not a word.
	"Certainly my liege." He bowed to his Lord for his blessing. Exeter extended his hand and was kissed by Carlton. He wanted to slap Megaladon or throw him out the window, but instead held his hand above his head as if taking place of a demonic halo. His hand vibrated and hummed then let out whiter than white steam.
	Wonderful, upon my return, we'll be having the most badass party money can buy. When I come home with the International Tidal Wave Championship trophy, things will be a little different around here I expect. At 5 o clock the waves will hit a nirvanic equilibrium that has never been felt on Earth, and it will be my Surfboard that will cut across those waves. Carlton arose and bowed.
It seems remarkable how Dr. Nner perfected the Horrible Secret. I couldn't believe myself, really. Entertaining; how fear instigates the utmost determination of success...survival. He smiled one last time?The Horrible Secret will commence as scheduled. Exeter stated telepathically before he put on his all blue Rayban sunglasses.
	"Carlton,"
"Yes my Luv?"
	Keep your eyes open.
	"I shall. It would be fun to kill the Lion Tamer a second time."
	You didn't kill him, he gave him one final glance, But this time, see that you do?
                                            ***
	Kylia insisted upon wearing the wig, mainly because Zach was a prettier woman than she was. To Josh, it didn't matter; all she had to do was operate the super-camera. He'd given up everything to risk his plan, actually creating a fake identity-- or more accurately, impersonating a local news reporter; cutting his hair and goatee to resemble the clean-cut & award-winning Outernet Journalist. 
"John Nicely," he taradiddled the secretary at the Deadsy front office, "from channel 3's 7 o clock evening news mam, I'm sure you know who I am. It's time the city gets to see a more intimate Carlton. A candid interview to clear up all those awful rumors running across the Outernet Channels, who will have no choice but to watch this report, mam, because frankly, this is going to be the greatest thing I've ever done in my life."
	How could she not agree to that? How could Megladon not agree to that?
	"Just follow my lead guys, I don't think it will come to any funny business, but just in case it does, well, you'll be there."
	Zach replied with a nod, applying red lipstick across his pouty kissers. He blew Pundara a Bettie Boopesque kiss, but when he caught glimpse of himself in the mirror, he scowled "I look like a monster!"
	"No you don't, come here, let me help you with your eye shadow and mascara," Nic said lovingly.
	"There's a difference between the two?"
	"My Pi Zach, what am I going to do with you?" Dara said fixing his atrocious attempt at seduction, erasing his more masculine facial features, a beauty mark under his right eye. She squeezed his fake boobs. "Is this even necessary, to dress up all crazy?"
	"Absolutely, we have to conceal who we really are if this is going to work." Josh said, adjusting his red tie. He missed his long pony tail and goatee, but this was for everything, or all for nothing. 
 	"I think you guys look hot," Drew snorted.
	"Who said that? I can't see anything without my glasses." Kylia asked.
	"Then put them on."
	"Great, we have a camera-girl who can't see." Zach scoffed attaching fake gold earrings. 
	"Ha, you think I need eyes to use this damned camera, I could dissemble this thing in my sleep and have it put back together before I awake!" It was probably the first time Kylia had a successful zinger. The Three nodded in approval.
	"What the hell are you supposed to be anyway?" Drew questioned Zach.
	"I hold the micramaphone."
	"Like the singer in a band!" 
	There was sudden silence. They were ready.
	"Ok," Josh began, "Let's go over it one last time-"
"No dude, it's go time."
	
 	They did it up.
	
Nic and Drew left first, wearing weather resistant Girl Scout uniforms, their hair looking girly enough as is. They waved hoping it wasn't the last time.
	On the ride to Deadsy Tower, Josh tried to explain his 'plan B'; if anything were to happen that didn't go according to plan, like their true identities be revealed, Kylia, while logged into a anti zeta-channel, would broadcast Deadsy security files globally. Josh was also very interested into getting into the Deadsy basement, knowing there would be plenty source of horror while Zach could escort Ky and Dara safely outside to Drew and Nic. Nic would then lead them through the sewers to safety, hopefully.
This was not a good plan, but it was their alternate; 'plan B:' the last fucking thing to do if all hell breaks loose.
	If there ever was a point to turn back, it was not here. 
	
	Small wisps of snow crashed briskly with a deep frozen wind, forcing cold pockets of air every which way. Josh marched up the stairs to the Dark blue Tower of Deadsy first, with Kylia close behind Dara, Zach carefully watching from Behind; their hearts beating as fast as you can think. Josh nodded a stupid sign towards Drew's direction across the street then turned with a sudden rush of fear, adrenaline, and excitement. It made him drunk with power. More tiny snowflakes floated about. The breath of the Heroes exhaled like smoke from smoldering volcanoes. 
Josh faced smiling, waving at the security camera sensor that instantly displayed a holographic screen of themselves. It was the funniest thing they'd ever seen; Zach was a horrible drag queen with fishnet stockings, Kylia had too much make-up with too little clothing, Josh clean cut to the bone in a sleek grey business suit, and Dara wearing all black and looking quite morose, despondent, but somehow it fit the part nicely as a tech girl for the camera crew.
	Before they could say anything the screen shut off and a loud buzzing yelled to be shut off. Josh grabbed the handle, and the door gave open. A strange whisper of wind came from the doors and blew fiercly towards them. Josh squinted and trotted onward with his fellowship following carefully. The door shut behind them like a haunted mansion.
	There was a Brobdingnagian fountain running like waterfalls inside a great forest, and small blue and white birds flew above their heads chirping. The temperature was much warmer inside Deadsy Tower; humid, like a jungle. Josh could already feel himself sweating. He wanted to say something to Zach but then a lady got up from a hidden desk in front of the fountain/waterfall/aviary/botanical garden type of thing, carrying a strange smirk on her face, Josh felt that was good.
	"Hello, hello!" The secretary looking madam said, waving them closer to her seat so she could sit back down. "John Nicely? Wow, you really are more handsome in person!" She said putting a hand over her chest. Josh turned to Zach and adjusted his tie, bought the bait, nice. 
	"Oh why thank you, Misses?"
	"Fergusen, Vernlynne Fergusen. You can call me Vernus if ya'd like." She tittered and adjusted her hair in a housie tootsie sort of way.
	"Well Vernlee, good morning and good day; could you, or would you please inform Mr. Carlton my crew and I have arrived and are wondering where he'd like us to set up?" Josh asked beyond professionalism, clicking a fancy pen, jotting down some nonsense onto a clipboard he exhumed from his jacket. The secretary simpered and went right to work. Kylia smiled with her mouth open without blinking like a slutty manikin. Dara and Zach quietly mingled.
	"Dara," he said with choked up seriousness.
	"Yes Bobo?" she responded in a low husky voice. Whenever she called him Bobo she sounded like that, it drove him wild. 
	"I -I'm sorry I hurt you--I never want to feel that way again--and I'm not-well I won't let anything happen to you, ok? " he managed to finish. It gave him strength because of the weight it had on his chest in his soul, like a terrible curse melted off him, castrating him until just now, exploding out from within and she wouldn't have to say anything back to him because it wouldn't matter. 
	"Ok." She said lifting awkwardly the chords that connected the camera to the long poled micramaphone. Pi, how she wanted to say more, not much more than everything, maybe an 'I love you', not because she did, but because in some other place in some different when, beyond far off distant corners of the multiverse, all they had was each other. I've never said I love you to anyone. I've never loved anyone. They all thought.
	
If Zach hadn't spilt his guts on the dark marble tile of the Deadsy Tower entranceway, he would've paid more attention to Vernlynne Fergusen saying how pretty and scandalous his crew dressed, because Mr. Carlton would appreciate that grandly... None of them were aware of psycho libido of Carlton Megaladon. Not even Pundara, who had been with him times before.
	Vernlynne pointed to the titanium elevator. Josh nodded, thanking her and led the way. The elevator was spacious enough for all of them to stand against one side of its walls. There were no buttons to tell you what floor you were on or gave you the option of where you wanted to go. Josh checked his notes one last time and saw Zach fidgeting and irritated. "This is going to go down just as we planned guys, just stick to it and we'll be out of here in no time." Josh said, mainly to assure himself and square his thoughts.
	"Fuck, I gotta take a piss. Why didn't I go before we left!?" Zach said agitated scratching his penis. Dara backslapped him across his gut. There was nothing left to say.
	When the doors slowly slid open, Carlton was awaiting them. This story of the Tower could have been mistaken for the inside of a large castle-like penthouse. The high priest was eating from a large brown glossy hippopotamus with a watermelon stuck in its mouth. "Monsignor Megaladon!" Josh said in a disguised bipolar enunciation, his eyes exploding out of their sockets. Kylia and Dara slogged behind Zach now timidly. "Josh-John Nicely," He extended his hand, "Great to finally meet you, sir. Truly an honor." Truly a horror.
	The tall athletic man rose indolently; his black shining red robes baleful against his painted white face. "Mr. Nicely," Carlton nodded turning to Pundara, "Girls, please come right this way and you can set those heavy pieces of equipment down." His southern accent reverberated more blubbery than usual.
	Hey this guy's real nice! Kylia thought.
	"How bout we mosey over to the fireplace and break some bubbly? Something harmonious is bound to happen, well, during our engagement." He was clearly buzzed off or drunk. His voice almost made you sleazy drunk with him.
	"Well," Josh scratched his chin, "A little cliché but I guess we could take a look?."
	"Wait to see the fireplace before you judge ya hear!" Carlton smirked smugly, sweating. Zach noted how often he was glancing back to Dara. Kylia had been recording since they got in.
	Megaladon was right: The fireplace was magnificent, stretching halfway to the 30 foot ceiling; made one feel insignificant. Even the lumber and fire burning inside were of great proportion. "Isn't it miraculous? Don't ask me the numbers because they are far too great, but I can tell you that it was quite expensive. Everything you see here is quite expensive. You would actually be surprised how much money there is in the religion/political business."
	"I can only imagine," Josh responded and made a circling gesture with his hand towards his crew. Zach averting his face from the fiend, overly helping Kylia fit the camera to the tripod until it finally clicked in. Everything appeared to be set and ready. Locked and Loaded. "We're all good to go, Carlton. Shall we begin then?" Josh asked, hiding his trembling fingers.
	"I don't see why not! Let the games begin!!"
	
"What's going on?" Drew said as plowed snow was added to the hunky piles shoved into any spare corner like sardines. Nic and Drew were watching a group of volunteers tape off roads and alleys, setting up prize booths and food stands. The smell was intoxicating. A cold wind was blowing as an intricate set of ultraviolet-beam raver lights were being hoisted high above the street and traffic sensors. Children were running into each other exchanging ribbons and smearing each other's poorly inspired face paintings. The smell of funnel-cakes being prepared roamed like incense at adoration. 
There was a large circular stage with a single podium in the center, beholding Deadsy banners of immense size. The roadies in charge were quite satisfied with the portrayal of dominance. There was loud annoying hammering constantly pounding.
A college student with a tie-dye shirt and dreadlocks was blowing large soaping bubbles in the chaotic distance of hula-hoopers and Frisbee tossers. "There can't be another music festival in town, it's too damn cold." Drew reassured himself, even though there were several spontaneous raves already breaking loose. Deadsy was known to throw the worst music festivals year round in the artless city.
Five young beautifully attractive women walked by in dark fur coats, an entourage of competing wannabe alpha males strived for their attention, surrounding them like obedient ants. Drew haphazardly smiled and started to follow them. Nic saw Drew engage and tracked his steps when Drew slapped himself straight and turned around and fell into Nic's chest, then nonchalantly stepped back the way they came. The girls didn't notice the brothers. "Dude," Drew flicked Nic with the side of his palm, "Those chicks were totally checking me out dude!" Drew slobbered and adjusted his ever tightening pants, nudging his brother.
	"I just don't get it man," Nic said shaking his head back and forth.
	"Sup?" a different group of girls had stopped to let their friend vomit near a sewer. One of the more compassionate friends was holding the vomitear's hair back.
	"This guy for example," he said pointing at a guy with a beard in a red beat up truck, who was talking to his son of maybe 6 years of age. "I mean, what's his story?"
	"I dunno dude-he's probably one of those guys that-"
	"Or look at these people, why can't I get to know them?" He pointed at a young happy family who was taking a lovely photo in front of Deadsy Tower. All of their fat smiles were the same.
	Drew glanced at the ethrapad to check the feed, he couldn't hear what was being said, but Megaladon was on screen. "Well man, they were born into a different background than us--"
	"Everyone is different but everyone is the same." Nic said. 
Drew stared at his brother and his profound thought. It made him think of a million different things at once, but he couldn't even find one word to describe it. He laughed when he thought of the one word he should've said in the first place. Pi. My brother has become one with Pi and he doesn't even realize it? Then it was out of his head, almost forever.
"Hey, isn't it a great day? Just, fucking unbelievable." Either Nic was suffering from the worst case of ADAHD or whatever the fuck people are calling the feeling you get because of short attention span when you're bored as fuck from shit, or he was on the verge of divine intervention.
	"Huh?" Drew tried to peek around the growing mass of people, but all he could feel was cold. He squinted towards the lurid of the sky at the quick moment, "I guess the sun's out--"
	"It's just like a puzzle that's all put together except for one piece, but there are 20 different pieces to use!"
	"What? No, what the hell?--"
	"Yeah, me, you, Josh, Ky, Dara, someone else?."
	"Zach?"
	"Dude, do you think shits whack right now man? Can you feel that?"
	"Totally." Drew reached inside his pocket and found three yellow pills covered in lint. He nearly tossed them in his mouth without thinking, rethought this, then put them back in his pocket, rethought this, then swallowed one.
	"Hey," some guy interjected, "What are you girls selling?"
	"What are we selling?" Drew coughed and rubbed boogers out of his eyes.
	"We're selling girl scout cookies." Nic said holding a box.
	"Where the hell did you get those?" Drew laughed.
	"Do you have the goober wands, or butter mints?"
	"Sorry they stopped making the goober wands last year. Ya know, because of the flood."
	"We've got egg cashew for ya though!"
	"I see, Hmm, Oh wait, on second thought, I was just kidding. I don't want yer fuckin cookies?gimme all yer money or I splatter your brains all over the sidewalk!" He held out a blue and white tommy-gun. Drew and Nic saw each other with such surprised dismay they thought they'd just won the lottery. "Come on, fork over the dough you lil cunts or I'll make your ass lick the sidewalk!" he cocked the weapon and unleashed terror as he aimed it at Nic's face. The people walking around them suddenly scattered through the streets causing accidents and other turmoil that chaotically spread as the goon fired rounds where he thought heaven was located. 

Ladies and Gentlemen of the San Tropez area, we bring to you a live broadcast of an exclusive interview with the head of the Church of Sentimentality, Carlton Megladon, with award winning anchor, John Nicely. Heeeeeeeeeeeeeere's Johnny!
	"Wait a minute--are we really live?"
	"No, we just say that?Hello, and thank you ladies and gentlemen, I'm John Nicely of 1-2-3 San Tropez News, The Best news for the Best people, and I'm sitting here with the iconic Carlton Megaladon, United Kinglord of the Church of Sentimentality. His latest book, 'Even you can be saved,' hits stores globally next week. Carlton, thank you for having me, how ya doing? Excited?"
	"Good day John, it's nice to see you again, and of course, I'm always excited. Anticipation for what will be in the past."
	"I have to admit Carlton, it's been some time since I've been to church."
	"And what is the reason for that my son?"
	"Hey mister, I'm doing the interviewing here!"
             -Insert laugh track here-
	"Don't worry John, all is in the past."
	"Of course, of course?So Carlton, please, could you run us through a typical day for you?"
	"Well, every morning begins with a Sentimental prayer at sunrise, and a remembrance to fast, I don't eat until sunset. I usually take place in at least five different masses a day, whether it be a baptism, funeral, matrimony, confession, confirmation, circumcisions or just a sentimental homage to the days past. And of course, I spend 4 hours in the hospital, trying to lift the spirits in the ward that have fallen prey to the 3."
	"To the 3 you say-- ? So are you officially acknowledging that they're real?"
	"Yes Yes Yes my good man! I've been quite vocal against their pugnacious crusade. They are nothing but men with unforeseeable power, you understand? This power is greater than any weapon man has ever made. They cannot be killed by anything. And they want to destroy all we have strived for as human beings and burn all the progress we've made as a society. I saw one with my very own eyes destroy one of our most prestigious cathedrals in the Lower Bowery, murdering all those inside it. They are Monsters of humanity and civilization!"
	"They were, of course, responsible for the flood as well, if I remember correctly?"
	"Yes, how could one forget the flood? Thank Deadsy and Exeter for extending his charitable hand, who took us up from the depths of drowning and fed us cake when we didn't even want dessert ?They're trying to wipe us off the planet. No one scientist will agree on the subject on what brought them and why they're so mean; the facts are skewed all across the tableau, with all this false media rising. We must censor information so it doesn't go to the wrong hands. What if the Three were to know that Exeter isn't here? What if they get a thermonuclear missile? What are they capable of doing with it? They probably already have one and it is probably already on its way here? hmm? Now, I'm not an expert by any means, but all I know, is the Three are morally objected to what Deadsy and the Church of Sentimentality stand for. I believe it to be true. I've prayed on it. I'd seent it. And it's my infallible opinion, that this may be the apocalypse the book of Sentimentality hath foretold."
	"You believe the 3 are the bringers to the end of days?"
	"The end of days, yes, unless the world falls behind the voice of Deadsy and Exeter?You have to understand John, we're the only ones that can defeat the evils of the 3. They're out there, planning the 21st century holocaust because they loathe us for what we stand for: free independent and enlightened thought. It's up to the citizens to decide whose side they are on; The Good: us, or The Evil: them."
	"Ok, ok, ok, Mr. Carlton, we all believe you and are behind every decision you make, because it's our belief that what you do is right and pure and for the benefit for all of man/womankind, everywhere?but, you must still clarify the controversy during the fires in the Lower Bowery, what of the people that were seen taken away--"
	"Quarantined my good man, quarantined so they would not further infect our population. They are still under Deadsy, excuse me, the, wait, no--no. No, there were no pedestrians gathered in the burning of the Lowery."
	"Infected? The 3 have now infected--"
	"Wait, no no, pretend I didn't say that, just--can't we edit that out or something-"
	All of the sudden Dara dropped the Frankenmixer and it splashed into a million tiny pieces. Kylia looked over at all the worthless pieces of electronic garbage at her feet. The camera was still rolling, but the other equipment had turned off.
	"Oh sweet Lord thank you-" Megaladon, raised his hands to the air where he thought heaven was.
	"Great." Josh said. "Excuse me, Carlton."
	"What's the problem Johnny?" he smiled happily.
	"We're going to need a new fuel cell for that hydramixer, I'll run down to the van to get the backup."
	"Ok, yes, you do that." He responded licking his lips and fumbling his hands together.
	"I'll be right back, take five guys," he said to the trio who nodded, thinking he really would be right back, and ran away.
	"I gotta a pee." Zach told Kylia who nodded and watched him close the bathroom door.
	"So, you girls from around here?" Carlton asked.
	"No."
	"Yes."
	"You are both aware that I am the leader of an entire religion, and am currently single?"
	"Well you seem like a nice guy," Kylia said.
	"Thank you," he said to her, starting to take off his clothes. "I also own very nice, shiny things. Things that will make you jealous. You are a very, very comely little girl." he said struggling for a compliment to Kylia who was now blushing. He stood from his seat and strode towards Dara. He went close to her ear. "It's been awhile. You haven't been answering my calls."
She turned away ashamed. He stroked her cheek with the back of his finger and smelled her neck before taking a soft tonguey nibble. A strand of drool stayed on his lips to her brown neck as she beckoned for Kylia to come closer. "I want to do, horrible, sinful things to you, to your breasts, to your butt hole."
	"To my butt hole?"
	"Yes, come here," Megaladon slapped Dara's butt cheek hard and slipped his fingers down her underwear, "Eat me out you bitch?" He bit on her neck again, more harshly.
	Gasping for air, Pundara glared strangely at Carlton, trying not to get legitimately raped. He squeezed her tit painfully up through her shirt and shoved his tongue on hers, sucking whatever juices she had in her mouth. He became crazed like the horny revved devil in an instant.
	 Kylia saw this and drew closer to them with the camera close. "My child, I want to see your naked pearl white skin rub against this chocolaty piece of meat?" He licked his lips drooling, clutching Pundara tighter and tighter. "Go start masturbating on the couch." Carlton threw some lube and a five pronged dildo at Kylia.
	"Wait, what?" Kylia thought for some reason that this was an elaborate joke she was unaware of.
	"Go on--- strip my darlings, and finger your pinkies!" He drooled, his tongue growing longer, his eyes wider, red.
	"Take off my clothes?"
	Dara slapped him, or tried to slap him, because, he caught her hand and shoved her back on the ground and took off his underpants. "Don't think for a second I don't know what you are." He licked his piercing lips exposing a dark skinny purple tongue, smoke exhausting from his nostrils. His eyes were bloodshot wide. 
	"Get the fuck off me you asshole!" she started to cry.
	"I'm gonna fuck your pretty-hole one last time before I kill you bitch, so shut up with asses up!" He furiously ripped his clothes off and started towards her in a rage. Kylia screamed with Pundara, 
"ZACH!!!" but he was still in the bathroom.
	Zach heard the whole conversation but couldn't intervene without pissing urine all over himself. This was the longest piss he ever took in his life. He tried to transform into Bag-Head but there was still a great wall around his scope of Pi. He didn't know why, but knew he had to keep his promise. Even if that meant risking his own life and getting piss all over himself.
	He lunged out of the bathroom still peeing with his wig and makeup. 
	Carlton looked at him curiously, irritated for interrupting the orgy. Zach's wig flew off his head as he kept up the stampede. Zach lowered himself into a tackling position and speared Carlton Megaladon straight through the window, falling down 100 stories.

"You shoot the sky like a man ungrateful for his own birth." Nic said in a new awakened sense and tone. "The ideal symbol of hope, and you borage it with bullets."
	"Fuckin-A, apparently we's gots a modern day Aristotle here. Tell me, what will you think when a bullets passes through your mind, literally, you skinny little puke!" There was loud rave music constantly bumping a bass, never missing a quarter note. 1-2-3-4.-1-2-3-4. Ect.
	"Hey hey! Chill man, chill! Don't listen to my sis, she's sick, ma just told her the Country music man aint ever comin back. She aint right in the head. I'll give ya all I got--"
	"So will I," Nic said, then grabbed the weapon from the criminal giving no time for anyone to react, breaking off the mugger's arms because of the inarticulate velocity. The guy's eyes went to the back of his skull, fainted, yet stood straight up like a zombie. For some reason, blood didn't shoot out, or even ooze out. His shoulders looked like mashed potatoes smothered with stringy cranberry dressing. Before any witnesses could call Nic a murderer again, he threw the unconscious body of the mugger into a big trash can, his leg sticking out impossibly comical. 
	"Shit--What the fuck just happened?" Drew exclaimed after a brief stint of yelling incoherent made up words. "That was fucking awesome!" He laughed and punched the air at an invisible enemy.
	"Pi."
	"Ha-Ha-- yeah, Nic, I get, what the Pi just happened, good one, I guess."
	"No, Pi just happened."
	"Whatever, I need a hotdog-cluster or something."
	"Are you nuts? You know what they put in those?"
	"Well, I figured, some sort of delicious meat and nut concoction."
	"Hah, yeah, it's got meat in it, mostly the leftovers of cows and pigs and horse-"
	"Like anus? I always figured I'd eat an anus unintentionally somehow, or at least for free, like on a game-show or somethin." He laughed. "Or with a chick sittin on my face?" He laughed some more and held his fist out to be bumped but the enthusiasm died right after he saw Nic wasn't listening or disgruntled from the picture of a girl sitting on his brother's face.
	"They allow a percentage of rats and bugs and hair in the wieners you digest, don't forget how abused the animal was."
	"Haha, anus-wieners?.sooo, what your trying to tell me, is, there aren't any Dog's in Hotdogs?" Drew popped a zit on his forehead.
	"No, what I'm telling you is, I'm hungry too. These ones are on me but next time you're buyin." He skipped away.
	"Oh," Drew forgot to check the Ethrapad. 
	"Alright!" A man with a black face mask leapt in front of the duo. "This is a stick up kiddie, gimme all your money!"
	"Yeah, yeah, uhh, buddie, don't flatter yourself, ok? Cuz, you ain't the first guy who tried to mug us, aight? Yeah, my best good bro and pal Nic over there fucked him up real good ya see. If you don't believe me, well, just look in this dumpster right behind us." Drew moved out of the way, revealing a horrible angle of an almost ragdoll leg jutting out of the rim of a trash can. He grinned and nodded like a street tough from New York, even though New York is Pussyville when compared to a city like San Tropez. 
Nic came back holding two hotdog clusters and suckling down on a third. The masked thug took off in fear laced panic and was hit then smashed, run over by a truck carrying the world's largest trampoline. "Holy Pi, that guy's totally dead now. I've killed maybe four and a half men by now?And how many more tonight?"
	"Not as many as me bro."
	"Really? How many were in the church?"
	"Too many to count, if Bag-Head were there, he would have said close to 400."
	"My Pi."
	"Our Pi."
	"Holy shit!" the truck driver flung out of his door with a terrified pale complexion on his face. His gut pooped out the bottom of his coffee and grease stained shirt. "I think he's dead! Jesus, call an ambulance." He winced away at the sight of the blood and dark goo. 
	"Hah, I don't think Jesus has a teleprobe man."
	"There's a dead man under my truck kid! Oh dear God, please, somebody help!"
	"Well I just don't think that's fair, he just tried to rob me and my friend here."
	"So you pushed him?!"
	"No way dude! He ran away after we showed him the body in the dumpster." Drew pointed back at the pile of garbage with an obscene display of humanity grimacing in the stupid eyes of the ugly long haired girl scout. 
The truck driver shrieked and got back into his semi and immediately switched the gear to drive as far away as possible from this Damien child, crushing the already dead body to a limp and frail piece of meat that wouldn't be overlooked if thrown into big hotdog brewing machine. 
	And it was fear that moved him?How important it was, how essential, for the truck to move only ten feet forward, because Zach would have splattered like a piece of soft pulpy fruit meeting an immoveable frozen object. 
But since the dazed-duo was able to freak out the truck driver guy, him and Carlton landed on the Trampoline, bouncing back up, arms entangled. But then, something, a push, a jolt, and explosion, sent them apart from each other; Zach into the arms of Drew, sharing a brief look of satisfaction before the buckle of his knees and collapse. 
Carlton landed tightly into the arms of Nic. He did not lot go; would not.
	"Carlton, so good of you to?. drop in!"
	3 more shitty puns were stated and The Three wheezed until tears were water-boarding the bottom of their throats. HAHAHAHHAHAHAHHAHAHAH

	"Zach! NOOO!" Pundara screamed helplessly, but couldn't bear to watch the courageous young boy who claimed loved her, plummet to his death. 
	"OHMYGODOHMYGODOHMYGODOHMYGOD!
	"No," she cried, salty discharges engulfing her gorgeousness. Why do the cute ones always jump out of really high buildings?
	"Oh jeeze, Dara, Dara! What do we do!" Kylia shrieked, she captured it all on the super-camera. 
	"Uh, I--um, go lock the door! Quick! Go, do it! Fucking hell--"
 	Kylia ran, tripped then made a funny stifled scream as she locked the door's five jumbo locks. "This won't hold them, they'll come for us anyway! We gotta bail!" Kylia ran over to Dara and put her arms over her neck, invertedly hugging her. She touched her hand and brought Kylia closer to her, feeling her embrace and warmth, noticing how innocent her touch was. She could smell she was a virgin somehow, and needed a clean pair of underwear. All of her senses seemed stronger? 
	When they grabbed the door, an alien set of hands stole them away from each other and into darkness.

	"Pi is only a drowning dream in the bold, rich sea of Deadsy, and Exeter's empire."
		-Excerpt from "Interview with a Grand- Pere"    

	The Three worked well together when they tried. They could make impossible decisions in a heartbeat, and that was all the time they had.
They chose A dilapidated abandoned building that used to be a olde worlde garage, where ugly beat up cars would transform into prettier beat up cars with half the scars: auto-mechanical salon. It smelled moldy and reeked of asbestos. Oil and sludge spots stained the floor nearly everywhere with random tools and loose screws left to rust with time's dust; blue and yellow. The sounds of faraway traffic skidding through dirty slush mixed with the lightly increasing parade.
	Carlton was strapped down to a chair, dozing painfully. Drew was leaning against a wall resting his eyelids behind him. Zach was smoking a cigarette in a chair, sitting AC Slater style. Nic was unseen somewheres, snickering a savage hyena laugh, heard almost as a reversed echo. 
Even Drew had lately been put off by Nic's uncontrollable personality, unable to predict where a stray conversation would casually veer to. Zach acted different as well, but Drew knew it was because of the girl. He didn't know how long they'd known each other, but knew Zach had it in deep for this girl. I would too.
	Zach remembered what Nic said about the orb of energy Carlton shot at the ceiling of the Cathedral and was waiting for him to produce one again, so he could justify stabbing his neck several times with a long rusted screwdriver. He sneered at the villain with repulsed odium. 
	Carlton spoke, "What makes you brats think Exeter's won't find me, the entire Deadsy army marching in here any second, at the discovery of my kidnapping?!"
	More cars blared though the slop of ice and sludge, spraying off a bridge. A helicopter churned its turbines repulsively. Several rush-hour traffic honks suggested some individuals were more important than others.
	"Hey Drew, you see anyone comin, outside?" Zach asked.
	His brother went outside for 19 seconds and came back. "There's nobody for miles, not even a wandering meth-head." He laughed, coughed, then spat making a sour face. "It's freezing out there."
	Zach met eyes with the venal Pope of the Sentimentality, "Why aren't they here now then, Padre? Huh? You can trust me, because I'm the honest one," Zach got out of his seat and pointed at himself, "No one knows your missing dude." He put out his cigarette on Carlton's boot.
	"Ha, the city's under confused havoc because no one's there to lead the flock."
	"Well, your right there. My brothers were mugged twice in 5 minutes at the same exact spot, just across the street from Deadsy tower. Interesting, no?" Drew grinned and nodded.
	"Your brothers? Ha, spare me kid, I bet they were egging people on, probably doing the mugging themselves. You've gotta put the food on the table somehow."
	Maniacal laughter again from a different room, or so it seemed.
	"Interesting indeed."
	Carlton's patience was receding. "So, you're going to beat information out of me, how cute. You think I perceive pain like you do?"
	"What's cute about it?"
	"It's cute you think you can hurt me, especially to the point of spilling vital information."
	"I didn't even think about that?Like what?"
	"Oh, I dunno, maybe something like Exeter can only be killed on Nott. How about that?"
	"Hah, that's cute that you thought we didn't know that already."
	Zach and Drew exchanged glances of supreme enlightenment as if they felt each other's dicks get bigger. It was kinda weird.
	"Oh no? What about your girlfriend, the Creature? No, you want to know what Exeter's next move is, because it's finally driven you to do something rash and stupid. Do you know how pathetic you all look because of this?" He struggled loudly in the chair, banging its legs hard on the garage floor.
	"Are you sure we're the ones looking pathetic?" Zach said, coolly lighting a new refreshing cig. 
	"Yeah, you're strapped to a chair man." Drew chimed in.
	"Of course, my mind might have slipped when I saw those luscious gams that held your lady upright?oh sweet lord, that ass!" Carlton's words felt like noxious poison in their ears.
	"I don't think you should talk like that." Zach said throwing the butt of his cigarette at the man strapped to the chair.
	"Makes me sick! A man of the cloth, a prevert. Fuck!" Drew spit and it landed on the back on Carlton's head.
	"He's no perve, just a fuckin masochist."
	"Ha, don't be so quick to judge, murderer, liar."
	"Hey Zach! Show this guy a fuckin mirror!"
	Carlton smiled. "But murder is not evil?To you it is? that's why you're goin, koo-koo." He whistled sardonically, bubbling out a laugh.
	"You've said Murder is an abomination in your lectures?You're nothing but a phony bologna!"
	"What did you call me?" Carlton didn't know what bologna was.
	"You heard me?" Drew whispered and licked the inside of Megaladon's ear. Strangely, it did not faze him whatsoever. He burped and turned to a bluish Slurpee that tasted like berry icebergs.
	"Listen, this guilt trip thing isn't working, hah, the only thing it'Fuck!s me fuckinHe hadnen."gghale somehow.o.different as well. impossible decisions in a heartbeat, and that was all the time ts doing is making all of you, go a little more crazier, heheh. Shouldn't you be worrying about those girlies in my Penthouse?"
	Zach thought about this, "Where'd you get that slurpy?" He licked his lips and smiled at Drew.
	"At the hotdog-cluster stand?sorry, its gone."
	"Oh." He looked back down on the ground and stomped his shoes as if a double kick drum pedal rest beneath his feet. It was erratic and choppy. He saw back up at his enemy with an unsatisfied face. "What were we talking about?"
	"You stupid little shits, are you even aware that your friends are now dead and rotting in a closet somewhere."
	"I think you're worried they aren't. Worried Papa X might be a wittle mad at wun of his wittle pup pups made a doo doo."
	Carlton finally made a very sour dissatisfied face, more angry than scared.
	"Want a drink?" Drew offered Carlton who fuddled in his prisoner's seat.
	"I thought you said it was out!?" Zach grabbed Drew.
	"Yeah, I mean, the majority is gone, but you might be able to get a couple of good slurps before it's completely gone."
	"Nah, I want the whole thing. Is that hotdog place around here?"
	"Yeah, couple blocks east I think. Here, I'll go with ya." 
And like that, they was gone.
	Carlton attempted to move but found himself unable to budge. "Fuckin twerp knows how to tie his knots." He wobbled up and down, slowly dragging his way towards the door when he heard scurrying behind him. He turned his head but only caught a dark shape move like an ape in and out of shadow at the corner of his peripheral. "Who's there?" He shouted. He couldn't remember if the third was actually with them or had tried back into Deadsy Tower. 
	The cold winter wind ricket the windows as if they were angry. The light bulb above his head flickered several times until it nearly diminished all light except for an eerily soft glow. He thought he saw a doll's eyes glittering across from him and rested his back against the chair, as if it were an escape route, when the back of his head bumped into something. It made him shriek in adolescent terror.
	"Sshhh," a voice said or sounded-who cares at this point.
	"What? Who's there?"
	"I am the who and you are the what and Pi is the why, but we are the is."  
	"Ha! So we meet again, LT! You're still alive? Exeter was right about you, he always is. Alec Pure and I made a bet on who would get to kill you?"
	"Oh?" Nic tightened his fingers in Carlton's hair.
	"Dr. Nner even mentions a time he believes you thwarted a brainwashing lecture at St Tropez U? I must thank you for that though; he calls me all the time and leaves these awful messages about nothing in particular; 'Hey Carlton, I'm down at the lab, it's so boring down here, blah blah blah, I love you so much, why don't you ever call me back?' He's a very lonely person."
	"Aren't we all?" He licked his fingers covered in Hotdog-cluster.
	"Poppycock, you're essentially never alone, unless you live on the Moon or Antarctica."
	"That's not what I meant?"
	"I know exactly what you meant, and I know how alone you are. I will kill all--"
	"Ha, and I know exactly how alone you are." Nic moved face to face with Megladon and flicked a scabby booger. "See this smile? It's the smile of a happy boy."
	"You can't do anything to harm me you little swamp cum!"
	"You admire the sound of your voice too much-- too much---too much."
	Megaladon struggled in his chair, huffing and puffing. 
 	"But ya know what I want to know?" He paused and opened a package of cotton balls. "Huh? Do ya?"
	"I know you will die young one. I know you will die a worthless death after witnessing all of your friends fall before you. Nothing poetic about it. No violins playing while you bleed out."
	"But will you be dead before I am?"
	Carlton said nothing but showed an evil curvy grin.
	"Then my death is not worthless. Eat up." Nic shoved a hand full of the white poofy cotton balls down his throat. Carlton gagged as he shoveled more and more in until he was forced to swallow a mouthful.
	"Ehh, what the hell are you doing kid?" Megladon wavered in his chair gagging on the balls.
	"Preserving you." He said before shoving more in. He opened another bag.
	"Wha---ahhhh---whhhaaaaa----tttt---ttt!!??"
	"I can't have a perfectly evil body and let it spoil? We really don't have any use for you now, but we think you will have some value later."
	"What the fuck are you talking about you fucking retard? Where did you get this retarded idea from?"
	"I saw it in a movie." More cotton balls going down his throat, shoving his hand all the way down his throat past his elbow. It almost got stuck on the way out. "Jeeze, these aren't going down easy, I need some oral lubricant."
	"No! stay the fuck away from me, don't put anything in my mouth you imbecile!" He tried to break free but found himself getting tighter in the ropes.
	"Fine." Nic picked up a water balloon filled up with gasoline and threw it at Carlton Megaladon. It blew up all over his face. He knew what it was right when it hit him.
	"Holy fucking shit! HELP! SOMEBODY HELP!"
	Nic extremely liked this. "Hehe---I'll help! What do you need help with? Mmmm, And you know what's funny, that helpless sound in your voice, tis quite intoxicating." Then he surprised himself as he frenched Carlton, It's not as good as Kylia, or Dara. "You taste like gasoline and moth balls...how did you get their tiny legs apart?" He laughed sarcastically but wanted to pry the jaw off the bastard so much he could barely even smile at the wonderful timing of his joke. 
	The pope of Sentimentality lurched from side to side in his bindings, convulsing, sweating, eyes in the back of their sockets. Nic poked him a few times and he didn't really respond, and decided this was a good time to bury him.
	Nic dragged the chair down into a cellar, down into a hole that he dug and began to throw dirt on Carlton who was coming in and out of consciousness from the cotton ball sickness. Nic felt a growing strength within him, changing his body to something else?
	
		
	Yes, Pundara and Kylia were scared shitless when the hands grabbed them from behind a hidden door and were shoved unapologetically into the dark. But they'd be able to shit again after knowing it was the one and only Josh Turkey holding their shoulders.
	"Goddamnit Josh, you trying to give me a heart attack?" Dara grabbed his coat and shoved herself with more strength than she intended and could smell what he had for dinner last night. She was feeling flush and lightheaded, but fiery. 
	"We have to stick to the plan- its ok- I mean, the only thing different is we won't be leaving with Zach." Josh said almost frightened of what she would do next. 
	"Yeah, but we're leaving with nothing!" She nearly screamed, would have done so if she thought it was safe.
	"Whoa--whoa now," Kylia was taking her costume off and put on her glasses, "Carlton and Zach just fell down a mile, people had to see that shit!" 
	"It's been 20 some minutes since that happened?.I barely even heard it actually?"
	"Where'd you run off to?" Kylia was attempting to communicate with Drew on the camera
	"I ran around the rest of the floor, well, didn't run, but tried to tally all the Deadsy employees on this level? there were none?and really... If we high tail it? I don't see why we couldn't just walk right out the front door!" 
	"What--?" Dara said disgruntly worried. A strange boy swore he'd protect her jumped out a window in an attempt to save her life, now dead. The boy just confessed love to her. She doubted he knew what love was, considering maybe she didn't fully understand love either. Love isn't meant to be understood, it's too many things at once to comprehend, it simply just is, and Pi goes on forever, yada yada yada
	"But we're never going to get another chance like this again?" Josh continued to think out loud.
	"Where the bloody dick are we anyway?" Kylia said who was immediately slapped across the mouth by Pundara.
	"Who the hell says that?! Where do you learn such foul tastes?"
	"Some type of closet."
	"What?!" 
	"No, I mean, we're in some type of closet. Here, here's a light switch."
	When the lights struck on, a bleak blinding light-wave of lucent agonizing horror overwhelmed their vision in a flash of unforeseen energy. They were convinced they saw 1000 men hanging by their necks in the closest, dead bodies stacked on top of the other, all wearing the ceremonial cloaks of a Sentimental Priest. Their eye sockets bloodblack and swollen.
	Embracing each other as if coping with the fear, they came together and nearly accepted death, a feeling they found you never get used to. As their eyes adjusted to the piercing glow, they realized what they saw was an awful hallucination. Dara's nails were digging into Kylia's shoulders like a woman giving birth. Josh touched one and went through more of the wardrobe.
	"I bet I can fit into one of these, I mean, I'm not as ripped as him, but I could just drape one of these robes over my suit, and paint my face, I might be able to pass as Carlton..."
	"Are you fucking kidding me? Please, please, please, Josh, seriously, you don't look anything like Megladon." Dara said shaking her head.
	"But if I had face paint, you could paint my face, you're good with makeup?"
	"What the hell? Ok, let's say that your face was painted, and you had a robe on, what the hell are you going to do then?"
	"I--uhh, I might be able or granted access to the lab in the basement?That's where Nner is? He's an old frail man? They web says he's not as sharp as he used to be? I'm not scared of him?" He thought. "But? I am scared of Deadsy."
	"Josh," Kylia stepped in front of him with the most serious look her face could produce, "Charlie deciphered several abnormal encodes that revolved around the word 'Creature,' somewhere in triple-binary. Every time that word appears, another word, usually different every time, synonymous with death is revealed. There's definitely something bad down there. They've gotta horrible secret, and its plot is to kill a lot of fucking people."
	"The Parade?"
	All of the sudden, a phone rang once, followed by a silly robotic recording, "Mr. Carlton-- Dr. Nner requests video chat--shall I intercept holo-screen?" it rang again and rang again and was followed by the same message.
	"Josh, don't answer it!" Dara said, overwrought with uneasiness.
	"No Josh, you have to, or else they might come up here!" Kylia said.
	"Ok ok." He ran toward the bathroom, turned on the shower and gave Kylia a thumbs up, and in the middle of the message, he received "Greetings!" he yelled from the bathroom. Pundara and Kylia jumped behind the couch for cover from the screen.
	"Carlton?! Heheh Did I catch ya at a bad time?" the Doctor smiled and his face came closer to the camera, engulfing the entire halo-screen, his nose projected to be twice as large.
	"Yeah, just trying to get ready for the big night!" Josh yelled from the bathroom.
	"Oh yes, everyone down here is galvanized for this evening's festivities? but excuse me, Monsignor, well, I just got a text from my security monitor saying there's a broken window in your penthouse?" He scratched the back of his wily gray hair.
	"Yes, Yes, doctor, there is, but, um, there's no reason to raise alarm, I bit, uh, my tongue, and was in such- tremendous pain, that, that I threw my amplifier out the window." Pundara slapped her face. Kylia gave him thumbs up and a smile. Josh nodded and returned the thumbs up with a cocky satisfied grin.
	"Haha, menstrual urethra Carlton, you and Alec are always trying to impress Exeter with bad-boy antics.You know he doesn't care about such nonsense!" He slapped his knee and started to floss.
	"Yes, uhm, I know, I was just angry, that's all. You know, the view isn't all that bad?"
	"Careful you don't fall out that fucker. 100 stories up? Yikes. If you fell you'd become instant liquid, unless you fell on the world's largest trampoline or something, but the chances of that are so slim, I'd put my whole cerebral cortex on it."
	"Haha, yes?" He rubbed the budding steam off his face.
	"Yes, well, how ya doin?"
	"What?"
	"How ya doin? How's it going?"
	"How am I doing? Well, I'm good, thanks. How are you?"
	"Exeter's got sand in his vagina. Every time there's a new beholder of Pi. I wish it was like the old days. Those were some crazy times?"
	"You are correct?" Josh couldn't keep this up. He was feeling sick, and like his head was separated from the rest of his body.
	"Hah, while I was cloning the long haired lad's Pi samples, Exeter blew up my brain then put it back together, but I think there's a piece missing, because now I have Prosopagnosia."
	"Really?" Josh pointed into the intercom, trying to say did you hear what he just said?
	"That boy was a disgusting specimen, just the filthiest human I've ever come in contact with. Ya know, Exeter told me to keep a look out for them. He said he thought they'd try something during the oceanic tournament. I've been keeping my eyes open though. Ha, ya know how I said I've been forgetting faces?"
	"Yeah?" Josh didn't want to listen anymore but wondered how long he would have too. Shit, this is worse than talking to Mother on the phone.  
	I heard that young man!
	Sorry Mother, but its true.
	All I asked for was a call a week!
	We lived together! I can't talk now anyway--
	"Well, I'll never forget that little bastard's face, never. I actually saw that little dog orgasm as he was torturing to death two of our 3 star guards."
	"Oh my god!"
	"Haha? god? So whatcha doin? You wanna get some lunch?"
	"Uhh--" He closed his eyes and tried to think. "Yes, I'm getting hungry, let me come down to the lab, I wanted to discuss the Creature."
	"Creature? What's there to discuss about her?" Dr. Nner looked confused, sniffing the air for treachery.
	"Uhh, Exeter gave me specific instructions; I need to discuss Creature with you."
	"Interesting?Ok? I'll be down here in my office, I'll send you a shuttle escort."
	"Thank you Doctor, I'll be down shortly."
	"Goodbye Carlton!" a noise clicked off and the screen disappeared in midair.
	"Josh, what the hell?" Dara ran up to him and pushed him into the mirror, breaking it and sending shards of glassy mist sprinkling into the air.
	"Give me the camera--" he lifted up a defeated hand. "I'm going to send a live feed of whatever is down there to Charlie. Is he synced up?"
	"I don't like this," Dara shook her head. She was sweating head to toe, dizzily.
	"He's ready and waiting. But you're gotta wait until that blue bar is full," she pointed, "I already sent him everything I captured. Press the red button and Charlie will do the full override. Every TV, pad, probe, screen or monitor will play our story, if it's on or not. But if I oversee someone about to track him, I'll have to shut off the feed."
"Here, this should get you to my mom's place." He handed them 20 dollars. "Take my keys and my FU receiver card too and here's my teleprobe just press analyze gogo shift F7 while in limbo mode and it will send the Pi-pulse...hopefully?Wait---take this digital syntax tracker?oh yes you're gonna need my plasma battery?ok here take this too, I just got it but I wanna see if it works, it's a nanopulse regulator that should improve the clarity, but you have to plug it in before the hosmitrobumagatrinator, not after!"
	"Sweet!" Kylia said staring at the piece of plastic that was a piece of golden silver to her. Dara threw up from the sounds of the futuristic technology references.
	"Hurry, tell the secretary Carlton and I are going to be awhile yet."
	"Alright, I'll do it, come on Dara, let's make this shit happen." Kylia comically grabbed all the shit and tried to make it for the door.
	"Josh, please don't do this, something really bad is going to happen, don't ask me why or how I feel this way, because--because-- I'm gonna blow chunks-" she convulsed, slamming her knees, spewing blood onto the perfect white carpet.
	"Oh no," Kylia whispered remembering countless terrifying nights awake with Drew.
	"Oh my god!" Josh held a hand over his face. "Dara, what the hell's going on?"
	"We need to leave," Kylia said for her, "Come here, just lean on me, ok?" She got her up and did what she said, but was too big for Kylia and timbered over on top of her. She didn't want to push her off because she liked the smell of her hair in her face, but had to. "Sorry, do you think you'll be able to make it out of here?"
	"Yes," She said like a drunk high school chick who would be dropped off by some random dude on her doorstep and hope for the best that her parents aren't waiting up in the living room with a shotgun.
	She wiped the blood on her lips. "We gotta move fast, so try to hold in your spew until we get outside. Ok?" Dara nodded and then inflated her cheeks as another gooshy wad of salty warmth filled her mouth. She swallowed it and instantly grew pale.	"Josh, good luck."
	"Go! GO! Be careful--don't stop for anything!"
	"Don't worry Josh, you can count on us girls!"
	They succeeded to make out of Deadsy Tower safely. Kylia waved for a cab and got nothing but when Dara managed to show some leg, four pulled over right away. "169nd and Center, and you can keep whatever is left of this," she threw a 20 dollar bill at the driver. The driver laughed. Dara flashed her knockers and were instantly invited in. 
The driver sped off gratuitously. 

	"Where the hell's Carlton?" Zach's breath was visible and his cheeks were rose red.
	"He was just here a second ago, or whenever we left him!" Drew was shivering with his arms crossed. Some of his long hair was sticking up from static.
	"I buried the bastard." Nic came up covered in dirt, his shirt was off. "Can I have a drink of that slurpy?"
	"No, well, I mean, it's all gone now."
	"Damn, I got real bad cotton-mouth."
		"So?"
	"We should've heard from them by now?"
	"Well?if they stick to the plan, they should already be on the way to Wahoo."
	"And if they're dead on account of us?" 
Zach lit up a cigarette. "We can't assume. We have to stick to our side of the plan, stay together, we have to believe." 
	Then Drew remembered the ethrapad was in his skirt pocket. "Wait, there's a message from Ky," he read it and revealed a disturbed face, "D n I headed to Js moms place- J is meeting dr nner"
	"What?"
	"That was not in the plan?" 
	"He's goin for it man. Holy Holy Holy."
	"We have to be there for him."
	The Three nodded.
	
	Josh camouflaged his face with black greasy shoe polish. This is going to work. I believe it. I'll die trying, but then they'll all know.
	If it doesn't all work out, we can be together! It's a win-win Joshy!
	Yes?wonderful-- mother
	Only people who were brainwashed or missing part of their brain would buy this disguise.	It stung his eyes. Its aroma gave off a cheap buzz. He drank a glass of water. It tasted like soap.
	He took the shuttle escort without thinking about what Deadsy would do to him if they discovered him. He figured this was for the better.
	His heartbeat over amplified his mother's warnings. His lungs pumping oxygen in and out of him as if it were a machine programmed to do such type of work. 
	"Carlton!" Dr. Nner came unannounced as the shuttle opened like a ghost, catching Josh off guard, nearly jumping out of his skin. "I was about to come up to your place, I was beginning to think you were going to ditch me, haha!"
	"Oh, of course not, uhh, doctor, I just, uhh, had, to, uhh, take a dump?"
	The demented doctor began to laugh like a spoiled idiot. "Come on in, coffee?"
	"Yes pluze, I mean, yes please."
	"Haha, damn Carlton, you're on fire today! HAHA- So what're you thinking for lunch?Chinese? Pizza? Indian? Burgers? You name it, I'm hungrier than one of those dying aborigines in the commercials?." Dr. Nner thought Carlton would find this funny.
	"Uhh, I think Chinese sounds adequate." Josh tried to seem normal as possible.
	"Ok," he pressed a button on an intercom, "?JANETTE!!! YES, ORDER ONE OF EVERYTHING OFF OF TONG TANG FUFURU!!! WHAT?! NO, THAT WILL BE IT, THANK YOU!!! Sorry for the yelling, my secretary is going deaf, I'll have to make a new one? but I guess it means we don't have to worry if anybody hears us, because no one can! HAHA!"
	"Yes, haha." He glanced at a few assorted documents spattered across his blue desk, then throwing an eye behind the glass to see hundreds of people in lab coats slaving away like ants.
	They sat down.
	"So, what's was this, this, this order? With Creature? What was Exeter's exact command? Aren't you busy enough as it is?" He put his hands behind his balding head.
	"What did he want done?" Josh blinked his eyes, the shoe polish was stinging them terribly.
	"Yes-" the doctor picked his nose.
	"Yes?"
	"I know he's been meditating a lot lately, and something grand always spawns from where ever he goes; our God. A miracle to existence and an abomination to death." He quoted a Deadsy motivational poster behind him.
	"Huh? Oh, yes, genius and savior, yes. But, Ya know, doc, it's the damnedest thing?.. I forgot what it was he wanted me to do exactly ?" Josh squeezed out fake giggles, His armpits were damp. 
	"Oh?" Dr Nner asked suspiciously.
	"Uhh Yes, I've been rather stressed lately, so perhaps a walk around the lab would jostle my memory."
	"Hell Carlton, if you want to see what the chef's been cooking, why the hell don't you barge into the kitchen!" He was a thieving mad scientist proud of his work. He made several poking gestures at Josh to entice the mind even further. "Of course, I can't take you to moon base alpha...that's where the real work goes down, if you catch my drift." He winked.
	"The moon?right?tell me doctor, would it be under your advice to 'release' the, uhm, she-creature?"
	"I don't follow?" he checked his Brainwave-echibitor-synced watch. It clicked and beeped and had many other convenient functions. "My orders were to have Creature ready for sunset?as usual? But I'm not sure if she was given a full dosage, because according to her visits to Nott, she hasn't been turning over to her other self. As with my Horrible Secret, it is to go as planned," he checked his watch again, then smiled, "Wow, I'm actually excited. I can't begin to think what you're going through right now!" Dr. Nner handed him some coffee.
	Josh was frozen, but managed to say, "Nott?.right?.other self?..right?Will, uh, any of this, Creature Horrible Secret Business (CHSB), will it be a problem?"
	"For her, yes. Based on all my tests on the prisoners from the Lowery bombing, she will probably die after she peaks, climaxes." 
	The Doctor led Josh around the lab until they came to what appeared to be a concrete wall. All of the experiments were rather dull, lackluster of what he expected: bubbling blue liquid, fizzing green smoke, stillborn alien fetus' inside discolored cylinders, stacks and stacks of papers from statistical polyphysenomics, dissected triceratops, organically grown orifices and genitals, black hole generator, flame thrower handkerchief testing -- "So Carlton, do you wanna see em?" Josh also noticed a dead person being autopsied. The person, at second glance however, didn't exactly look like a person at all?. 
	"Uhm?See who?" He stared at the humanoid with its chest open and missing insides, trying to figure out why it seemed so strange to him.
	"The cells?." 
	Before Josh could say oh my Pi, the wall sucked itself into the ceiling. And under it was a glass shield, exposing what seemed for miles of giant cages, prison cells, encasing an army of Horrible Secrets, covered in slimy dark alligator scales, eyes glowing an electric green color. Their backs were swollen with their forearms and thighs, almost like a crossbreed electric-gorilla-iguana-fish, but most of them had very humanistic features from their past facial structures. 
	They motioned towards the glass and put their mutated hands and faces up, throwing a wad of something dark green and steaming, slathering a thick muddy goop of slime across where Josh was staring, using all of his might and courage to not show he was truly a normal human being. He wanted to throw up or cry but before he could even think about it, he heard his name being called over the intercom. 
Well, not his name, but the name of the man he was impostering. It was wishing him good luck during his speech in front of the Tropites. Everyone turned to him and started clapping, whistling and singing his praises. Josh's face resembled a young child seeing a transvestite for the first time. Speech? Fucking shit. The speech, for the Sentimentalite Adoration?The speech that will be televised to four billion people?it's a dream come true.
	Son, it's what you were born to do.
 
	The parade commenced like water rising to a levee, ready to break over the edge, ensuing the deluded mania. 
	One million people packed together in the ever increasing coldness amongst confetti and alcohol; Dreams that came to life, unknowingly already broken. Free Calms handed to whoever's cup was empty. Hotdog-cluster eating contests. Kissing booths. Dunk-A-Hunk's. Spin the wheels. Piercing stations. Facial mangling therapy. Torture an animal. Ring a Ding. Who knows what that means. Paint a cock/cunt. Firearm testing and trading. Caricature drawings. Mascots dancing around mimicking a lewd imitation of the Three; passersby teasing and ganging up on them when their backs were turned. The children loved it! Throwing rocks and clusters of dogs, as did anyone who saw it. 
People were singing and stumbling around nowhere in particular. 
	Zach stabbed the stick of his teleprobe into his ear in hopes of autochatting with Dara, to ensure rendezvous worthy of a romantic novel. 
	"We're sorry. all signals are down, please attend the Adoration. Dream of yesteryear."   
	He ripped it out his ear and threw it on the ground then stomped on it until it was smaller than dust. He was more scared than ever. 
	Then the boys wanted to turn on each other. The cosmic lie. Fingers pointed at each other. Insulting names and titles. Fine china thrown against the walls. You-don't-know-me's and I'll-do-what-I-wants. Look at me in the eye. You can't change me. You are wrong. Heart rates an incomprehensible tempo. Perspiration and testosterone. Fighting and screaming, scratching and biting. Crying in the fetal position. After a few metaphorical black eyes and kicks to the balls, they settled down.
	There was a series of panicked curse words long enough to be considered epic. 
But after the unnerving distress subsided, they quieted and let their minds do the talking.
		
	"Paging Mr. Megaladon, Mr Megaladon, your limo has arrived."
	"Limo?" Josh said nervously, sitting with his legs crossed, biting his fingernails.
	"Oh shoot Carl?The Dead fest, you're on in like 30! Looks like we're not going to eat all that Chinese food after all. It's alright. I'll just throw it away. You can order some later." Dr. Nner hugged Carlton and patted him on the ass like a baseball coach would. "Good luck on your speech!"
	"Yes, my speech," he said to himself and began to let his mind do the talking. 

	Music played to smiles unsure of why they existed. Cameras snapped blipits for an unnecessary oversaturated time capsule. The TV monitors that hung high towards the crowd strictly for the promotion of slow thoughts, showed an empty podium where Josh would speak. The sardine-tight crowd inched their way closer to the stage in sublime anticipation. Ferris Wheels, skee-ball, square-dancing, ice-skating, prizes, cotton candy, the smell of fried dough, cardboard shrapnel and sawdust over the places where kids and adults puked from overt gratification. 
	People cried and spoke in tongues claiming the spirit overtook them. "Praise Deadsy! Long Live the Church of Sentamentality! Evu lina da Tihler la Ventemeant!" Children were getting baptized. Girls were getting tattoo's above their butt cracks with their mothers. A group of men were brutally whipping and lashing themselves with other acts of self-mutilation, pointing to where they thought heaven to be. "EXETER HAS MADE ME INVINCIBLE!"
	All of the sheep gathered in the downtown of San Tropez while the Shepherd went to gratify himself in a faraway pasture. Winning the international surfing competition, on the best waves the earth has ever seen.
	"I can't see over these people," Drew tugged on the back of Zach's jacket.
	"People take up too much space."
	"Yup."
	"They hardly notice each other, engageless."
	Zach lit up a cigarette and he passed it around to his brothers, they could barely stand.
	"So this is it huh?"
	"Yeah, looks like it."
	"Pi will protect us as much as it can." Nic lectured piously. "I gave Charlie all my works and findings?its 314 pages?exactly. If Kylia or whoever reads that, will truly know Pi."
	"That makes me feel good." Drew nodded, shivering, but not particularly bothered by it.
	"I tried to change earlier at the Tower and couldn't." Zach said, the only one of his brothers that could see over the crowd. The amount of people left him aghast, helpless.
	"That's no good." Drew rubbed his frozen face. It was cold red. Big flakes of snow fell peacefully. 
	"No its not?it's horrible. But I don't wanna think about it right now?Nic," the brothers met eye to eye, "get back inside the Tower, track Josh or the girls. I'll head towards the stage? Drew, I need a distraction?" 
	"What the hell's gonna be at the stage? We have Megladon covered in dirt."
	Zach blinked several times and almost tripped. 
	It's Josh!
	Josh? Who are you? Why are you in my Head??? 
	A moment designated for pondering and any other last second debate or words were traded.
	"It's all we can do?"
	"It's an idea?with the Power of Pi it may be all that we need." Zach viewed his brothers, shuddering away at the thought this might be the last time they'd ever see each other. 
People die. Innocent people. Good, obedient, well-disciplined soldiers die. The ones you don't want to depart from this world are sometimes the first to go, the ones you love the most. "Find Pi, for Josh and Kylia," Drew said. Nic saw static disappearing into the crowd and thought of his brother's words gravely. 
Zach said something to himself briefly but the others did not hear. The wind blew cold and the Three parted. 
	
	Things got much worse when the girls arrived at Josh's mother's apartment. 
Dr. Nner clicked his watch. The silver hologram beeped and smiled. 
Pundara on the other hand, did not.
	"Kylia," Dara fiercely clawed her chest, then her scalp, scratching her skin, leaving thin red trails of blood wherever she touched her body. 
She was covered head to toe in round beads of cold hard sweat, but she felt her skin was afire. "sssumthings wrong-- with me?.. it's getting worse--its getting much worse?" Large gobs of cold discolored foam shot out her mouth, and a black serpentine vain trickled from the top of her head down and up her flesh. Her eyes went to the back of her head. She kicked over a computer and screamed low. 
	Kylia wrapped her coat around her, completely unaware of the horror taking place.
	"NOOOO! OH MY GOD NOOOOO!!!! AHH!!" Her head was pusling.
	"Uhh maybe you should induce vomiting?" She cupped her hands under Pundara's mouth. Pundara punched her hard through a wall.
	Dara panted, her head nodding, swooning if she was listening to ethereal tribal music. Her soft skin was very pale. She seemed to be lactating oily slime; foaming at the edges of her mouth. Kylia perceived her as going into shock. The lower half of Dara was vibrating, hauntingly. Her stomach was, growing.
	"Eww?!" All of her clothes were drenched damp but she ripped them off like moist toilet paper.
	"I'm fre-freezing and boiling at the same time." Her teeth clattered and thrummed. Kylia was trying to ignore the Dark vein pulsing across her face, almost swimming across her body, and the fact that Dara now looked two feet taller. The girl's arms and legs pulsated uncontrollably, like something trying to get out of her. Kylia grabbed Dara's hand but it did not feel like normal skin. Her whole body so pale in the light it looked green and gray. She resembled a patient who was just diagnosed with an extreme case of Parkinson's disease, and gigantism. She was moaning and grunting disturbingly in a lower voice. Strange goobers of blood and teeth slimed out her mouth in a bubbling liquid. Kylia wanted to run far away.
	"Lemme get you some water-" Kylia got up but was stopped by Dara's big and sharp nails clenching her forearm. Her nails were slimy with blood, growing raw and discolored, and cut straight through Kylia's soft skin.
	"No, Kylia, don't leave me--please-please--" Dara's normally soft soprano voice dropped even lower, breathing even more rapid, so rapid it emulated a train slowly gaining momentum until it was full speed and she was blowing steam out of her ears nose and mouth. She looked like a dried out vampire of the renaissance. Her teeth now small little nubs protruding sharply, slowly growing with an unstoppable pain. The wires of her braces were still in her mouth, holding onto nothing.
	She screamed and rushed over Kylia and demolished the kitched. Her frilled curly hair was matted down soaked against her head, moving on its own accord. Her forehead looked like there was something swimming inside it, trying to pop free. "my head--my head -it fucking hurts!" she stood up taller and wider than before. Her muscles were huge now, ripping out of their clothes. She was not only growing, but shape shifting; her mind and every other part of her. 
Her eyes were puffy and swelling and her jaw was lower and wider. She felt the magnetics of Earth's Pole's like another sense and created her own pulse-wave through its core like they were connected. It made her shiver. She could smell the bottom of the ocean and see flakes of rock on the moon.
	A dank aroma filled the room. Kylia had to cover her mouth and nose it was so rotten and intoxicating, crying and cringing uncontrollably. "Kylia, Kylia I can't see!" she was turning herself every which way but couldn't see Kylia who finally became petrified. Dara's musician fingers become scythe-like claws and her back was brooding into a hideous hump.
	Pundara's eyes glowed catlike neon yellow. Swimming inside the center of her forehead, was a new third eye emerging, beginning to open for the first time; the first sight of the Creature's existence. 
	She put her once tender hands to her once pretty face and realized it wasn't there. A new face was taking the place of hers. Her cheeks and jaw were starting to rip out of her skin. All her teeth grew in like a demented underworld leviathan that really needs braces. The nails she always kept so pretty and vivid slowly aged away and into sharp black weapons as every muscle and organ in her body shriveled and ultimately transformed into the monster Exeter destined for her to become. 
	She helplessly wailed, but it was her fate. The lower half of her body started to reconstruct itself. Her stomach grew and grew as if she were pregnant. The sexy legs which she stood on were crackling and contorting like boiling mush until they were all black and horrifying and protruding four other disgusting segments. Her body was completely lopsided now; her stomach not only grew in girth but in length to make room for her new insect appendages. The new monster's eye in the middle of her head saw all that ever was. It never blinked as her new legs violently grew out from her in painful convulsions and much to her horror she felt all of the knees of her new appendages pop and melt, extending themselves to something pure black and skinny with sharp dark hairs sprinkled about them, and she felt 3 other knees in each of her legs burst and create themselves. She was screaming as her Creature's vision sent the only interpretations she could not understand. Terrifying the Creature, afraid of our Earth, Pundara saw her enormous gut now, ready to burst. She screamed as she perceived all of the two jagged objects reach out from within her belly and extend outward until they fully formed into razor sharp gargantuan black pinchers sprouting tiny slick thick hairs, snapping and clamping, clapping outrageously, cutting through whatever was between their grasp. Something was also coming out of her back and she felt her spine and anus go with it and grow out of her body to balance her out, a curvy long tail with a giant ball of a jagged stinger on the end. It whipped about playfully almost, and while these new impossibly horrible sensations destroyed Pundara the enchantress, her emotions and feelings transformed to better suit her new advanced deadly body. She was the new queen of earth.
	There was no such thing as friend or enemy. Everything was hideous and inferior to her: humans the most disgusting and torturous; covering themselves with clothes to hide their shameful naked bodies, treating the most handsome boys and the girlies with natural beauty as if it was an accomplishment. WASTEFUL SWINE! UNGRATEFUL LOCUSTS! HUMANS ARE A DISEASE AND I AM THE CURE! I am the Mother to the new world!
	The velvety brown skin she once had was now slimy gray, black spotting all over her body. Her breasts were somehow perkier but poisonous and would turn you to stone if you gazed at the black-night nipples for too long. The curls disappeared from her hair and fell down straight black to go with her new brand of swank. She reached near fifteen feet and was growing still. She was hungry. She was horny. She was hungry. She was horny. She was raging and needed an outlet.
	Kylia fainted after seeing the gorgeous Pundara turn into a giant half scorpion half Medusa beast, even though there were no snakes dangling from her hair, it was the Medusa monster that came to mind first, because there would be no surprise if snakes had appeared in the place of her hair.
	Dara's last emotion as a human was lament. She knew she was going to kill all of her friends, wishing lastly she told Zach she loved him, because she had never said those words to anyone, and had never been told that by anyone. 
	The Pundara Monster jumped through a new hole in the wall she created with Kylia in her unforgiving grasp, and started fucking whoever saw her with dominating malevolence.

	Nic pitched over a Deadsy road-block, scraping his knees on the cold infested ice as he approached the looming Tower against the massive downtown crowd.
There was no way to slip by undetected. The Trenchcoats and Ravers were too many and he was too far away. Fat waste-spans. Too much cholesterol. 
He tried desperately engaging in conversation but they heard nothing. It gave him no hope whatsoever. The daze that overtook him was so ordinary now he couldn't physically feel. 
It was not a good feeling. 
He recognized the skyscrapers through the thick snow blowing. Oh shit?do I? 
Even the street lights and signs seemed ablurry. He attempted to ask a few people for help but the citizens were too immersed in brainwash they could only garble nonsensical gibberish to him in reply. 
When Suddenly;
An eldritch squirrel scurried over his foot. No one else noticed the creature. That was the weirdest squirrel I've even seen. It stood upright as cute as it could before descending into a sewer gutter. The opening was big enough for Nic to fit in. Time to take the U train.
	When he dropped himself into the shit-pit and emerged back to his feet, all was darker than shadow; his senses, his sense of reality, dark except for a faint but true red light. It was perched near the silhouette of an ugly tall underground tree.
I'm in-between what's real and what is not; Pi. Then Nic heard sound had disappeared as well. Is this Nott? He tried to say and think something else, but before the word reached his tongue, he heard a whistle. 
	It was short, but mellifluous beyond belief. Song-like, but invigorating. If Nic'd been hungry before, he wasn't now. It called again, waiting for answers. The rhythm was catchy, uplifting and softly harmonious. He smiled and tried to whistle it back.
	The bird laughed its bird laugh. But called again and this time Nic rose and whistled correctly the response. They exchanged their call several times until it became clear that it was the Phoenix waking him up. Its eyes glowed lucent the same yellow as the Blanketeer's cape, like a star. It quirked its head and Nic did the same. The bird took off on a flight and Nic followed on a run, jumping over the shoulders of sleeping hobos and on their shoulders as well, but so quickly he managed to not hurt anyone, skipping all the way through the city's underground labyrinth of concrete mazes, jumping over rivers in a single bound, doing cartwheels and backflips and Lion Tamer's, all the while in duet with song, accompanying the Phoenix. 
Nic followed the celestial bird on and on, down and down and jumping around, and finally up again. Nic was going to catch the bird, he was running so fast he was speeding across the water on his bare feet. He couldn't wait any longer, he must have the bird now. The Phoenix knew it was about to get caught, and Nic jumped right at it, and it went straight through him, into his bones, flesh, and soul. 
In a singular burst of rare light, the Phoenix was gone while reality restored itself.
Nic saw he was across a sewer junction from some night-club he'd never seen or heard of before. Sound returned as well; The magnanimous Phoenix called a different whistle, an answer to its own question: and though it was just a simple melody, it spoke to Nic indefinitely: You are the Lion Tamer.
	A pink, neon-light read Trenchies across the water. It smelled like a horrific place, where evil is the only champion. Nic was instinctively thrown into an inner rage; he could see the trauma and torture that had taken place over the past century, just by its smell.
The main entrance sign was designed in an off-putting fashion, above batwing doors. It resided on the other side of the sewer lake. 
Nic jumped into the water like an Olympian diving into the brown fecal sludge and kicked and maneuvered through the warm fluid like some prehistoric fish that was alive and well, yet to be discovered because of its illusiveness. He swam 30 meters in 3 seconds and was accelerating. Though his eyes were closed and ears full of water, he could sense the shape of his manmade surroundings like echolocation and sprouted from the depths of the hellish poopiness like a relentless Orca hunting beached sea lions, landing comfortably.
The off duty Trenchies were a little startled to see a kid all of the sudden pop out of poop river. This place wasn't easy to find, especially for drugged up ravers like this lost, wet little fellow. Nic saw inside, behind the batwing doors, not surprised to see a huge rave of incapacitating lights and sound rumbling like an off the chain partay. Everyone was somnolent in horny asphyxia with each other. Many STD's and pregnancies were consummated that night. There looked to be 1000 people in there. 
But these rolling Trenchies outside did not match those of the simple minded Hobbit ravers. They appeared to be hardcore gangbangers, wearing neck tattoos, gold jewelry, nice suits, and heavy machine guns. They started to stir with swagger towards Nic. They looked like blonde Yakuza with a few thugs from the Russian mafia but I forget their name because Nic was about to kick the shit out of them.
Nic flung off his flannel, wringing it out. He refastened his belt and rubbed the shit off his face and approached the macho sleazy tattooed Trenchies, step for step. "Is there a way to get to Deadsy Tower from here, cuz I'm a bit lost--" Nic pointed at a sign in the way far back of the bar that read 'To Deadsy Tower.' This only instigated the Trenchies to hysterical, drunk laughter. The gangster gentlemen revealed their bearing of arms, displaying a horrific truth about the black market under the toilet of every city in America.
Obviously-
Every hair on Nic's body stood on end as the fanatical, savvy instinct seized his being like a force field from your great grandmother. At the same instant, time slowed, but Nic could move quicker than ever. His rippling, muscled skin, felt ripe and indestructible. He jumped on the three Yakuzaish-suits lengthwise and toppled them over, rolling off of them like a cat, and side swept the Russian duo underneath their legs and flung them easily into the river of shit in a matter of second. Each passing second made his senses stronger and stronger and stronger and stronger and stronger.
When he kicked open the batwing doors with one of the Trenchies in a headlock, he knew Pi led him to the right place. Fear and lust was the only aroma. It stank most foul.
The architecture of the club inside arose near 10 stories, on one, overly large spiral staircase, seemingly to be the fundamental aesthetic and layout of the discotheque. Gambling, drugs, prostituting, lights, dancing and hypnotic clowns. Loud rave-music blared, deafeningly; its only purpose.
Luckily, most of the Trenchies were still wearing their Deadsy Trenchcoats. Easy prey. 
Nic could only react to his surroundings...
A group of bad guys started to gather throughout the upward spiraling path. 
Nic had become the Lion Tamer, though he truly didn't believe it; even as his instinct was beyond fearless and his bones were stronger than tungsten. His fingers flexed with anticipation and carnivore. His stride was that of the leader of a pack, immediately making eye contact with his next prey. A few innocent ravers and whores gawked at him blandly. The wiser ones backed away, nightmarishly in awe. Nic sniffed around one last time, calculating and deciphering though he know not how.
An arm took hold of his right shoulder. Nic instantly grabbed ahold of the Trenchcoat's hand and twisted it around, bone snapping disgustingly off and kicked the man's body through a giant statue of Exeter. The guy didn't get up. Most of them didn't.
Nic flew up the stairs with the impossible wind, Tropezians darting out of the way past him, sobering their calm. Three more thugs came at him shooting. Nic jumped down the railing only to attack another foot-solider straight on. Nic kicked a dickish prick in the stomach and the guy imploded in a gushy wad of excrement. The 3 pursuing him actually leapt down after him, but Nic simply moved out of the way and they fell hard, splattily on their faces, and did not get up.
Nic rushed on, quicker than before, leaping to the third floor in a single bound.                      	Unquenchable hunger returned. All he smelt was the foul stank of fear and lust. He growled horribly, spitting, charging with vicious fury, flinging fifteen more dumbasses off the side of the stair, yelling as they met their deaths. But these Deadsies didn't get the point that Nic would beat them like a stupid dead horse until he reached the entrance of Deadsy Tower.
People rushed down the stairhall zipping up their breeches and combing the come out of their pubes, tripping as they cowered away from the furious predatory gaze of the Lion Tamer. 
A crazed man came at him with a butcher knife pointed straight at the hero, but all Nic had to do was move two feet and grab the discombobulated attacker's other arm and slingshot him into a wall. The guy's arm came off. The Trenchie dripped down and sang the ABC's incorrectly.
Nic leapt high over another flight of stairs and landed a locomotive knee into the chest of a gunman at the top. Girls in bikinis screamed and ran by them. He pushed the impaled gunman out of his way, but the body flopped down the stairs like an oblong ball. He didn't get up either. S	Someone else tried to punch Nic, but he grabbed his fist and accidently ruined the guy's life. At least he was a Russian though, Commy Bastards!
Two more came from his blindsides carrying chainsaws, but since Nic somersaulted backwards, they drove their saws into one another, ripping everything out like a devasting X-mas dinner. It was a bloody mess and quite stupid, like two outfielders colliding, going after the same fly ball.
Another foe with a grenade launcher screamed and fired at the Lion Tamer, who let the explosion propel him towards the asshole with a gun, & by the throat, dragged him forward before realizing the guy's neck was a warm mushy pulp of dislodged larynx and esophagus.
Atop the next flight, two fat ravers emerged fucked out of their lumpy gourds, wearing navy blue Deadsy Trenchcoats, so Nic decided it was fair to punt them back into the room whence they came. They vaulted backwards like pathetically feeble frailness, not really knowing what was going on, they didn't get up either. 
More young people ran crying down the spiraling stairhall in a riot. Two extra Trenchies came blazing madly at Nic but he stuffed his fists in their faces which bled blue and red black as their noses and skull broke. They didn't get up either. 	
Someone shot a few blasts from behind Nic, which distracted him from the Trenchie who managed to whack him with a chair, breaking over his back. It was comical how little it fazed him. He stomped on the guy's foot and smashed a toe (his foot coming clean off) and Nic squeezed the guy's skin, holding him high above his head, and flung him down the long opening where Nic made his ascent. The guy crashed through an opium den; that's ten more points if you're still keeping score.
As Nic became the Lion Tamer, scaling the stairhall, he noticed a change in the wretched surroundings, and people. There were rows and rows of underage Amazonian sex slaves chained to the walls, hanging. How could he possibly uncover such filth all of a sudden, here at a brothel in the sewers?
For some reason Kylia's tortured face was all he could see. His unquenchable violence became absurd and involuntary. He stormed through a mass of Trenchcoats, bloodily running them down like shitty pancakes into the ground or slamming their faces through matter or just breaking their bones from frustrated contact. He reached the point where the mind is no longer in control of the body.
People of all races and creed flooded out the club in an anxious panic. Nic handed some naked girls auto-blasters he found and told them to stay put. What's with me and giving chicks guns? 
Hurdling from stair to stair as if they were lily-pads, he didn't even bother fighting the gangsters anymore. All he had to do was run into them and they bounced off or shattered into nasty bits and didn't get up. 
Storms of them came at him, pointlessly, like flies swarming to an electric chair. He swung and they splintered graphically vivid. Another leapt from behind and tried to choke him but Nic flipped the Trenchie hard, breaking his back and everything else, he didn't get up. 
Nic saw over to a heavily guarded door. Jackpot.
Two of the bigger guards roared and charged maniacally at him, one faster than the other. Nic started as well, immediately at full speed screaming relentlessly in their direction. He lowered his head and pointed the top of his skull at the chin of one guy then pounced into the air throwing all of his momentum through him. The big bulgy guy he impacted hit the ground hard as the Trenchcoat behind him caught Nic but found himself pinned to the stairs with Nic's fist coming straight down at his face, but didn't feel it crack as his head spliced in two.
One guy was shooting at Nic, but saw a group of sex slaves trying to escape and shot them instead.
That was the last straw. Deadsy had been crossing the line for far too long, and it was time for Nic to do the same. 
As the Trenchcoat loaded up to annihilate another round of slaves, Nic ravaged with inarticulate malicia and clawed at the arm of the gunman whose entire side ripped off clean. Nic flicked him in the nose and the guy went soaring off the railing and slapped the bottom like liquid exploding against a flat surface. He didn't get up.
Suddenly, Nic found himself seized at the shoulders. The ugliest, biggest man Nic had ever seen (besides the Lion Tamer) held him in a death grip. The brute of a Trenchcoat drove his noggin at Nic's face. But as the man slammed his face down on the teenager, he instantly found he was slicing a hole in his own face, as he sliced it across the boy he was holding. A thick dark gash jutted from the ugly sonofaDeadsy face as if he planked himself through a highly efficient wood slicer. The brutish brute quavered to his knees hauntingly in a macabric shuddering convulsion that seemed no human should perform. He didn't get up.
	
At the top of the hidden stairwell, Nic swung open the camouflaged door met by a pleasant Vernlyn Fergusen, informing him she was sorry, but they were closed. 
	Nic didn't have time to explain or investigate, and took the secretary's neck under his elbow, saying as calm and reasonable as he could, that if she didn't let him into the Lab she would die a cinematically dull death. She peed herself. A lot of it got on Nic.
	He dragged her some way down the hall until he was discovered by four security guards ready to get off work. 
They immediately shot their clumsy lasers at him and her without question or answer. 
	Dodging the shootout like a bad action movie star, Nic scampered to an ornate doorway designed with several Deadsy mythologies. He kicked it open pulling the wailing hostage with him. "Which way?" she pointed screaming to another set of doors down a different lucent stairwell. 
Nic decided to skip the steps, leaping and crashing at the bottom, dropping Vernlyn on the last step, breaking her ankle. Lasers kept up an impressive barrage but an unimpressive stint of accuracy, unless they were shooting at his hostage, who was hit three times in the leg in the exact same spot, amazingly. 
	"Where are the girls that were here earlier?" Nic yelled.
	Vernlyn Fergusen was moaning, staring at the wound in her demolished leg. Nic slapped her and repeated the question. She stared at him for a moment. "The girls? They left hours ago!" she screamed morosely.
	"You gotta be fuckin me?" More oncoming blasts from the guards blew open a wall at the bottom of the stairwell. Nic ran through the smoking opening with Vernlyn on his back. 
	
On the other side of the smoke was Dr. Nner's laboratory. It was dark save for a blue fluorescent humming wall. A disgustingly large amount of were people trapped behind it. 
"Holy shit!" he put the secretary aside, running close to the glass and tried to peer in. He pressed a bunch of switches and buttons near the door but it only made things worse. Then he saw something coming closer to him through the glass and he didn't know what to think.
	The Horrible Secret drooled at him and tilted their heads, brains washed with electromagicity and injected with Mutant Growth Hormone (MGH). 
	Nic didn't have to free them because the lunatic security guards were so trigger happy they disintegrated the encasement holding the Horrible Secret in. 
The repelling monsters jumped free, springing with abominable lizard-fish faces encased in hair, warts, scales and glossy orange bubbles on their bodies that would pop electric and their puss would sizzle and fizzle with whatever it came in contact with; especially the guards.
	"That is the worst smell ever." It reminded him of the hotdog-cluster he had consumed with Drew only a few hours ago. He practically tasted it.
	The mutants spotted Nic and enviously hungered for his scent, lurching. He turned to yell at Vernlyn to run for her fucking life, but the Horrible Secret had already taken her... He didn't want to believe his eyes, she had become one with it like a contagious cannibal plague. The foul stank of lust and fear.
	 Zach! Drew? Damnit! Can't anyone hear my fucking voice!?! 
	Nothing had ever looked so tasty to the Horrible Secret. Meat was good protein. And they could smell more, and the taste of warm skin and flesh made them optimistic. 
		
		<Is there anyone to hear me? The Power of Pi is Electric>

	Zach was near frantic, sweating and freezing at once. He could barely squeeze through, bumping into the manikin maze of people when the voice carefully spoke into the hue. It was the Blanketeer, and his voice was close, profound. Holy Pi on a stick. Drew where the hell are you? HELLOOO! CAN YOU HEAR ME? "Drewski!" he blared aloud, but no one was listening to him. No one noticed him. No one was paying attention. All of the citizens were asleep in the same dream that Exeter was the light and the Three were death. He clasped a man by the shoulders and shook him, slapped him, but the man just smiled as if Zach told him there was free chocolate in his pants. He thought about Dara and tried ever harder through the people fruitlessly.
	Then, Zach thought a banshee was being castrated: the sound of static wind screeching at terribly high frequencies burst into the air like a fire bomb, but quickly ascertained the sound was a shriek from the overhead speakers giving horribly loud feedback. To all of the citizens that were the sheep lead by the false shepherd heard it as pleasant clouds and daisies. It made them even happier. To them, Zach was a poor excuse for a young upcoming lad to represent San Tropez going into his manhood. 
	On every television screen, on every lamppost, every building flashing signals telling you to stay asleep and obey what the man commands.
Uproar from the crowd and a part in the curtains, followed by the biggest holoscreen Zach ever saw shot up in ubiquity; Carlton Megaladon walking to the podium confidently, The Deadsy and Sentimentality symbols locked as one. 
But then he was aware of another presence altogether.

His face was smothered in black shoe polish. The Sentimentality robes were baggy and sagged on him. He was lucky he didn't trip.
	Josh had never used note cards in his life and he wasn't going to start tonight, that's for fucking sure! He walked out onto the stage and waved, smiling briefly. The audience was louder than a million Pantera concerts. His mother's ghost was crying she was so happy for him. To Josh his people sounded in pain and looked the part; stinky and dead raccoon eyed drab, fat headed, unprepared for the cold, sick and depraved of sleep and nutrition.
	After several minutes of this, the people of San Tropez realized he wasn't waving to say hello, he was flagging down their attention, bringing them to a level of reason that probably wasn't going to be reached. It was time for his star to shine the brightest it could on the coldest day on Earth.
	Josh and his Mom felt the Power of Pi as well. When they finally quieted enough for him to make an audible sentence, he said
	"People of San Tropez, it is I, Carlton Megladon!" 
	Praise from all directions louder than before. Josh nearly recoiled from the deafening ovation. Men cried. Children grew up. Grandparents felt young again. Dogs loved Cats and the other way around. Fish jumped out of the water to breathe a second of oxygen. And all the pregnant women in the world gave birth at this moment if the fetus was ready for it or not. 

	A group of the Horrible Secrets chased Nic on a rampage, thirsty for his warm pink insides, close and getting closer. He jumped low over an obese water-pipe and his ankle trampled clean through it. One Horrible Secret pounced but Nic snapped its bulging leathery neck with uncanny instinct. It sent a tendril of electricity through Nic, but not large enough of a voltage to pain the hero. The monsters smelled like pickle juice. He didn't lose a step taking out a personal map he made of the sewers whilst in his pursuit for a better, different life. "NIC YOU ASSHOLE YOU DIDN'T MARK NORTH!" He was running blindly through the sewer completely lost. He was out of options. He ran up the nearest ladder.
	The power of Pi led him exactly to where he didn't want to be. 
	He was directly behind the stage. He saw the faces of the innocent people, they were the same that fell victim to the cathedral. 
	As the sobering vision crossed Nic's logic the Cosmic Lie and a Horrible Secret's crude and raw clutches seized Nic's neck. Its lumpy frog eyes changed color and the pupils within changed shape and contour. The leviathan screamed with a blue foot long tongue, flaring gills out the sides of its head, it sank its teeth like a knife going into warm ice-cream cake at the front of his throat. He felt the Horrible Secret in him too quickly?

	Josh had no plan or idea of what he was going to say to his fellow brainwashed people. But he nodded and nodded and held a fake smile and saw he couldn't procrastinate any longer, the crowd awaited his words. Without further ado, Josh improvised quick as his neurons would function, and spoke so without stutter:
	 "Thank you?. Thank you?.All of you?Akhem?Let us bow our heads in prayer?Dear God?.?..Although tis a night we remember and celebrate all tis Dead?we gather here for a greater purpose? A purpose most cannot understand, and perhaps, never will. A purpose in, the most cosmic perspective. The greatest purpose--- True Beauty, laughter, music, love, makes our Lives possible, whole and worthwhile----- Questions that can never be answered or have no real or imaginary answer --Truths to knowledge that cannot be perceived until the end of our time-- 
	"Those that cannot answer those stubborn questions? are here to live?We are here to comfort those living with us when they believe nothing else can help or save them. We that cannot answer the impossible questions, will leave the burden to the few desperate heroes that can." Josh didn't like where he was going, and changed perspective; a different key.
	"Even if you do not understand your neighbor, will you not unlock your door to share with them your cup of overflowing? ---Would thee not foster your brother's orphaned child if he lay sick and dying?"
	Josh took a breath, the shoe polish beginning to go into his eyes. The crowd listened, but only as if they were displayed with a complex quantum physics equation; they understood the logic in theory but not the equation itself.
	"This city has been through a lot of turmoil and tragedy in just one year?and what will the next years bring?-We cannot change a world stuck in the same virtues that lead us to disaster and collapse---" He didn't have any other words left.
 	"You've been told we're building a bigger and brighter future for many generations to come?But you've been lied to?all of you-- The very people you put your trust into have been taking advantage and have been killing you: The Flood, The Fire, and the Fear of the Three?.. The great Lie!
	"You must come out of the light, and see what is around you. Take a step out of the light so you are blinded no more. Exit the light and come to me. 
	"I, Carlton Megaladon---I am telling you this because the truth must be revealed?.and all of the merciless violence to end."
	Josh should've chosen different words for his last sentence, because it was such a nice speech before that, but more importantly, it was hardcore violence that broke out. Not between citizens but between the Horrible Secret and humans. 
	They came from behind the stage and laid everything in their path to waste. The first few rows of Tropites nearest the stage were slain where they sat in vomitus pools of blood. The immaculate stage that Josh stood upon imploded from the chaos. An overhanging chandelier broke loose and smacked Josh unconscious. His body sank with the rest of the stage to the bottom, completely entombed.
	The Horrible Secrets were strong as oxen and quick as a diamondback and plundered what they didn't kill like Vikings. With each infected scratch and bite a new Horrible Secret was made. Their repugnant croaks echoed and multiplied into the night. 
		                                        **
	Not too far away
(Come to Me)
	Zach heard it. The crowd was stampeding against him, screaming in horror. Grunts and low barking chomped its way into view. Mewling and carnage and intestines.
		(Zach, grab my hand)
	He heard it again, the voice of the Bag-Head. Some scared shitless parader inadvertently smacked him in the face and his nose started to bleed. 
But when he surveyed around, he saw nothing. In fact, there was nothing. It was black, full dark and no stars. There was no more icy snow and cold; no more feeling or sensation. And then he knew at once.
		(Zach, come to the sound of my voice, reach out your hands)
	The boy finally saw him, turning around. The Bag-Head was all there was. Zach rubbed his short whiskers and felt a rush of terror go through him, like if he didn't do something this exact instant, the whole multiverse would collapse in on itself.
		(This is it Zach. Pi goes on forever brother. Don't make forever any longer)
	Zach stared at the Bag, its leering eyes and the satchel of Unfathom, hocketing the eerie chime. He looked at himself and saw his body fading away into nothing. It was a horrible sensation. He could no longer breathe or comprehend, so he jumped towards Bag-Head whose expression changed immediately and made a cry as he fell towards his other self, caving and folding.
	
	The Horrible Secret's venom overwhelmed Nic's bloodstream, separating the human from the animal, letting the animal overtake the rest. Orange blotches of leathery scales protruded from under his skin. Hair growing on his knuckles and elbows. His fingers grew tall and away from his thumb. Nic's mind was still coherent but it was angry with pain and he found it hard to control his own actions. He drooled all over himself and it melted his clothes, sizzling and fizzling on the concrete. Fighting his own movements, what was left of Nic hobbled with his new repugnant adjusting body.
	A Horrible Secret across the street was thrusting a disgusting, throbbing genitalia on top of a young blonde girl, no older than Nic. The last of his thoughts were of Kylia as his speed rose to a gallop and limped over toward them, finding it difficult to walk while mutating. His ankles getting fatter and his butt getting heavier. He could feel small things swimming around in the bubbles that were sporadically growing out of his skin. A sharp leathery tail fell out of him and his penis started to leak infected gak. A hump in his back started to wedge itself between his neck and spine. The feeling was like anger rising beyond the point of which humans perceive and kept climbing higher and higher. His eyes bulged out bug-like. He grew 2 more noses. Nic's webbed feet exploded out of his shoes as thick patchy hair grew out all his orifices. 
	The girl was crying and screaming naked lying face first in a gutter, she had given up and given in, orange bubbles on her skin. Nic's scraggily shaped arm extended and dug deep into the shoulder of the Horrible Secret. It slobbered at him "Get your own meat, cully!" spitting everywhere and on the girl and she bled where it landed. Nic did not appreciate this response and bit off 2 of its noses. The Horrible Secret made a phlegmy shriek but before it could make another sound Nic reached down its mouth and pulled out its pulsing hairy heart and other arteries and valves and maggots still connected to it and popped it in the palm of his hand. The thing keeled over gurgling orange chunks of liquid out its sides, chortling a gagging grunt. 
	But Nic discovered his body was not responding to his intentions; this mutation possessed him even while his thoughts were demanding the opposite. He was holding the poor girl with dried blood coming out her ass and genitals; pinned down under him and about to have his way with her. He was trying to tell her he was sorry and he was trying to stop himself but all that came out was "Ackl yaarrss rarry." His jaw cracked as it grew with the thickening of his new broad teeth.
	The girl's crying had changed because the mutant virus was overtaking her as well, demanding her to accept his mutant seed and breed and reproduce until the world was covered with her young and she would let them take her and mate until she was barren of eggs and withered away and they would feast on her decaying flesh to set example of dedication and loyalty. Contorted jagged wings started to snap and fold, growing out of her hairy and slimy splotchy back.
	Before he slammed his thickly forked Horrible Secret into the tight pink mutating teenage flower vagina, a bag was thrown over his head; both of their heads.
	 The bag was suffocating the mutant and reviving the human, but the Power of Pi was so intense that Nic fell into a coma and was whisked away in spirit to Nott. 
		
	It finally came to Zach. Rushing into him like a berserker, acquiring the sweet and precious taste that once filled his veins with valiance and pride and plastic. The Plane of Pi was before him the exact same way he'd left it, cosmically divine and harmonically glorious. 		
	(It is I, the Bag-Head)
		<Bag-Head!? My kin? Is it truly thou?>
	(We should be in the highest spirits Brother )
<Indeed, Praise Pi for all her triumphs! The force which existence cannot be without>
	(Smile your face for the people believe Josh to be the daemon Carlton 				Megaladon)
		<HAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHAHHHH>
	Zach wouldn't accept what was going on and pressed through the revolutionary riot orgy. Everyone was running full speed, scampering in the opposite direction he was walking, not caring whatsoever about the size of bruise they imprinted onto Zach's chest and shoulders. Their faces were covered in shattered hope replaced by fear and agony and torment and blood and The Horrible Secret. Some devout Sentimentalites genuflected in acceptance of their fate, waiting.
	They would need a new hero. A real hero. Someone who could save them forever and from forever.
	And then, a kaleidoscopic flannel colored paroxysm absorbed the insane calamity and an almighty chorus crescendo a bone melting dissonance. And from the impossible came the hero at the Horrible Secret. 
		
			<The apartment is forlorn a wall! But no fire or blood>
		(Curious, mayhaps the maidens took flight westwarding) 
			<Alas, a foreboding trail of blight leads outwards?towards thou)
(Now Joshua hath fallen!)
			<Does he breathe?>
		(I cannot tell, the people are in mass tempest)
			<Did discover they the Creature atop Tower Deadsy?)
		(I know not of the Creature of which you speak, there is an outbreak of 				A Horrible Secret throating and breeding) 
			<My Pi, our city in peril>
		(Our city will be nothing but a slosh of blood if we don't stop them)	
			<But where is our Bro LT?>
		(Brother Nic seems aslumber, he was transformed into a Horrible Secret!)
			<I have ill news of a related nature>
		(The Creature)
		<Aye, the maiden fair, Pundara hath become the Arachnida Temptress: Jorogumo; the whore spider, and she	 dangles sister Kylia in her pinchers>
	
	A Horrible Secret stuck its webbed claws in the hair of a wavy haired latina raver, and brought her face to its maw. But the Bag-Head was everywhere that night. He came up from behind like a mobster hit-man and strangled a bag over the mutants face until it fell over lifeless in the trash and brown snow. He threw 3 more bags at charging abominations. The body of the creature slowly spit out the mutation and turned back into the flesh of a human. 
The shaken girl's mouth was trembling. The Bag-Head stared into her eyes and saw her panic, before she pointed behind the hero. 
Four more mutants were stampeding at him. He flung around, casting bags to and fro with the accuracy of a sharp shooter. The ugly things skated on the ice, clawing at the bags sucking the mutant out of them. 
	The girl started to mouth 'thank you' but the Bag-Head didn't let her finish. "Get inside, it's not safe outdoors. Wait until morning to get out if you have to, but don't travel alone." His voice was hard and scary. She stood staring, enthralled by the peculiar Scarecrow. 
What's underneath all of that Bag?Stuffing? Who the hell are you? the chica thought. If she was any younger, she would've wanted to put up a teenie-bopper poster with the Bag-Head cutely winking and pointing at her. 
Instead, this was the night where the girl grew up, and decided for the rest of her life, she would aspire to be nothing less than a hero. She wrapped her arms around him, pulling her head to his chest. He patted her on the back, then ran in the direction of mewling and scrambling mutants who now feared the face of the Bag.
	
	Nic's eyes slowly open, to see a dusty maroon sky with translucent purple clouds and ornately colored birds singing a beautifully complex harmony. A few perch upon his shoulder as he stands on a lonely mountain shaped like a dorsal fin. 
Behind him, a mile away is a giant brown dome much larger than any stadium or mega arena he was aware of. He scanned the million or so horizons then jumped a mile across a canyon towards the dome. His powers are much stronger here, though he could only recognize a few of the smells; death, dust, water and air, but much cleaner and vibrant.
	Inside the gargantuan dome appeared abandoned, forgotten; lost. "Hello?!" His voice echoed. No reply. "HEELLOO!" he bellowed and at this bellow he understood that he wasn't in his own body but the body of the giant Lion Tamer. Never had he walked in his shoes (even though his feet were bare), they were quite comfortable. He was dizzy with how fast everything was paced now.
	Broken bones were piled amongst talismans tokens with frightening skeletons. Nic as the Lion Tamer picked up a large skull and studied it. There was blunt trauma leaving a split right down the middle and several cracks branching off it. It looks like the skull of a shark or some carnivorous fish?Not any fish I would eat though?He picked up more bones and deduced these creatures died in battle maybe hundreds of years ago, maybe even more. Can anyone hear me? Zach? Drew? Pi? Nic was still diverted from the Plane of celestial existence. 
	He couldn't remember how he got here or the moments leading up to how he got here. The last thing imprinted on his mind was a creature from a hairy black lagoon.
	He tossed his boomerang three miles into the air and was stunned that it didn't return, it kept on flying on its own accord and made cheerful noise. "Shit?" He sat down on a fat rock trying to whistle the melody of the Phoenix, unsuccessfully--	
	"Hey get off me!" his butt rumbled. 
There was a face on the rock he sat on.
	"My Pi, a rock that talks?" He picked it up intrigued.
	"Come on, set me back down on the ground where it's safe!" The rock sounded flustered and even scared.
	"I'm sorry, er, Mr. Rock, but where I come from, we don't have pieces of stone that, well, speak."
	"Where you're from?"
	"Yeah, what is this place?"
	"This place? It's my home!"
	"Do you have a name for it?"
	"A name!? Boy, you're full of it?"
	"Are you purposefully trying to confuse me?"
	"You think I'm not confused?! I haven't seen any Walker here since the Dolphins left."
	"Dolphins? I knew those cheerful little bastards had something to hide! Do you know what's in there, besides skeletons?"
	"I don't know nothing about no skeletons?but deep underground there's an Engine---please, let me go."
	"Do you realize you speak the same language as me? Isn't that weird!?"
	"How come you speak my talk?!"
	"NEVERMIND--I don't care, I don't want to think about it, I shouldn't have brought it up, so I'm gonna drop it, because it won't get us anywhere, and anywhere is exactly where I want to be?anywhere but here, that is."
	"What did your mother do to you kid?" the rock scoffed. 
	Nic knew he could stomp on the rock and obliterate it into kagillion pieces, but this talking rock had answers, not many, but enough. How do I know this isn't a dream?
	The only sound now was a familiar one; Mechanical, like a huge drill or bulldozer. Nic eagle eyed down a well outside the dome, then through a hallway that might have stretched 9 miles. He saw lights in the room where the sound was coming from. He asked "What's the engine for? 
	"How many questions do you have, boy?"
	"Infinity."
	"Infinity?.now there's a word that brings back memories?"
	It was debatable who was more confused; Nic or the Rock, but now they had both found a common ground: infinity.
	"Oh yessir, infinity. My g-pappy was always repeatin the word, personally I never understood it; how something could go on forever with no end. I just never seen nor heard of nothing like it, I mean, everything has an end, everything dies. But my granmpappy, he would say death was just the beginning to a cycle we ain't know shit about. Hell, I found death's what drives us?Imagine: death the motivator, life and evolution."
	"Tell that to the bones of those dead dolphins or whatever they were?"
	"My granmpappy always told the same story over and over. Course it lost the punch it once had when I was a youngin, but he would always say that those who forget the past are doomed to repeat it."
	"Yeah, I've heard that one too." But from Carlton Megladon.
	"The story goes a bringer of lightning came here with the Shark and butchered, grilled and ate the Dolphins in order to fire up the Engine, which made grass and trees grow and water fall in tremendous amounts from the sky! Can you believe it? Water falling from the sky?"
	"Now I know you're crazy?"
	"Gramps also said something went wrong, because the Engine was a device constructed by the Sharks, but it turns out there were no more sharks, or not enough at least to come out from 
hiding. So the Dolphins used the Engine to build great warships and battalions, and when their number was too great for this land to hold, they got up and left, and no one's heard or seen em since. I'm glad they're gone. Ugly sonsabitches. Hey, sonny, you don't look so healthy."
	It was because Nic didn't look at all. His body was turning transparent and was fading out of reality and before he knew it, he was gone?again.
	
	Dr. Nnr sounded the silent alarm, much later than he probably should have. But after he saw the Creature running up Deady tower, he nearly flushed his insolent bowels. 
The Deadsy-copter turbines chopped through the cold winter air, shining a spotlight on a giant black Scorpion with the upper torso of the demon succubus, who reveled away as if the brightness was cruel. Her tail had grown twice the size of her body, ready to inject deadly magic. Sleek, silent and cunning; she had become a true predator. When she caught scent of the Boy with the Cape, she took off on a prowl towards Deadsy Tower.
	The Blanketeer was hovering a safe distance away from the monster that took the place of Pundara, not to let himself be seen. Kylia was very still, being clutched like a babe at her breast. Blank and the helicopter couldn't see her cradling Kylia in her arms as if to feed her milk, because Kylia's heart had stopped and her body was cold. Blood trickled down the sides of Pundara's pouty fanged mouth. She gave a shrill then scuttled hauntingly through layers and levels of the outer walls of Deadsy Tower and into darkness, only to reappear on the other side by the mad mole-holes she created.
	Each time her spiny legs would dig into the side of the tower, a loud clash of breaking glass would erupt, dusting the air with microscopic shards. She fleeted so swiftly her body resembled a steam-punk alien machine walking on water. Watching the black spines of her legs made you feel they were crawling all over and under your skin, as she zigzagged with speeds the eye only tried to comprehend.
	The scene on the ground was ferocious and riddled with anarchy. Panic and chaos; peanut butter and jelly. The only form of justice was that of the Bag-Head, the one who prevented the whole city from mutation and mass genocide. They hoped their brother would join them soon but could not depend on the assumption, or the time to search for him.
	Blank flew close to a large puff of dark smoke. The Beast shot it out before disappearing again. It was floating ink, and it was smelly. He followed the pungent pheromones floatingly. They acted as allergens to the Power of Pi. He scoffed at the idea of reasoning with her, with It, but was unsure of her power. Judging by her dank aroma, he might need more than two hands and a lightning rod.
	She had come out on the other side of the illuminated skyscraper. One of the helicopters found her, shining a bright spotlight. Blank approached in flight, his yellow cape flapping independently, then the spotlight shined on him. Growling, her tail unfurled at the sight of the boy. 
	"Dara?. Hi?.it's Drew? Zach's bro...Yeah? Listen, please, Can you give Kylia to me? We can help you-We can make it work--" she lashed her elephant tusk sized stinger at his heart with dizzying speed. "Didn't think so--" The Blanketeer managed to avoid the attack but the sharp injector of her tail dug into his cape, infectious slime squirting at his super hero body. He grabbed hold of the icy bone tail for dear life and Pi. She threw him through the outer frame of Deadsy tower, thrashing into glass windows, ceilings, steel and copper wiring-- slammed repeatedly against concrete, noticing he wasn't able to take the pain well, but by staying in a propelled levitated state he was able to keep her off balance like an anti-gyroscope, unaware of her master stamina.
 	Time was the last thing to waste, he was already woozy. He conducted himself; static-pulsar! which only excited her ferociousness, fighting just outside where Zach had fallen out of Carlton Megaladon's window. She scratched and bruised his face; Blank unable to land a solid blow, but with the shocking intensity, he distracted her footing and lost grip from the side of the tower, receiving the bad side of gravity and fell, making a low snarling shriek. 
	Blank was reaching for Kylia dangling and tangling by the relentless Monster, careful enough not to get his hand caught in the atrocious pinchers that were relentlessly going for his head and testicles. Kylia was cradled tight in Pundara's arms. Falling falling falling?
	Seconds before 'splat' Blank waylaid the bitch with a quick powerful thunderpunch! It only agitated her enough to drop Kylia. 
	Dara's Scorpion self plummeted and crashed clean through a semi-trailer. 
		
	A blue and white spherical rip exposed itself through time and space, bending light and the atoms of atoms until two men wearing soaked wet suits walked through the brief portal. Exeter was waxing his surfboard, waiting for the Three. 
Soaking wet, hair slicked back, dripping salt water, he assumed this 'disturbance' wouldn't take long. Alec Pure was with him sharpening his twisted sword. A jeweled chest of trophies and winnings and floral arrangements was teleported behind them, sitting like a casket full of treasure. Exeter only had to imagine a new set of clothing and it was on his, pressed and clean.
The two band members of Deadsy were surveying the spoiled pandemonium, disgruntled they were not the source of destruction. They honestly wouldn't be able to take credit for the tragedy. For the first time, it was actually the Three responsible, and they didn't quite understand it. They wanted chaos to be theirs and no one else's. And this was good havoc. This was tasty mass bedlam. I mean THE HORRIBLE SECRET? A little cliché these days. The days of the future. Tomorrow now yesterday. Only one good day left of surfing and the Three had to go and make a ruckus. 
Exeter felt almost clumsy for the first time in his existence for letting the Three ambush a surprise attack. He would have to make example of this insult; he was still on top of the food chain. Invasive species.
	
Passing light, from a lighthouse, or a moon, alien to the night, fades through the smoke and glass and melted iron. Not hot enough to be a bomb; blank enough as en empty page on a piece of paper, mocking you to do your homework. Quit procrastinating?are those my last thoughts? Procrastination? I've never procrastinated in my life?how poetic then, to die young. 
	No new holes sprouted from his body, though he could feel several places where he was bleeding from the scratching plunge. His bones ached. He couldn't move. Bruises would form and their color took place in welts and slams from the wilted stage turned to rubble by the Horrible Secret. How did they get out? but figured that wasn't really important, because what was important, is that someone were to save him. He was suffocating with all of the dead and crumbling lumber weighing him down. It was a miracle he wasn't dead already.
	Miracle isn't the right word, buts it's the first to come to mind.
	The correct word is Pi.
	It was Pi that saved him for this long, and it was Pi that would save him from the next life so he could procrastinate death by however many minutes longer. But then through the shifting light, came a chiming noise. It was like the wind; natural and sometimes uncomforting. Josh could barely see through the cracks of his glasses and took in a gulp of fear. If it's Deadsy, I hope they make it quick.
	But it was the arms of the Bag-Head that was lifting off debris, and the paper bag with the facial features; how it almost smiled when it found Josh, and freed him from his chains.

	Nic woke up naked in the middle of the street, cold stiff all over his body, disoriented. He could barely move and felt no reason to. The cold wind pushed his penis making him laugh, having never felt such a sensation and wondered what a wind induced orgasm might feel like. He laughed really hard. What the fuck am I talking about? He was wheezing like a crazy old coot, drunk from porch sitting on his favorite thinking chair, as if he was remembering the greatest accomplishment in his life and was so proud of this accomplishment that every other day and accomplishment was worthless because of this one, yet, he was still just laughing on a rugged porch procrastinating death somehow even though that's what the miserable bastard wanted: a way out besides a bullet to the head or rope around the neck. 
	Nic wanted the whole world to laugh with him, the whole multiverse to salsa with. He wanted his friends to pat him on the back and get rowdy with drink and carelessness and immaturity vacant of the world's responsibilities.  
	Then he heard thunder baboom, lightning strike. He heard irregular shouting and massive objects crashing into cars and other big heavy, expensive things. He saw fire and dust fly up from the ground. Tectonic plates quake. Grunts and punches and the splatter of blood. Fists going into jaws and guts. Hello? Can anyone hear me! ZACH! DREW! WHERE THE HELL ARE YOU!?
	And then all he saw were the cruel crooked buildings of downtown San Tropez laughing at him; The cosmic lie, the ultimate weapon of evil.

Kylia was growing frost on her face, frozen. Blank nudged her to awaken but nothing happened. He put his ear to her chest and heard nothing. "No?." he quavered, "no? no? no? no? no? FUCK YOU GOD!" he flipped off where he thought heaven to be and a lightning bolt hit him from an unknown source. He cried, mewling and weeping from the consternation. Not knowing what else to do he pounded her chest and pushed it in and out like they do in the movies. He blew into her mouth and waited for her to blow back. Nothing. He slapped her. He kissed her. 
Nothing but nothing and Dystopia. Nothing. Kylia was dead. The Three had failed in protecting her.
But the tragedy had only merely begun. The monster Dara had silently awakened, and stalked her prey like a rabid tarantula. If I drink all his Pi, no one can stop me! 
Without warning, she rammed her stinger into the back of the Blanketeer, lifting him off the ground. The pain took all the wind out of him, he couldn't breathe. 
But she was not done, displaying maniacally a hairy wet pincher; she slowly and very painfully chopped off his right forearm and left hand, crunching down like a hellish guillotine, severing blood and bone splintering into a cruel warm mist, leaving the Blanketeer's impression as a poorly constructed meat puppet. 
He screamed helplessly as he sent back a harsh defensive attack joltschocker! that knocked her over but right when he was able to turn around she stabbed a pincher in his abdomen. He yelled agonized with a new concept of fear, bright red blood flowing out of the gaping hole in his chest. He fell over and didn't make a move to get up.
Pundara turned her viscous gaze towards Kylia and heard the faintest pulse of her heart, smiling as much a monster can smile. She help her pup to come suck from mama's bitty, Mama has milk for babe! 
	
There was no response on the Plane. 
The city had grown silent after only twenty five minutes ago the streets were plagued with the Horrible Secret pillaging the city and ten minutes before that a festival of lights and misutopia.
Newspapers blew across idle icy pavement. Steam rose from sewer gutters and manholes. Broken glass. Upturned cars. Random fires. Dead snow-people. Repugnant eggs. Confetti. Tinsel. Litter and shit everywhere. A busted hydrant here, a sideswiped Hummer there, a terminally ill super hero right under that; an ex-call girl-rocker-chick-monster-scorpion-she-devil breast feeding a nerdy gamer chick, right here. 	
	 
<Arm yourself brother, for I have been disarmed, and I feel the Life Exitrosis; stealer of light>
		(Aye, but I will steal it tonight, I say twice, I will steal his light)
	{Now, Now boys, I've been here the entire time,  
there is no more light to be seen, tis all dark from here on out
I am it, and you are with me}
<We come to end whatever beginning we had Exeter>
(You will now pay for the crimes gainst civilization, free the people from delusion and your end shall be done with civility and haste)
Do you think this is pop-fiction?-- This isn't a Superman or Spiderman comic or a patriotic film about WWII. This is not an alternate history. This is reality. No one gets credit. People suffer and die without 'justice' or honor. 
You want me to say, "I'm responsible for all 'evil'; for everything that is wrong in the world; it was me who in fact assassinated Kennedy and his brother. I murdered Martin Luther King and Abraham Lincoln, and it was my idea to start the concentration camps, I gave Osama Bin Laden all he needed to infiltrate and execute his attack on America."
You want me to be the blame for every fault in human history. The snake and the Apple.
Don't you know, how I wish I could take credit for all of those accomplishments, but the god's honest truth: it was you.
It was ordinary people who masterminded these attacks. Ordinary people who were driven beyond madness in their environment. Develop. Adapt. Evolve. See the light.
And you think by fighting me, getting rid of me, will eliminate these 'horrors?' No No No children. It is you who is the horror. Those people had exactly what you have; a brain, a heart, a soul, a life, a mother and father, family. You are part of them as much as they are part of you.

The cosmic lie spoke to the 3 continuously without remorse.
	There are no heroics in this life; real life. God is dead, along with all your lionhearted soldiers and crusaders of folkloric mythology. All your nobility and virtue falsified. An extra piece of a puzzle you've never opened sitting in your attic. Where I come from, Earth by definition means 'insignificant' - 'ordinary' -'lacking of taste and swarming of bland' -- bacteria that lives where the ass meets the genitals of the multiverse - 
& All your ancestors in Pi fell by my tongue. You have failed to see this, and that is why you will fail now?
Earth is mine, and mine to decide its fate
		(Then quit your stalling antics and decide how you want The End to be)

Blank lifted his head off the snowy ground, dizzy and pale. He saw the bitch actually cradling Kylia. He was going to fry her, vaporize her to a black goop of jelly, but when he saw her crawl towards Kylia he couldn't. He understood Pundara wanted help somehow, and only Kylia could be the answer. 
	Blank desperately wanted to incinerate her, burn her like a heathen, but it picked up Kylia and nurtured her under her arms and cupped her tit into Kylia's snow and blood covered mouth until the shape of her nipple touched her lips and tongue. The broken girl immediately started to glow iridescently. Dara rocked her and hummed an eerie lullaby; it seemed to make all noise around the world go quiet, as if in anticipation for what was to come... 
	The Monster Pundara enervated herself, resting her ungues humming the inversion of Rock-a-bye Baby. The sound of her voice was tantalizing. Her hands with the rest of her skin still sprouting black tergatal armor. It covered her like acne all over whatever human she had left. Her milk was developing Kylia into a high paid Swedish supermodel. Her fat morphed into muscle, breasts shapelier, hair thicker and deeper blond, skin refined and gold, eyes crystalline, arms shaped and defined, body younger, her brain evolved. 
Pundara; Mother of Monsters, swooned away into shadow.
	Drew tried to warn his brothers but the excruciating pain in his body inhibited him from summoning the plane. Desperately, he hoped he was not paralyzed, but felt static within.
	
The Bag-Head stood over Exeter by a foot, cracking his gloved knuckles.
{HA! The End! Zach, you stand no chance against me without your brothers. For all you know, they could be dead already. Why not come across the line? There is still so much more we have yet to accomplish?You know you cannot kill me here- Join me, come into the light}
		(I'm going to kill you, someday or other, though the cost will be dear)
	{I like your tone, orchidaceous, but powerful?}
Exeter unbuttoned his vest. Humans gave me power. And now they're bound by laws unawares of why the rules exist. Only a few want to be the bad seed, the black sheep, the freak. It's hard to go against the grain. It's lonely and unrewarding. People are lazy, that's why they conform. Join trends. Watch sports. Drink beer. Eat ribs. Drive cars. Suck dick. Play guitar. Get tattoos. Do drugs. Look Cool. Get hot chicks to suck your cock. Act like a clone. Think what's on the screen.
I make them say I'm saving them with a knife at their throat. They ask me to die. They're so obsessed with the next life it ruins this life, the only life where love coexists with hate, art and war, tears of happiness and sadness, shrimp and pizza, men and women, music and electricity.
	I'm sure your fulmination will be quite charming, Bags, or whatever the hell you're supposed to be; but no match for my power.
(Your power? Your power will soon be gone when there is no one here to believe 	your lies; they will have no power to believe in, but the power of Pi, 
The power of Infinity.
(No, your power will fall with your Tower) 

It is time to finish what you have started; kill the little one, take away his Pi and embrace your new power! The Cosmic Lie commanded her, and she agreed. She would stand over Drew now, the one that pissed her off, and finish what she started. How pleasing it was for her to decapitate his puny appendages by her own sweet claws! It made her lower side quiver. 
	But it was his own undoing. She only acted out of self-defense; protecting her pup. He doesn't understand what a girl needs; which none of the Three were capable. 
Kylia stirred. Her vocal chords resembled a vivid rainbow of vibrations. She moaned and it made the Creature shy and tense. But then Dara heard a different noise. A command: shrill; cold and precise: Exeter calling to her; there is fresh meat to dine on, unspoiled and ready to feast! She hid Kylia in a quiet dark corner before the newly formed mega-hottie fully regained consciousness. The Monster scuttled away with a fresh scent under her skin, itching as the epitome of discomfort.
She'd grown even larger. She was drooling and marched like a sober zombie, led by the shepherd who poisoned her with Super Scorpion Growth Hormone (SGH+). Her pinchers chomped at the air with such grave ardor it shattered the glass on upturnly littered parked cars. 

		<The Beast of Pundara creeps so awaken your Bag!> 
		(Hold her off brother!-For I am going boot to mouth twixt Exeter)
	
After Exeter undid his jacket to a casual style, he crossed his arms dissatisfied. The Bag-Head waited patiently for the proper moment to bust some knuckles. He stretched in anticipation, black smoke coming from his mouth and eye sockets. 
	The Bag-Head snarled his face and rolled up his flannel cuffs, but stood in place. 
Now was the time to attack. 
He pitched a bag sizzling at Exeter like a gnarly curve ball, but Alec Pure jumped in the way, deflecting the bag with the slice of his sword. The Bag-Head was wondering when the Deadsy affiliate would show his pretty slurring face. Pure perfunctorily pounced slashingly at the Bag-Head whose flannel received a slight reduction but The Bag-Head moved like a serpent grabbing the assassins hand and head-butted Pure who fell over bloodily, then flipped right back up and kicked the hero in the gut back into a pillar of Deadsy Tower.
	This drove the Bag-Head to no end. He frowned with an exhale of smoke as he produced a bag and flung it at the henchman, which shot out like a tank blast. It completely engulfed Alec Pure who instantaneously found himself teleported to a different part of downtown, 3.14 miles away.	Exeter picked his teeth and examined his nails. His fingers were still wrinkly from the ocean. "Interesting display Pi man, but let's see what else you can do?"
	Bag-Head accelerated to a leap and tackled Exeter on his back, jostling on the ground in a strange unheroic fury. They threw and landed several violent punches against each other; each connecting, popping, grunting into the cold night air. The Bag-Head was heavier than normal, unlocking the ability to control his own weight, seemingly infinite. Exeter squirmed but only managing to flip himself over, still under the Scarecrow, now forced onto his stomach.
The Hero wasted no time and wrung a sharp bag wrapping around Exeter's face, completely air-locked. The Bag-Head pulled it tight as possible, and hog-tied it at the back of his head in a knot no topologist can theorize, but felt his hands ablaze from a secret fire that no doubt was curse for touching Exeter, rolling off, trying to stonch out the invisible flames.
	Exeter tore the bag viciously from his head to see the fist of Bag-Head slingshot into his nose which broke on impact followed by a 1 - 2 into the stomach but was predicted and caught Bag-Head's wrist and slammed him on his side, only to receive a steel toed boot to the head.
	"DOH!" Exeter yelled. The hero leapt and unleashed a powerful noogie so irritating they blindly ran themselves through a statue of the famous Deadsy logo. 
Exeter really didn't like this and slung his foe out into the icy street. His anger alone had set the hero on fire, but the Bag-Head was able to quench it to a smoldering crisp somehow with the power of Pi, who skated on his back painfully to a pile of dead Tropites, blood frozen in the snow.
	Exeter spit and steadily traipsed in the direction of the fallen hero.

	3.14 miles away, the Blanketeer was staring at the crater sized tare in his stomach. He could feel it reform itself into a stronger layer of Pi. "Well how about that? Pretty lucky I guess?" Drew had to buy his brother time.
Both Alec Pure and the Creature were face to face with Blank, who managed to get up, knowing that it was not his hands that providing him of his lighting-but his heart, and the Power of Pi.
Blank pretended to do a dance imitating Muhammad Ali but in his poor status, it mocked his later years. "Come on. Let's go," static rippled across his body. He flexed and released a fistless haymaker punch into the air, as if practicing the mechanics for what was to come. But it was Alec Pure who then tapped him on the shoulder.
       Pure unsheathed his blade singing his favorite Deadsy song, "The Key to Gramercy Park."
The Blanketeer levitated drunkenly but then corrected his airborne momentum towards his enemy, anticipating Pure's attempt to impale his face, Blank's jaw dropped and accepted the sword perfectly down his throat. The move was so impressive it stunned Alec where he stood, giving Blank just enough time to send electrocuted vibrations through the sword until all the water still trapped on his wetsuit was steam and boiling his flesh. 
	"ARRRRRRRGGGGGGGGGGGGGHHH!" 
	Blank tried to jab Alec's face with his fists and forgot they'd been sliced off and was kneed in the scrotum. 
Of course, the anatomy of the superhero is different from the human form, but that place where the gonads go is still a very sensitive spot, ok?
As Blank fell to his knees, he gave him a hard lightning-uppercut to the genitals with the top of his head followed by a tremendous thunder-bite. Alec Pure, the great assassin, fell down in great pain. They both did, and rolled and rolled on the ground mumbling in severe pain? It was quite ridiculous.
	

2014
 	 
      Mr. Gomez closes off the lights. 
     The power of Pi completely abandoned the duo, at this point. 
     Although Mr. Gomez and his wife were one with the plane in another universe, they could always feel the Power of Pi when they were together. It chose them without knowing why. As does the Power of Pi. Some go quietly in the night. Some fall in a vat of acid. And some go with such a blaze of glory that their triumphs are spoken and written for thousands of years. 
     Mr. Gomez, the Fat Ninja, saw in his mind the look on his wife's face when they inadvertently created another universe; This Universe. They traveled through every dimension until the Multiverses evolved and gave birth to a more perfect one. Neither of them could explain it. So they just laughed as the 3 new children popped into existence.
       Eventually, their offsprings would create more worlds, and even though Exeter would penetrate their imaginations like all the ones before, the next generation of Pi wielders would be born to someday outweigh the almighty cosmic scale?

1st official day of Summer in the New Year

        Zach briskly saunters into the Gomez! Cracker Factory, wearing thick aviator sunglasses, a baseball cap, and a hangover. The stubble of a light beard gives the impression he ran out of razors for good. As usual, he didn't sleep a wink last night, or the night before. 
        Stepping metronomically; presto, the doors open for him. Nodding to most of his coworkers, he creates the illusion he is comfortable in front of them. 
        They all smile, hollering back or shake his hand or give him high five's or fist bumps. Most wave and say his name with a greeting: "Hows it goin?" - "Mornin Zach Attack!" - "There he is!" - "Yo dawg wuts shakin?" A small group runs to him, grabbing autographs on whatever paper or flesh they have to spare. Random workers Zach's never seen or met congratulate and shake his hand with tears in their eyes.
       Mr. Gomez, the owner of the Gomez! Cracker Factory, the adopted Father of the Three, waits for his charismatic son and employee to come sit, and listen to the wonderful news he has to share. "Zachary, my boy! Appreciate ya comin early this morning. How was the walk?"
       "Refreshing, but it's already way too hot," he mentions nonchalantly, closes the door, shuts the blinds and sits down, loosening his tie, lighting a cig. He stretches his neck and rubs his forehead, trying to forget.
        On the wall hang several frames holding Zach's famed picture. Many are him posing on the covers of different holomags. Others are the iconic image of Zach carrying naked long-haired Drew, out from the wake of the fall of Deadsy Tower: He's not heavy, he's my brother, the beginning of the 2nd American Revolution. 
         Zach had a fear of cameras it turns out; thinks they swallow your soul. 
         Redundantly reading yesterday's profit-margins in comparison from last year, he throws the newspaper off a stack of Gomez! &CO worksheets that also have his picture on the front page, for the millionth time in a row, or so it seems. 
        "Come on now, that can wait, there's something else I needta talk to you about." Mr. Gomez smiles under his dark mustache.
       Zach's new state-of-the-art teleprobe vibrates. He checks the incoming message. It made him angry so he crushed it under his shoe with a furious stomp. Then his other teleprobe rang. He silenced it, shaking his head, disgusted with himself.
      The sun shines a soft yellow color through a high, lone window behind Mr Gomez. The big round man scratches his wide bald head and semi brushes his black mustache, smiling, always giddy just to exchange a few words with his son; the most famous man on Earth; hero of the world. The only music playing was the clamoring noise of the factory. They grin at each other, as if there's an inside joke that no one else gets, when Big G pulls out a fat wad of papers, "This here is my official resignation, legally signing all of the Gomez! Cracker estate and its enterprises to you."
      "WHAT?" Zach sat up in his chair spitting out mediocre cappuccino.
       "I told you I was going to do this, and I don't care what you do with it, it's yours, sell it, invest, whatever." He pretended to type something on a broken keyboard.
       "Gomez, come on, it's too early for this talk again." Zach rubs his brow irritated. "Can't we discuss such matters over wine and pasta? Let's go to Spaghetti Works, Friday night. I'll bring us some dates. You like redheads right?" But nothing compares to hair with tight curls and a mouth full of braces. He bit the inside of his cheek. 
       "My time's run out. I'm out of options. I need to know it will be in safe hands."
       Zach could find no response, dumbfounded.
      "I don't want you to lie to me anymore, Zach?" the thought of a lie made Zach and Daniel Gomez go cold and numb.
       Big G returns to the cockpit of his desk. Reaching under, he pulls out a tall bottle of old scotch, pours himself a sturdy drink and throws in smoking ice cubes, before pouring one of equal potency and mass for Zach and offers it to him. Zach shakes his head but then realizes it isn't an offer, it's a command, and it's not a bad command because Zach's wanted a drink the second he woke up. 
      "Gomo, I told you, I want to get out of St. Tropez. It's time for me to move on. Grow up."
      Gomez pats his shirt pocket, jiggling a breasticle, pulling out a pack of blunts. "All it takes is one bad day, then it's all over."
        You have no idea how true that is.
       "I read Nic's book, or journal, whatever it was, at his memorial? What was that all about? I didn't understand the message."
      Zach was confused but had to respond, "He never strayed far from his imagination. Some asshole told me he could produce it into a movie, but IDK?Drew took his death much harder. He'll never be same?" And neither will I.
      "Don't tell me he's on the Calm! I read those pills are twenty times more addictive than heroin." 
      "Yeah, he ripped out all of his hair. Two foot long strands at a time."
      "Why didn't you tell me?"
       "Come on, let's not do this now?please." Zach sounded defeated. He already had 34 missed calls and 156 unread text messages. "I need a new number."
        Mr. Gomez could not comment on this so changed the subject. "This postcard was in my mail-box yesterday. I thought you might want to look at it." He handed it over. Zach took it fiercely. There was nothing written on it. He didn't have anything to write with. Not this time, at least. He flipped to the front. It was a picture of the Coliseum. He moves quicker everyday? 
        A phone rang. Gomez let it ring again and picked it up. "Gomo, go--?Oh?OK OK OK, yes tell her he will be right down." He hung up and looked up at Zach, apologetically. "Your girlfriend is here."
       "She's my fiancé?"
        "Your fiancé? I didn't know she was your fiancé? Shit!"
        Zach thought of Pundara. It made him want to cry, drink more, behave like a bafoon. Gomez saw this and flicked on the Outertube. Josh Turkey was reporting on the ware bouts of Exeter. Josh was convinced he was off the continent.
        Silence.
        "Where do you think Exeter went?" Gomez leaned back in his chair sweating, holding in fear.
        "I don't know? Who cares?He's probably dead? I bet he was getting a blowski at the top of his damned tower when those terrorists-"
        "The 3."
        "Yeah-" He took another drink and pretended he was done talking. Gomez saw this and said
        "Yeah."
        More silence. Well, technically it's not silence because cars are rushing and people are yelling 'HEY THAT'S MY ZACHY!' flashing their sexy parts.
        All of a terrified sudden, Zach thinks of all the photographers and countless interviews, repeating the exact same story, over and over. How fake it was, compared to the truth; taking credit for all of the amazing gadgets from Kylia and Charlie, which was in Everybody's home now. He would never have to steal again. I don't know which face is more real; the guy taking all of the credit, or the thing that doesn't want any credit. 
         His job was unfinished, but he was still collecting bounties and dining on the spoils of war and fame. 
        It crosses his mind everyday; wondering if life is now boring without an Exeter controlling the city. All the spasmodic thoughts tripped over themselves in a single instant.
        "You did a good job kid. Ya know I heard some lunatic on the radio say you could run for president and probably win!"
        President? Control over an entire country, maybe the world. That must be the most gratifying sensation in the world.
        
	
JANUARY (of the new year) 3.14159265359428176

Coming out of his nightmares, Nic suddenly swore to himself he heard the moan of a girl awakening out of slumberland. This voice was soothing; captivating to vibrate against the eardrums.
	Kylia? That can't be her; she sounds like a little boy? but? everything in me says it is-Pi--but that moan? was?was, hot. Kylia doesn't even know what hot means! Do I? That's beside the point?someone needs my help?hmm.. She always acts like she wants to be one of the guys. A tom-boy. I bet she hates being called that! 
	He dragged himself towards the sound naked. (A lot of his hair had grown back, curiously)  Where are you guys? What the hell is going on? Is this the end of the world? PLEASE! WHERE IS THE POWER OF PI?!
	This made all the buildings in the city let out into imposing hysterical laughter. The Cosmic Lie was strong as ever, warping Nic's brain into mush.
	He crept in case it was a trap, knowing it had to be. Maybe Exeter orchestrated these whole series of events. Is this the bait I'm crawling to? He peered as spy-like as he could and was delighted to find a naked voluptuous blond, her hair sprawled out over the last white snow in the only area not smeared in grime, soot and blood. 
	It was Kylia, but, from an alternate dimension where the ugly are really hot. Really fuckin hot! He poked her in the tummy that was now tan, slim and freckle free. 
Her eyes passively frolicked open like a butterfly and shined rays of Aphrodite's amulet reflecting back at him. "Nic? Nic! Oh my Pi, it's you!!" She stretched her arms to him and wriggled her fingers into his red curly hair and started crying. "Please, is everything alright? What is going on? How did I get here! Where are we? And why are we naked?" 
Nic put his arm around her strangely warm body. He couldn't speak, for once in his Pi, words would not come. She placed her head into the spot under his neck where the mutant had bit him. Her touch was soft and ameliorated his wounds. Then he found himself talking. "Kylia, haha, fucking Pi," he almost started sobbing with her, "I thought I'd never see you again? I thought I'd never see anyone again? I thought I was dead? maybe I was."
	"I don't like the looks of things, are we safe here?" she tried to survey her surroundings but was too exhausted and fell on top of Nic. "Sorry, I feel really weird." Her legs quivered a bit.
	"No, I don't think it's safe, but I'm not sure what is safe." He was staring into her gorgeous blue eyes that seemed a thousand miles deep. She was randomly grabbing different parts of Nic's body to reassure herself this was reality, and not a figment of her imagination.
	"Can you talk to Drew or Zach? Are they ok? Do you think they can help us?"
	"No--I still can't-- I don't know what's wrong. I haven't seen them since we split up to get you and Dara and Josh?god damnit where the fuck are they?! 
"Oh no, Pundara!!!" Kylia shoved her palms into her face recalling the fate of Pundara, and the thought Josh met his death somewhere through the anarchy hurt even more. "I don't want to die Nic, I'm really scared. I'm not ready-"
	"I'm scared too, but we have to be ready, we're practically designed to be ready," He swayed with her and rethought his current philosophical rant. "I'm not going to let you die tonight, or tomorrow night. We're going to end this once and for all so all the misery Exeter caused will be accounted for." Nic turned his eyes to the horizon and cursed Pi for not being with him at that instant, but then asked for forgiveness and that the Power of Pi be returned to him. It didn't.
	Nic pulled Kylia up with him. She flicked her hair behind her shoulder and finally realized Nic's penis was brushing against her, and it was almost slowly growing. She gave it a good hard look. It was the first penis she'd ever seen face to face. She excused herself and laughed good-naturedly. "What?" Nic asked curiously enticed by her snickering, unaware of his arousing penis.
	"Its?ha..its..uhm?your thingy?" He looked down too, stupidly shocked he forgotten his sexy parts were completely exposed, and he was starting to get a boner.
	"Oh," he wiggled the fleshy tissue sideways and it went 'boing'. "Your naked too ya know. And, you, well, look--" he lost his train of thought, his penis did not. 
	"I've, uh, never seen one before--I mean--in real life." She shrugged and scratched the tip top of her head but couldn't look away, embarrassed. They still had their arms around each other. Ky was starting to feel different down there too.
	"They've got minds of their own," he said and took a mental picture of Kylia's rockin tits. He was waggling it around some more while he compared it to her anatomy, "Yeah, it's not that bad."
	"Haha, it looks like it's dancing?" she laughed. "What does it feel like?" she asked.
	"What does it feel like?" he responded, suddenly wimpish of her growing fascination.
	"Yeah, can I, uhm, can I touch it?"
	"Err?well-- I dunno if that's such a good idea Kylia. Maybe later?" It bounced a little and it made Kylia giggle some more. She clapped for it like a monotonous party trick.
	"It's sooo?weird looking, but cool!"
	"Hey! Come on now," Without prying further she took the liberty to study Nic's personal anatomy with the 'hands on' approach . "Kylia! Get off of me, come on, this is fuckin weird!"
	"I'm sorry, I didn't want you to feel uncomfortable?"
	"Granted Kylia, most men won't feel uncomfortable if you just grab their balls without asking, but given our current situation, I'll have to be a little less conceited."
	"Sorry, I won't do it again?" She kicked the littered snow.
	"Don't say it like that." He held his hand out and she grabbed it. They ran to a growing turmoil of commotion holding hands with bravery the size of two hearts. 
 	Kylia and Nic paid no mind to the freezing winter cold, who then managed to cover themselves with vacant wooden barrels wrapped with large rubber bands, conveniently working as make-shift suspenders like from an old cartoon; a placebo of warmth.
	The brawling of superheroes could be heard: loud low punches and jabs into the stomach, grunts and gasps of expelled air, chairs exploding on backs, pie's to the face, strange exploding sounds of unseen energy, bags being thrown. "Who's up there Nic?"
	It's Exeter and Bag-Head. He didn't say it aloud, though he thought he did.
	Their pace quickened, knees skidding into the harsh wood of the barrels as they ran, thumping and scraping in pain. "Bag-Head," Nic said, "Where's Blank? I have to help, I can't let Zach fight him alone--" Nic lifted his arms to the sky, hoping that Pi would come crashing down onto him, changing his body into the impenetrable Lion Tamer, but nothing happened.
	"Come on Nic, change, I know you can!" she saw back and forth and found herself frozen as an ice covered pond. Then they both felt the ground rumble. "Is that an earthquake?"
	
	It got quiet fast as the snow fell harder in clumps with a great hush of wind. Zach, as the Bag-Head, got to his feet, breathing hard but not exhausted of breath. His body cramped and burned but didn't let it show. Exeter placed his feet off the first steps leading to Deadsy Tower. He cracked his neck, wind flapping his hair like it was the winds favorite thing to do. "No need to dust yourself, Zachary. You will be covered in shit for quite a while. Tides have turned, forever."
	"Oh I know. But you truly have no idea." The Bag-Head responded, his voice grim as brimstone. His eyes seemed smokish and his eyes glowed blackly. The two foes exchanged glances, comic book style-like.
	Then the Bag-Head pulled out something from the inside of his flannel. It was round and floated above his flat gloved hand, vacuuming all near about sound waves.
	Exeter stopped in his tracks studying the object, foolishly knowing the current flow was about to metamorphose itself on the cosmic scale, everywhere. He ogled at the Bag-Head's present with intense revelation. His eyes went wide. His existence flashed before him like a movie in rewind; surprised by his own surprise.
	It was a secret weapon the three devised while eating potato chips.
	"What is that?" Exeter tried to stall.
	"It has been a long time since you've felt fright eh? Emptiness. You're actually pale right now, and you've every right to be scared Papa Ex. This here is the unrivaled loudest bag in the universe, and probably the multiverse; now, we shall know..." Before Exeter had time to react, Zach clapped his hands, popping the round ball of flannel and the loudest sound wave ever fired straight at Exeter and his Tower.
	The building did not like this at all. 
	Bricks of concrete and the skeletal steel cabling from years of hard work and engineering decimated and turned to rubble and detritus. The sound of a +150 story building made a bellowing yawn in warning from its foundation, begging to be killed quickly, knowing that its wish would soon be fulfilled. 
	
	Dementedly, Alec Pure rushed the Blanketeer with his twisted knife, arching his arm ready to plunge the blade into the hero, knowing the desperation in the moment; to see a tower fall that represents a creed can be a traumatic event. 
	The Tower leaned and clamored and conceived its last thought; it didn't want to die. Masses of stone sculptures and huge jagged bricks slipping away and putrefy from its roots. Debris from above stormed down like a metropolitan avalanche. 
	The sound of people falling from extreme latitude is defiant from other things; almost as if you can hear all their memories dissipate with their brain matter, spilling thoughts into the ground. 
	Nic stared up at Deadsy Tower; it was getting smaller?It was collapsing. "Fuck!" he yelled right as Exeter and the Bag-Head disappeared, dematerializing in an evaporating vanish. 
 	The Deadsy Tower gave, leaving all in its shadow to be shattered into oblivion. It exploded and blasted everywhere. There were sounds of apocalypse, like an asteroid taking out all North America.  
	The entire downtown Deadsy district was devastated, anything in the 20 block radius now destroyed. Ash and snow blew everywhere, creating a dense dust storm. Kylia and Nic jumped inside an empty dumpster and let the world as they knew it crash down on them. It was a mild taste of hell on earth. 
	
Once the sound of metal snapping and concrete crunching and copper wiring sizzling ceased, and all that could be heard was the smoldering of renegade fires sporadically placed on the ground with the falling debris, Nic again attempted to turn into the superhero Pi beholder but still couldn't undergo the necessary change. It was starting to frustrate him to the brink of insanity.
	"Is it safe to get out of here now? This thing smells fucking rancid!"
	"Well, we are sitting in a dumpster?" Nic shifted his head as if he could tell- "Something's coming?" But it couldn't be a person.
	"Something? Like what, Deadsy?" 
	The thing outside was clearing the dumpster off from the aftermath that was weighing down the top of the large metal waste compartment, and lifted the opening. Immediately, Kylia starting shrieking and screaming so high pitched that Nic had to close his ears with his hands, squeezing his eyes shut. The monster picked up Kylia and took her as her own with her humanesque arms and squeezed her under one armpit.
Nic shot out of the dumpster but once he saw the portrait of the beast, shot right back in, then repeated the process. On the third time he found enough courage or enough stupidity to follow the giant scorpion slut. 
	"Hey!" he yelled at it but she didn't turn. "Hey! I'm talkin to you!" he threw a jagged rock and it bounced off her like gravel. "Hey! Come back here, you stupid bitch!" He ran, jumping on her back, dancing around her twisted tail. Kylia's legs were kicking in a pathetic attempt to wiggle out of Dara's arm cage, but it was useless. 
Pundara felt the presence of a boy on her backside and grew madly furious. He held onto Kylia's feet and tried to wriggle her away but lost his footing on the armored scales and swung to the side of Dara, trying to use his own weight to pull Kylia free. This infuriated Dara even more who struck Nic with the back of her black spotted hand, slapping him twenty feet backward, evacuating all wind out of him. He coughed and spat out a wad of thick blood. Pundara triggered her stinger to fatalitize Nic, when the tenor voice of the Blanketeer interrupted her stream of consciousness.
	"Hey YO, Godzilla Cunt, what the hell you doin to my friends, huh?" The stub of his arm raised with his full one. 
	"You," the monster hissed and drooled out her mouth, nearing on him. "How many times must I kill you?"
	"Kill me? Why would you wanna kill me, Pundara? Remember? Your name is Pundara." she hissed at hearing her old name. "You sang and played guitar, and everyone wanted to be with you-- hell, I'd still get with ya now!" Her third eye in the center of her forehead leered red at the boy with reviled abominable odium. "Ok?Listen, you're gonna die unless we save you somehow --Dara! Come on! WAKE UP! STOP THIS SHIT DARA! COME INTO THE LIGHT! BELIEVE IN PI!"
	"Get away from me boy or I'll throat the little girly!"
	"You won't do that. She's the only one that knows how to save you." He levitated, trying to get in between her and Nic. There were audible shouts but indeterminable quality of words and clarity as more snow fell greatly. "She's the only one of us you want alive." His superhero heart was beating faster than ever.
	Kylia managed to face upwards and see the pajama clad Blanketeer floating and sparkling in the midnight hours. He saw her and didn't recognize her at first. "Kylia? What the fuck?!" Her newly acquired hottness interrupted his stream of consciousness.
	The Creature used this opportunity to swipe at the Blanketeer and slammed him through the wall of a still standing building with all her might. His body made a horrible splat sound.
	A lightning bolt erupted and shot back outside just as quickly as she attacked and he was on the other end of it, flinging the side of his shoulder straight into Pundara. It threw her back painfully, but not much else. He shot a sphere of lightning at the center of her chest and it exploded like a crackle ball all up and down her, forcing the future Valkyrja, Kylia, to fall on the ice covered ground, barely making a sound scabbing her knees and elbows. The Blanketeer continued the barrage for her to escape safely, but there was something holding her back. 
	A stench; a dank putrid aroma that Kylia thought to be awful at first but found she couldn't stop sniffing it. "Kylia!" The Blanketeer was trying to yell instructions at her but the monster Pundara leapt at him and bit his face and scraped at his flesh to rip it off and wear it to the Scorpion bon-bon ball later in the year. He ridiculed her with fierce lightning wads.
	Kylia realized if she couldn't do something, anything, she would witness a super hero lobotomy. 
	The smell, mother's milk?
	The Blanketeer was rolling and rolling, but the Creature had him pinned down by his own cape, struggling to avoid her pinchers and claws. Then he felt the arms and legs of another, softer body. It was Kylia, crawling underneath the beast, completely unnoticed and unharmed. She knew what to do, or at least, was going to try something none of them had tried yet. He sent one last wave of Electricity at Pundara and watched in disgusted fantasy the lesbian scene of monster bestiality. 
	Kylia extended a hand and grabbed what almost looked like an outtie belly button the size of a small starfish and massaged it clockwise and counterclockwise. It throbbed and pulsed and gooed rhythmically. The Monster Pundara immediately turned her attention to the pleasure she was receiving on her underside. Her eyes glossed over in sinful trance. Kylia was using her whole hand to massage the monster's slimy genital opening, which was now completely encased in a layer of thick mucus and was dripping onto her silky naked body. The monster Pundara ran her fingers through her hair, then with a sudden jerk, grabbed the head of Kylia with her hands and shoved her face through her labia, sensually purring and trembling like a person who had never been exposed to the aspect of pleasure or sexual comfort.
Kylia was gagging and struggling to breathe because the layer of mire or monster scorpion vagina sweat was completely covering her mouth. And in an attempt to free herself from suffocating in the cunt of a mutant, she pushed her hand against the beast, but was surprised to find that it had slipped inside the monster Dara cunt and was penetrating inside her moist genital opening, piercing a sack of creature hymen damp and wet deep past her elbow it went in, and when she tried to yank it out, Dara slammed it back in with her lower pelvic muscles, grinding and riding. 
The Blanketeer was astounded at what he was seeing nearly frozen; traumatized yet enthralled. It made a low flapping gloppy sound. He saw the monster Pundara was about to explode; she was panting and grunting and grabbing her breasts and breathing hard and trembling and then she did.
Out of her monster scorpion vagina a massive amount of monster scorpion cum came shooting out all over Kylia like a repressed volcano, drenching her angel-like hair and soaking the rest of her pristine body. Trapped in the ejaculation were albino Dara/scorpion larvae squirming out in the plethora of smegma. The Blanketeer puked violently into his phantom hands. Kylia had to yank out her arm from the inside of Pundara's box, making a low obnoxious plunger sound, spitting out wads of scorpion monster jizz with it, gagging on a wriggling larva lodged in her throat. Blank wanted to give Kylia a crown with flowers and a standing ovation. She deserved it. 
	The monster Pundara now tame, slunked over and started to snore boisterously. 
	
Kylia was hauntingly crawling backwards, shivering with a loss of dignity. Blank wrapped her into him with his dismembered hands and bundling his cape around her. He wiped a macabre amount of cum off her face and hair. "You're a hero Kylia. You found the clitoris, a job no man can do." She was in shock and wasn't saying anything but loud pants of exhaustion. She thought she'd been killed, several times in less than a few hours. 
	They embraced and stared at the Creature who was in a deep slumber now. She was talking in her sleep, and her voice sounded like the real Pundara, the human. Drew put her face in the nub of his hand, "You're my hero," he said legitimately. 
"You saved me..." Now Drew himself had taken Blank's place, with two arms, fully clothed but with a horrible headache and a bloody nose, and so very cold. His hair was longer than Kylia's, nesting tangles galore. He cradled her in his arms and rocked her. She fought the exhaustion, with enough strength for a smile, trying but unable to forget.
	
Their euphoria deceased after only 3.14 minutes. Heavy Footsteps and laser cannon fire ambushed their embrace, almost out of nowhere, marching like Gestapo: Deadsy. Their only reaction was holding onto each other, tighter. Drew mumbled something in her ear.
	"Yes, yes?Bravo, great job Kylia; Satan and Pi only knew you would find the clitoris and stop the beast, but you cannot stop the inevitable." Twas the prutridly proud voice of Exeter, malignantly treacherous. Behind him Pure and Nner followed obediently, and behind the doctor was a 100 strong squad of Deadsy super solider Trenchcoats. Drew lurched to his feet but was knocked cold by Alec Pure's unforgiving kick to the side of the head. The assassin repeated until he heard the dissonant choir of the Bag-Head's weapon that opened worlds only he commanded. Kylia tried to help her friend but was relentlessly slapped bloodily away. "Quickly Pure, before the bitch wakes up. Take the girl and run." Alec Pure slapped Kylia who screamed and then was abused further until submissive. Dara stirred slightly and clapped one of her pinchers with a loud CHOMP. "Don't look at me like some unsociable, pubescent fan-boy, follow him you cloned idiots! Damnit, let's move." They ran silently away into the nowhere illusion of our escapeless world. 
Exeter took one last look behind him, predicting, ascertaining, knowing it would not be the last time he saw the Three. Next time, I will need you as much as you need me? 
The nefarious nemesis turned and kidnapped the princess of the Multiverse and fled the city of San Tropez in the midst of a blizzard?

	The monster Pundara awakens whispering to herself in a quiet and calm voice, almost tranquil. Drew is out cold, face purple and bleeding profusely from the nose and ears. Nic's hunched over, mumbling. Running footsteps and sirens rise in volume, awakening none. Helicopters and walkie-talkie's copy over and out. They will be discovered shortly.
	The Bag-Head sprinting with a limp, dizzy and tired from a million battles fought since the beginning of Pi. His hopes are vacant. 
The thing, the once resplendent woman he thought he loved, now a horrible half-scorpion beast, talking to herself in her sleep. The Bag-Head carefully goes to Nic and brushes his face off. His eyes open. "What happened," Nic shifts his head around and notices one missing. "Where's Kylia?"	
	At the sound of her name Nic fully awakes, and so does Dara. She rises on all of her ungues, mewling, tripping over her foreign legs. Her eye color returned from the black lifeless lids, into the green and brown hazelnut mix they once were. Her third eye closed. She's staring up and down all of her body in exasperated terror, unable to come to terms with her hideous permanence. The Bag-Head removes his Bag helmet and underneath, the head of Zach appears without a neck. "Dara?" he whispers. "Dara?" she can't hear him. "Dara!" she turns and falls over herself, all of her appendages are quivering on their own accord. Her shrieks and cries do nothing to settle her, nor the face of the boy who wanted true love and she but not with him.
	"Zach!? NO! PLEASE! GO AWAY! DON'T LOOK AT ME! GET AWAY! PLEASE! DON'T LOOK AT ME!" she keeps falling over herself and trying to crawl away but can't coordinate her body. Nic rises to his feet, still naked. "NOOOOO!!!!" She feels embarrassment, shame, mortified obloquy for no longer being the desirable creature she once was.
	The sound of helicopters and sirens grow louder in the vast distance. Flashlights and radio waves. The walkie-talkie's chatting. Keys jingling. "Nic, where is Kylia?"
	"I don't know, I thought she had her?"
	"Dara, where is Kylia," her hysterics became annoying. She would never be the same; nothing would ever be the same, once again. "Is she dead?" This got her attention, tears streaming down her face; she touches the wetness and hauntingly remembers. "What did you see?"
	"I killed him?I killed the little bastard?but it was his fault, he wanted my baby." She put her claws over her mouth, scared of her own body and thoughts she swats them away and continues to snort and puff, crossing her arms over her breasts.
	"Drew's not dead," Zach sees the horizon behind Dara. Nic sees the ground below his feet. "Neither is Exeter? damn the all, he took Kylia." He glares at Nic and his naked body, disappointed. "Where was the Lion Tamer?" Zach stands over Nic.
	"I don't know. I couldn't find him" Nic scratches the hair on the back of his neck.
	"You couldn't find him?"
	"I couldn't transform." 
Zach makes a very displeased face. "Just think, if he was here, we might've ended everything tonight."
	"I can smell her?" Pundara says through choked incessant tears, but finally calming herself, as if a strange realization overwhelmed her. "My Pi, I can smell her. They're far now, but we can follow them, we can catch them, but we have to leave now." She doesn't look at them but rises so that her body is tall, beautiful and atrocious. She smells the scent of Kylia and forgets the hell she's been through. 
	"We can't leave," Zach says walking over to Drew, foreseeing bitter ends.
	"I have to leave Zach, please don't try to stop me," Nic interjected. 
	"With Exeter and Deadsy gone, we can clean up and reassemble the pieces. Exeter will wait out the aftermath until it's convenient for him, and sweep the people right back into his trap. If we stay, we can rebuild so that something like this will never happen again."
	"You think bad things aren't going to happen?"
	"That's not what I said Nic: We can at least turn the light on so others are able to see the truth, and won't get caught in a spider-web of lies again. We've already started, but if no one's here to point at the liar, who else will?"
	Nic contemplates this and watches Dara scuttle with dizzying speeds around the broken heap of the city. She meets his eyes and grins defeated, as if saying, this was all my fault. "Then you stay. You and Drew stay."
	"What--"
	"Yeah, you have to stay, in case he comes back and we fail..."
	"What do you mean? Fail? Don't go?Dara, come back, please." She stopped but didn't turn, holding her head towards the snow filled ground, large flakes falling bipolarly tranquil. "Please. You don't have to go-- you can live with us-- we can make it work---I, I--" he had no idea what to say but wanted to say the right thing to convince her that everything was going to be alright and that humans and superheroes and monster scorpion prostitutes could live in peace and harmony.
	"I need my body back; maybe they can give me that..."
	"You could die Dara!"
	"Death would be an escape from this body. It would be a fucking reward."
	Nic grabs his brother by the shoulder. "If I can't find the Lion Tamer here, maybe I'll find him somewhere else."
	"You are the Lion Tamer, Nic." But Zach can't think to say anything else, and his brother only looks back at him bewildered. Zach tries to say words like 'but' and 'if' and 'why' and 'no' but they have no real meaning or potency. Nic strips off Drew's clothes and put them on himself. They are comically tight but fulfill the job requirements. 
	The brothers hug for the last time, "I'm not coming back until I have Kylia's sweet ass riding in on my shoulder." 
Nic jumped on the back of Dara's scorpion body, kicking and rearing like a wild horse, they disappeared into the infinite night like the Lone Ranger on top of Silver. Hi Ho.
	
	When they were finally out of sight, Zach fell to his knees as himself. 
Lights were shining at him as he picked up Drew's body. A group of brave reporters were saying things like 'look over there' and 'who is that' but Zach said, "Hey buddy, come on, Drew, get up dude," as if this were a switch to turn him on.
	Drew sparked electric, "Hey--I'm still alive." He opened one eye and noticed the brightness. "Did we win?" 
	"It's not over." Zach stumbled. Drew saw over Zach's shoulder with a depressed and sorry face to a wave of journalists trotting towards them. Millions of flashes captured the most picturesque moment in San Tropez history: Zach, haggard and torn, mouth barely open, with Drew curled and wrapped around his neck, blood and snow matted to their faces, resembling survivors of an ice bombing. Drew's not heavy, he's my brother.
	"Josh Turkey," Drew coughed after he saw again from the blinding flashes, "the best journalist in the Multiverse." Zach spit and took one last step. "You're my brother, and not a figment of my imagination, right?"
	Zach looked at him squarely and said, "No Drew, I am a figment of your imagination."
"Reality is what you make of it. And I make it."
"This is our future?"
"Adapt, you're probably good at it. Find the focal point, beyond the reality we haven't reached, but will, someday..."
